District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
23 act may be cited as the "Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act of 2025."
24 Sec. 2. Subtitle II of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Code is amended as follows:
25 (a) The table of contents for the title is amended by adding at the end the phrase "55.
26 Fiduciary Income and Principal; Uniform Law ... §§ 28-5501.1 to 28-5508.03.".
27 (b) Chapter 48 is repealed.
28 (c) A new Chapter 55 is added to read as follows:
29 "CHAPTER 55: FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL; UNIFORM ACT
30 "Sec.
31 "Subchapter 1. General Provisions.
32 "28-55.01.01. Short title.
33 "28-55.01.02. Definitions.
34 "28-55.01.03. Scope.

35 “Subchapter 2. Fiduciary Duties and Judicial Review.
36 “28-5502.01. Fiduciary duties; general principles.
37 “28-5502.02. Judicial review or exercise of discretionary power; request for instruction.
38 “28-5502.03. Fiduciary’s power to adjust.
39 “Subchapter 3. Unitrust.
40 “28-5503.01. Definitions
41 “28-5503.03. Authority of fiduciary.
42 “28-5503.04. Notice.
43 “28-5503.05. Unitrust policy.
44 “28-5503.06. Unitrust rate.
45 “28-5503.07 . Applicable value.
46 “28-5503.08. Period.
47 “28-5503.09. Special tax benefits; other rules.
48 “Subchapter 4. Allocation of Receipts
49 “Subpart 1. Receipt from Entity.
50 “28-5504.01. Character of receipts from entity.
51 “28-5504.02. Distribution from trust or estate.
52 “28-5504.03. Business or other activity conducted by fiduciary.
53 “Subpart 2. Receipts Not Normally Apportioned.
54 “28-5504.04. Principal receipts.
55 “28-5504.05. Rental property.
56 “28-5504.06. Receipt on obligation to be paid in money.
57 “28-5504.07. Insurance policy or contract.
2

58 “Subpart 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned
59 “28-5504.08. Insubstantial allocation no required.
60 “28-5504.09. Deferred compensation, annuity, or similar payment/
61 “28-5504.10. Liquidating asset.
62 “28-5504.11. Minerals, water, and other natural resources.
63 “28-5504.12. Timber.
64 “28-5504.13. Marital deduction property not productive of income.
65 “28-5504.14. Derivative or option
66 “28-5504.15. Asset backed security.
67 “28-5504.16. Other financial instrument or arrangement.
68 “Subchapter 5. Allocation of Disbursements
69 “28-5505.01. Disbursement from income.
70 “28-5505.02. Disbursement from principal.
71 “28-5505.03. Transfer from income to principal for depreciation.
72 “28-5505.04. Reimbursement of income from principal.
73 “28-5505.05. Reimbursement of principal from income.
74 “28-5505.06. Income taxes.
75 “28-5505.07. Adjustment between income and principal because of taxes.
76 “Subchapter 6. Death of Individual or Termination of Income Interest
77 “28-5506.01. Determination and distribution of net income.
78 “28-5506.02. Distribution to successor beneficiaries.
79 “Subchapter 7. Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest
80 “28-5507.01. When right to income begins and ends.
3

81 “28-5507.02. Apportionment of receipts and disbursements when decedent dies or income
82 “28-5507.03. Apportionment when income interest ends.
83 “Subchapter 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.
84 “28-5508.01. Uniformity of application and construction.
85 “28-5508.02. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
86 “28-5508.03. Application to trust or estate.
87 “CHAPTER 55: FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL; UNIFORM ACT
88 “Subchapter 1. General Provisions.
89 “§ 28-55.01.01. Short title.
90 This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act.
91 “§ 28-55.01.02. Definitions.
92 “In this chapter:
93 “(1) “Accounting period” means a calendar year, unless a fiduciary selects another period
94 of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months. The term includes a part of a
95 calendar year or another period of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months
96 which begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.
97 “(2) “Asset-backed security” means a security that is serviced primarily by the cash flows
98 of a discrete pool of fixed or revolving receivables or other financial assets that by their terms
99 convert into cash within a finite time. The term includes rights or other assets that ensure the
100 servicing or timely distribution of proceeds to the holder of the asset-backed security. The term
101 does not include an asset to which § 28-55.04.01, 28-55.04.09 or 28-55.04.14, applies.
102 “(3) “Attorney General” means the Attorney General of the District of Columbia.
103 “(4) “Beneficiary” includes:
4

104 “(A) For a trust:
105 “(i) A current beneficiary, including a current income beneficiary and a
106 beneficiary that may receive only principal;
107 “(ii) A remainder beneficiary; and
108 “(iii) Any other successor beneficiary;
109 “(B) For an estate, an heir, legatee, and devisee; and
110 “(C) For a life estate or term interest, a person that holds a life estate, term
111 interest, or remainder or other interest following a life estate or term interest.
112 “(5) “Court” means Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
113 ”(6) “Current income beneficiary” means a beneficiary to which a fiduciary may
114 distribute net income, whether or not the fiduciary also may distribute principal to the
115 beneficiary.
116 ”(7) “Distribution” means a payment or transfer by a fiduciary to a beneficiary in the
117 beneficiary’s capacity as a beneficiary, made under the terms of the trust, without consideration
118 other than the beneficiary’s right to receive the payment or transfer under the terms of the trust.
119 “Distribute”, “distributed”, and “distributee” have corresponding meanings.
120 “(8) “District” means the District of Columbia.
121 “(9)“Estate” means a decedent’s estate. The term includes the property of the decedent as
122 the estate is originally constituted and the property of the estate as it exists at any time during
123 administration.
124 “(10) “Fiduciary” includes a trustee, trust director determined under § 19-2102(10),
125 personal representative, life tenant, holder of a term interest, and person acting under a
126 delegation from a fiduciary. The term includes a person that holds property for a successor
5

127 beneficiary whose interest may be affected by an allocation of receipts and expenditures between
128 income and principal. If there are two or more co-fiduciaries, the term includes all co-fiduciaries
129 acting under the terms of the trust and applicable law.
130 “(11) “Income” means money or other property a fiduciary receives as current return
131 from principal. The term includes a part of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a
132 principal asset, to the extent provided in Subchapter 4.
133 “(12) “Income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to receive all or
134 part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require the net income to be distributed or
135 authorize the net income to be distributed in the fiduciary’s discretion. The term includes the
136 right of a current beneficiary to use property held by a fiduciary.
137 “(13) “Independent person” means a person that is not:
138 “(A) For a trust:
139 “(i) A qualified beneficiary determined under § 19-1301.03(14);
140 “(ii) A settlor of the trust; or
141 “(iii) An individual whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be
142 satisfied by a distribution from the trust;
143 “(B) For an estate, a beneficiary;
144 “(C) A spouse, parent, brother, sister, or issue of an individual described in
145 subparagraph (A) or (B);
146 “(D) A corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity in which
147 persons described in subparagraphs (A) through (C), in the aggregate, have voting control; or
148 “(E) An employee of a person described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D).
149 “(14) “Mandatory income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to
6

150 receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.
151 “(15) “Net income” means the total allocations during an accounting period to income
152 under the terms of a trust and this chapter minus the disbursements during the period, other than
153 distributions, allocated to income under the terms of the trust and this chapter. To the extent the
154 trust is a unitrust under Subchapter 3, the term means the unitrust amount determined under
155 Subchapter 3. The term includes an adjustment from principal to income under§ 28-5502.03. The
156 term does not include an adjustment from income to principal under§ 28-5502.03.
157 “(16) “Person” means an individual, estate, trust, business or nonprofit entity, public
158 corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal
159 entity.
160 “(17) “Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal
161 representative, special administrator, or person that performs substantially the same function with
162 respect to an estate under the law governing the person’s status.
163 “(18) “Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to, production of income
164 for, or use by a current or successor beneficiary.
165 “(19) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored
166 in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
167 “(20) “Settlor” means a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes property to
168 a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, the term includes each
169 person, to the extent of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution, except to the
170 extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.
171 “(21) “Special tax benefit” means:
172 “(A) Exclusion of a transfer to a trust from gifts described in § 2503(b) of the
7

173 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2503(b), because of the qualification of an income
174 interest in the trust as a present interest in property;
175 “(B) Status as a qualified subchapter S trust described in § 1361(d)(3) of the
176 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 1361(d)(3), at a time the trust holds stock of an S
177 corporation described in § 1361(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 26 U.S.C. §
178 1361(a)(1);
179 “(C) An estate or gift tax marital deduction for a transfer to a trust under § 2056
180 or 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2056 or 2523 which depends or
181 depended in whole or in part on the right of the settlor’s spouse to receive the net income of the
182 trust;
183 “(D) Exemption in whole or in part of a trust from the federal generation-skipping
184 transfer tax imposed by § 2601 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2601 because
185 the trust was irrevocable on September 25, 1985, if there is any possibility that:
186 “(i) A taxable distribution, as defined in § 2612(b) of the Internal Revenue
187 Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2612(b), could be made from the trust; or
188 “(ii) A taxable termination, as defined in § 2612(a) of the Internal
189 Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2612(a), could occur with respect to the trust; or
190 “(E) An inclusion ratio, as defined in § 2642(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of
191 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2642(a), of the trust which is less than one, if there is any possibility that:
192 “(i) A taxable distribution, as defined in § 2612(b) of the Internal Revenue
193 Code of 1986 26 U.S.C. § 2612(b), could be made from the trust; or
194 “(ii) A taxable termination, as defined in § 2612(a) of the Internal
195 Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 2612(a), could occur with respect to the trust.
8

196 “(22) “Successive interest” means the interest of a successor beneficiary.
197 “(23) “Successor beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive income or principal or
198 to use property when an income interest or other current interest ends.
199 “(24) “Terms of a trust” means:
200 “(A) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), the manifestation of the
201 settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as:
202 “(i) Expressed in the trust instrument; or
203 “(ii) Established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial
204 proceeding;
205 “(B) The trust’s provisions as established, determined, or amended by:
206 “(i) A trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law;
207 “(ii) Court order; or
208 “(iii) A nonjudicial settlement agreement under§ 19-1301.11;
209 “(C) For an estate, a will; or
210 “(D) For a life estate or term interest, the corresponding manifestation of the
211 rights of the beneficiaries.
212 “(25) “Trust”:
213 “(A) Includes:
214 “(i) An express trust, private or charitable, with additions to the trust,
215 wherever and however created; and
216 “(ii) A trust created or determined by judgment or decree under which the
217 trust is to be administered in the manner of an express trust; and
218 “(B) Does not include:
9

219 “(i) A constructive trust;
220 “(ii) A resulting trust, conservatorship, guardianship, multi-party account,
221 custodial arrangement for a minor, business trust, voting trust, security arrangement, liquidation
222 trust, or trust for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest, salaries, wages, profits,
223 pensions, retirement benefits, or employee benefits of any kind; or
224 “(iii) An arrangement under which a person is a nominee, escrowee, or
225 agent for another.
226 “(26) “Trustee” means a person, other than a personal representative, that owns or holds
227 property for the benefit of a beneficiary. The term includes an original, additional, or successor
228 trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.
229 “(27) “Will” means any testamentary instrument recognized by applicable law which
230 makes a legally effective disposition of an individual’s property, effective at the individual’s
231 death. The term includes a codicil or other amendment to a testamentary instrument.
232 “§ 28-55.01.03. Scope.
233 “Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this chapter, this chapter applies
234 to:
235 “(1) A trust or estate; and
236 “(2) A life estate or other term interest in which the interest of one or more persons will
237 be succeeded by the interest of one or more other persons.
238 “§ 28-55.01.04. Governing law.
239 “Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this chapter, this chapter applies
240 when this state is the principal place of administration of a trust or estate or the situs of property
241 that is not held in a trust or estate and is subject to a life estate or other term interest described in
10

242 § 28-55.01.03(2). By accepting the trusteeship of a trust having its principal place of
243 administration in the District or by moving the principal place of administration of a trust to the
244 District, the trustee submits to the application of this chapter to any matter within the scope of
245 this chapter involving the trust.
246 “Subchapter 2. Fiduciary Duties and Judicial Review.
247 “§ 28-5502.01. Fiduciary duties; general principles.
248 “(a) In making an allocation or determination or exercising discretion under this chapter,
249 a fiduciary shall:
250 “(1) Act in good faith, based on what is fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries;
251 “(2) Administer a trust or estate impartially, except to the extent the terms of the
252 trust manifest an intent that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more beneficiaries;
253 “(3) Administer the trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust, even if
254 there is a different provision in this chapter; and
255 “(4) Administer the trust or estate in accordance with this chapter, except to the
256 extent the terms of the trust provide otherwise or authorize the fiduciary to determine otherwise.
257 “(b) A fiduciary’s allocation, determination, or exercise of discretion under this chapter is
258 presumed to be fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries. A fiduciary may exercise a discretionary
259 power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust, and an exercise of the
260 power which produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this chapter does
261 not create an inference that the fiduciary abused the fiduciary’s discretion.
262 “(c) A fiduciary shall:
263 “(1) Add a receipt to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust nor this
264 chapter allocates the receipt between income and principal; and
11

265 “(2) Charge a disbursement to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust
266 nor this chapter allocates the disbursement between income and principal.
267 “(d) A fiduciary may exercise the power to adjust under§ 28-5502.03, convert an income
268 trust to a unitrust under § 28-5503.03(a)(1), change the percentage or method used to calculate a
269 unitrust amount under § 28-5503.03(a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust under § 28-
270 5503.03(a)(3), if the fiduciary determines the exercise of the power will assist the fiduciary to
271 administer the trust or estate impartially.
272 “(e) Factors the fiduciary must consider in making the determination under subsection (d)
273 include:
274 “(1) The terms of the trust;
275 “(2) The nature, distribution standards, and expected duration of the trust;
276 “(3) The effect of the allocation rules, including specific adjustments between
277 income and principal, under Subchapters 4 through 7;
278 “(4) The desirability of liquidity and regularity of income;
279 “(5) The desirability of the preservation and appreciation of principal;
280 “(6) The extent to which an asset is used or may be used by a beneficiary;
281 “(7) The increase or decrease in the value of principal assets, reasonably
282 determined by the fiduciary;
283 “(8) Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the fiduciary power to
284 accumulate income or invade principal or prohibit the fiduciary from accumulating income or
285 invading principal;
286 “(9) The extent to which the fiduciary has accumulated income or invaded
287 principal in preceding accounting periods;
12

288 “(10) The effect of current and reasonably expected economic conditions; and
289 “(11) The reasonably expected tax consequences of the exercise of the power.
290 “§ 28-5502.02. Judicial review or exercise of discretionary power; request for
291 instruction.
292 “(a) In this section, “fiduciary decision” means:
293 “(1) A fiduciary’s allocation between income and principal or other determination
294 regarding income and principal required or authorized by the terms of the trust or this chapter;
295 “(2) The fiduciary’s exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power regarding
296 income and principal granted by the terms of the trust or this chapter, including the power to
297 adjust under§ 28-5502.03, convert an income trust to a unitrust under § 28-5503.03(a)(1), change
298 the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under § 28-5503.03(a)(2), or
299 convert a unitrust to an income trust under § 28-5503.03(a)(3); or
300 “(3) The fiduciary’s implementation of a decision described in paragraph (1) or
301 (2).
302 “(b) The court may not order a fiduciary to change a fiduciary decision unless the court
303 determines that the fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.
304 “(c) If the court determines that a fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s
305 discretion, the court may order a remedy authorized by law, including § 19-1310.01. To place the
306 beneficiaries in the positions the beneficiaries would have occupied if there had not been an
307 abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may order:
308 “(1) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to adjust under
309 § 28-5502.03;
310 “(2) The fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to convert an
13

311 income trust to a unitrust under § 28-5503.03(a)(1), change the percentage or method used to
312 calculate a unitrust amount under § 28-5503.03(a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust
313 under § 28-5503.03(a)(3);
314 “(3) The fiduciary to distribute an amount to a beneficiary;
315 “(4) A beneficiary to return some or all of a distribution; or
316 “(5) The fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to
317 a beneficiary.
318 “(d) On petition by a fiduciary for instruction, the court may determine whether a
319 proposed fiduciary decision will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. If the petition
320 describes the proposed decision, contains sufficient information to inform the beneficiary of the
321 reasons for making the proposed decision and the facts on which the fiduciary relies, and
322 explains how the beneficiary will be affected by the proposed decision, a beneficiary that
323 opposes the proposed decision has the burden to establish that it will result in an abuse of the
324 fiduciary’s discretion.
325 “§ 28-5502.03. Fiduciary’s power to adjust.
326 “(a) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this section, a fiduciary, in a
327 record, without court approval, may adjust between income and principal if the fiduciary
328 determines the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or
329 estate impartially.
330 “(b) This section does not create a duty to exercise or consider the power to adjust under
331 subsection (a) or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this section.
332 “(c) A fiduciary that in good faith exercises or fails to exercise the power to adjust under
333 subsection (a) is not liable to a person affected by the exercise or failure to exercise.
14

334 “(d) In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust under
335 subsection (a), a fiduciary shall consider all factors the fiduciary considers relevant, including
336 relevant factors in § 28-5502.01(e).and the application of §§ 28-5504.01(i), 28-5504.08, and 28-
337 5504.13..
338 “(e) A fiduciary may not exercise the power under subsection (a) to make an adjustment
339 or under § 28-5504.08 to make a determination that an allocation is insubstantial if:
340 “(1) The adjustment or determination would reduce the amount payable to a
341 current income beneficiary from a trust that qualifies for a special tax benefit, except to the
342 extent the adjustment is made to provide for a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the
343 trust between the current income beneficiary and successor beneficiaries;
344 “(2) The adjustment or determination would change the amount payable to a
345 beneficiary, as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets, under the terms
346 of the trust;
347 “(3) The adjustment or determination would reduce an amount that is permanently
348 set aside for a charitable purpose under the terms of the trust, unless both income and principal
349 are set aside for the charitable purpose;
350 “(4) Possessing or exercising the power would cause a person to be treated as the
351 owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes;
352 “(5) Possessing or exercising the power would cause all or part of the value of the
353 trust assets to be included in the gross estate of an individual for federal estate tax purposes;
354 “(6) Possessing or exercising the power would cause an individual to be treated as
355 making a gift for federal gift tax purposes;
356 “(7) The fiduciary is not an independent person;
15

357 “(8) The trust is irrevocable and provides for income to be paid to the settlor and
358 possessing or exercising the power would cause the adjusted principal or income to be
359 considered an available resource or available income under a public-benefit program; or
360 “(9) The trust is a unitrust under Subchapter 3.
361 “(f) If subsection (e)(4), (5), (6), or (7) applies to a fiduciary:
362 “(1) A co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not apply may
363 exercise the power to adjust, unless the exercise of the power by the remaining co-fiduciary or
364 co-fiduciaries is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other than this chapter or
365 “(2) If there is no co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not
366 apply, the fiduciary may appoint a co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not
367 apply, which may be a special fiduciary with limited powers, and the appointed co-fiduciary may
368 exercise the power to adjust under subsection (a), unless the appointment of a co-fiduciary or the
369 exercise of the power by a co-fiduciary is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other
370 than this chapter.
371 “(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate to a co-fiduciary the power to adjust under
372 subsection (a) if the fiduciary determines that the fiduciary’s possession or exercise of the power
373 will or may:
374 “(1) Cause a result described in subsection (e)(1) through (6) or (8); or
375 “(2) Deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in
376 subsection (e)(1) through (6).
377 “(h) A fiduciary’s release or delegation to a co-fiduciary under subsection (g) of the
378 power to adjust under subsection (a):
379 “(1) Must be in a record;
16

380 “(2) Applies to the entire power, unless the release or delegation provides a
381 limitation, which may be a limitation to the power to adjust:
382 “(A) From income to principal;
383 “(B) From principal to income;
384 “(C) For specified property; or
385 “(D) In specified circumstances;
386 “(3) For a delegation, may be modified by a re-delegation under this subsection
387 by the co-fiduciary to which the delegation is made; and
388 “(4) Subject to paragraph (3), is permanent, unless the release or delegation
389 provides a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual or the lives
390 of more than one individual.
391 “(i) Terms of a trust which deny or limit the power to adjust between income and
392 principal do not affect the application of this section, unless the terms of the trust expressly deny
393 or limit the power to adjust under subsection (a).
394 “(j) The exercise of the power to adjust under subsection (a) in any accounting period
395 may apply to the current period, the immediately preceding period, and one or more subsequent
396 periods.
397 “(k) A description of the exercise of the power to adjust under subsection (a) must be:
398 “(1) Included in a report, if any, sent to beneficiaries under §19-1308.13(c); or
399 “(2) Communicated at least annually to the qualified beneficiaries determined
400 under, §19-1308.13(c) other than the Attorney General.
401 “Subchapter 3. Unitrust.
402 “§ 28-5503.01. Definitions
17

403 “In this subchapter:
404 “(1) “Applicable value” means the amount of the net fair market value of a trust taken
405 into account under§ 28-5503.07.
406 “(2) “Express unitrust” means a trust for which, under the terms of the trust without
407 regard to this chapter, income or net income must or may be calculated as a unitrust amount.
408 “(3) “Income trust” means a trust that is not a unitrust.
409 “(4) “Net fair market value of a trust” means the fair market value of the assets of the
410 trust, less the noncontingent liabilities of the trust.
411 “(5) “Unitrust” means a trust for which net income is a unitrust amount. The term
412 includes an express unitrust.
413 “(6) “Unitrust amount” means an amount computed by multiplying a determined value of
414 a trust by a determined percentage. For a unitrust administered under a unitrust policy, the term
415 means the applicable value, multiplied by the unitrust rate.
416 “(7) “Unitrust policy” means a policy described in § 28-5503.05 through § 28-5503.09
417 and adopted under§ 28-5503.03.
418 “(8) “Unitrust rate” means the rate used to compute the unitrust amount under paragraph
419 (6) for a unitrust administered under a unitrust policy.
420 “§ 28-5503.02. Application; duties and remedies.
421 “(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this subchapter applies to:
422 “(1) An income trust, unless the terms of the trust expressly prohibit use of this
423 subchapter by a specific reference to this subchapter or an explicit expression of intent that net
424 income not be calculated as a unitrust amount; and
425 “(2) An express unitrust, except to the extent the terms of the trust explicitly:
18

426 “(A) prohibit use of this subchapter by a specific reference to this
427 subchapter;
428 “(B) Prohibit conversion to an income trust; or
429 “(C) Limit changes to the method of calculating the unitrust amount.
430 “(b) This subchapter does not apply to a trust described in § 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5),
431 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §
432 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5), 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b).
433 “(c) An income trust to which this subchapter applies under subsection (a)(1) may be
434 converted to a unitrust under this subchapter regardless of the terms of the trust concerning
435 distributions. Conversion to a unitrust under this subchapter does not affect other terms of the
436 trust concerning distributions of income or principal.
437 “(d) This subchapter applies to an estate only to the extent a trust is a beneficiary of the
438 estate. To the extent of the trust’s interest in the estate, the estate may be administered as a
439 unitrust, the administration of the estate as a unitrust may be discontinued, or the percentage or
440 method used to calculate the unitrust amount may be changed, in the same manner as for a trust
441 under this subchapter.
442 “(e) This subchapter does not create a duty to take or consider action under this
443 subchapter or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this subchapter.
444 “(f) A fiduciary that in good faith takes or fails to take an action under this subchapter is
445 not liable to a person affected by the action or inaction.
446 “§ 28-5503.03. Authority of fiduciary.
447 “(a) A fiduciary, without court approval, by complying with subsections (b) and (f), may:
448 “(1) Convert an income trust to a unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
19

449 unitrust policy for the trust providing:
450 “(A) That in administering the trust the net income of the trust will be a
451 unitrust amount rather than net income determined without regard to this subchapter; and
452 “(B) The percentage and method used to calculate the unitrust amount;
453 “(2) Change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount for a
454 unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a unitrust policy or an amendment or replacement of a
455 unitrust policy providing changes in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust
456 amount; or
457 “(3) Convert a unitrust to an income trust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
458 determination that, in administering the trust, the net income of the trust will be net income
459 determined without regard to this subchapter rather than a unitrust amount.
460 “(b) A fiduciary may take an action under subsection (a) if:
461 “(1) The fiduciary determines that the action will assist the fiduciary to administer
462 a trust impartially;
463 “(2) The fiduciary sends a notice in a record, in the manner required by§ 28-
464 5503.04, describing and proposing to take the action;
465 “(3) The fiduciary sends a copy of the notice under paragraph (2) to each settlor
466 of the trust which is:
467 “(A) If an individual, living; or
468 “(B) If not an individual, in existence;
469 “(4) At least one member of each class of the qualified beneficiaries determined
470 under§ 19-1301.03(14), other than the Attorney General, receiving the notice under paragraph
471 (2) is:
20

472 “(A) If an individual, legally competent;
473 “(B) If not an individual, in existence; or
474 “(C) Represented in the manner provided in § 28-5503.04(b); and
475 “(5) The fiduciary does not receive, by the date specified in the notice under § 28-
476 5503.04(d)(5) an objection in a record to the action proposed under paragraph (2) from a person
477 to which the notice under paragraph (2) is sent.
478 “(c) If a fiduciary receives, not later than the date stated in the notice under § 28-
479 5503.04(d)(5), an objection in a record described in § 28-5503.04(d)(4) to a proposed action, the
480 fiduciary or a beneficiary may request the court to have the proposed action taken as proposed,
481 taken with modifications, or prevented. A person described in § 28-5503.04(a) may oppose the
482 proposed action in the proceeding under this subsection, whether or not the person:
483 “(1) Consented under §28-5503.04(c); or
484 “(2) Objected under §28-5503.04(d)(4).
485 “(d) If, after sending a notice under subsection (b)(2), a fiduciary decides not to take the
486 action proposed in the notice, the fiduciary shall notify in a record each person described in § 28-
487 5503.04(a) of the decision not to take the action and the reasons for the decision.
488 “(e) If a beneficiary requests in a record that a fiduciary take an action described in
489 subsection (a) and the fiduciary declines to act or does not act within 90 days after receiving the
490 request, the beneficiary may request the court to direct the fiduciary to take the action requested.
491 “(f) In deciding whether and how to take an action authorized by subsection (a), or
492 whether and how to respond to a request by a beneficiary under subsection (e), a fiduciary shall
493 consider all factors relevant to the trust and the beneficiaries, including relevant factors in § 28-
494 5502.01(e).
21

495 “(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate the power to convert an income trust to a
496 unitrust under subsection (a)(1), change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust
497 amount under subsection (a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust under subsection (a)(3),
498 for a reason described § 28-5502.03(g) and in the manner described in § 28-5502.03(h).
499 “§ 28-5503.04. Notice.
500 “(a) A notice required by § 28-5503.03(b)(2) must be sent in a manner authorized under
501 §19-1301.09 to:
502 “(1) The qualified beneficiaries determined under §19-1301.03(14), other than the
503 Attorney General; and
504 “(2) Each person acting as trust director of the trust under the Uniform Directed
505 Trust Act, D.C. Code §§ 19-2101 to 19-2118;
506 “(b) The representation provisions of § 19-1303.01 through §19-1301.05 apply to notice
507 under this section.
508 “(c) A person may consent in a record at any time to action proposed under § 28-
509 5503.03(b)(2). A notice required by § 28-5503.03(b)(2) need not be sent to a person that
510 consents under this subsection.
511 “(d) A notice required by § 28-5503.03(b)(2) must include:
512 “(1) The action proposed under § 28-5503.03(b)(2);
513 “(2) For a conversion of an income trust to a unitrust, a copy of the unitrust policy
514 adopted under § 28-5503.03(a)(1);
515 “(3) For a change in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust
516 amount, a copy of the unitrust policy or amendment or replacement of the unitrust policy adopted
517 under § 28-5503.03(a)(2);
22

518 “(4) A statement that the person to which the notice is sent may object to the
519 proposed action by stating in a record the basis for the objection and sending or delivering the
520 record to the fiduciary;
521 “(5) The date by which an objection under paragraph (4) must be received by the
522 fiduciary, which must be at least 30 days after the date the notice is sent;
523 “(6) The date on which the action is proposed to be taken and the date on which
524 the action is proposed to take effect;
525 “(7) The name and contact information of the fiduciary; and
526 “(8) The name and contact information of a person that may be contacted for
527 additional information.
528 “§ 28-5503.05. Unitrust policy.
529 “(a) In administering a unitrust under this subchapter, a fiduciary shall follow a unitrust
530 policy adopted under § 28-5503.03(a)(1) or (2) or amended or replaced under § 28-
531 5503.03(a)(2).
532 “(b) A unitrust policy must provide:
533 “(1) The unitrust rate or the method for determining the unitrust rate under§ 28-
534 5503.06;
535 “(2) The method for determining the applicable value under§ 28-5503.07; and
536 “(3) The rules described in §§ 28-5503.06 through 28-5503.09 which apply in the
537 administration of the unitrust, whether the rules are:
538 “(A) Mandatory, as provided in §§ 28-5503.07(a) and 28-5503.08(a); or
539 “(B) Optional, as provided in §§ 28-5503.06, 28-5503.07(b), 28-
540 5503.08(b) and 28-5503.09(a), to the extent the fiduciary elects to adopt those rules.
23

541 “§ 28-5503.06. Unitrust rate.
542 “(a) Except as otherwise provided in § 28-5503.09(b)(1), a unitrust rate may be:
543 “(1) A fixed unitrust rate; or
544 “(2) A unitrust rate that is determined for each period using:
545 “(A) A market index or other published data; or
546 “(B) A mathematical blend of market indices or other published data over
547 a stated number of preceding periods.
548 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in § 28-5503.09(b)(1), a unitrust policy may provide:
549 “(1) A limit on how high the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
550 rise;
551 “(2) A limit on how low the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
552 fall;
553 “(3) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2)
554 may increase over the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust
555 rates over a stated number of preceding periods;
556 “(4) A limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2)
557 may decrease below the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust
558 rates over a stated number of preceding periods; or
559 “(5) A mathematical blend of any of the unitrust rates determined under
560 subsection (a)(2) and paragraphs (1) through (4).
561 “§ 28-5503.07 . Applicable value.
562 “(a) A unitrust policy must provide the method for determining the fair market value of
563 an asset for the purpose of determining the unitrust amount, including:
24

564 “(1) The frequency of valuing the asset, which need not require a valuation in
565 every period; and
566 “(2) The date for valuing the asset in each period in which the asset is valued.
567 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in § 28-5503.09(b)(2), a unitrust policy may provide
568 methods for determining the amount of the net fair market value of the trust to take into account
569 in determining the applicable value, including:
570 “(1) Obtaining an appraisal of an asset for which fair market value is not readily
571 available;
572 “(2) Exclusion of specific assets or groups or types of assets;
573 “(3) Other exceptions or modifications of the treatment of specific assets or
574 groups or types of assets;
575 “(4) Identification and treatment of cash or property held for distribution;
576 “(5) Use of:
577 “(A) An average of fair market values over a stated number of preceding
578 periods; or
579 “(B) Another mathematical blend of fair market values over a stated
580 number of preceding periods;
581 “(6) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
582 individual assets may increase over:
583 “(A) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
584 “(B) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of
585 preceding periods;
586 “(7) A limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
25

587 individual assets may decrease below:
588 “(A) The corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
589 “(B) A mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of
590 preceding periods;
591 “(8) The treatment of accrued income and other features of an asset which affect
592 value; and
593 “(9) Determining the liabilities of the trust, including treatment of liabilities to
594 conform with the treatment of assets under paragraphs (1) through (8).
595 “§ 28-5503.08. Period.
596 “(a) A unitrust policy must provide the period used under§ 28-5503.06 and 28-5503.07.
597 Except as otherwise provided in § 28- 5503.09(b)(3), the period may be:
598 “(1) A calendar year;
599 “(2) A 12-month period other than a calendar year;
600 “(3) A calendar quarter;
601 “(4) A three-month period other than a calendar quarter; or
602 “(5) Another period.
603 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in § 28-5503.09(b), a unitrust policy may provide
604 standards for:
605 “(1) Using fewer preceding periods under § 28-5503.06(a)(2)(B) or 28-
606 5503.06(b)(3) if:
607 “(A) The trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
608 “(B) Market indices or other published data are not available for a
609 preceding period;
26

610 “(2) Using fewer preceding periods under § 28-5503.07(b)(5)(A), or (B), (6)(B),
611 or (7)(B) if:
612 “(A) The trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
613 “(B) Fair market values are not available for a preceding period; and
614 “(3) Prorating the unitrust amount on a daily basis for a part of a period in which
615 the trust or the administration of the trust as a unitrust or the interest of any beneficiary
616 commences or terminates.
617 “§ 28-5503.09. Special tax benefits; other rules.
618 “(a) A unitrust policy may:
619 “(1) Provide methods and standards for:
620 “(A) Determining the timing of distributions;
621 “(B) Making distributions in cash or in kind or partly in cash and partly in
622 kind; or
623 “(C) Correcting an underpayment or overpayment to a beneficiary based
624 on the unitrust amount if there is an error in calculating the unitrust amount;
625 “(2) Specify sources and the order of sources, including categories of income for
626 federal income tax purposes, from which distributions of a unitrust amount are paid; or
627 “(3) Provide other standards and rules the fiduciary determines serve the interests
628 of the beneficiaries.
629 “(b) If a trust qualifies for a special tax benefit or a fiduciary is not an independent
630 person:
631 “(1) The unitrust rate established under § 28-5503.06 may not be less than
632 3percent or more than 5percent;
27

633 “(2) The only provisions of § 28-5503.07 which apply are § 28-5503.07(a) and
634 (b)(1), (4), (5)(A), and (9);
635 “(3) The only period that may be used under § 28-5503.08 is a calendar year
636 under § 28-5503.08(a)(1); and
637 “(4) The only other provisions of § 28-5503.08 which apply are § 28-
638 5503.08(b)(2)(A) and (3).
639 ”Subchapter 4. Allocation of Receipts
640 ”Subpart 1. Receipt from Entity.
641 ”§ 28-5504.01. Character of receipts from entity.
642 “(a) In this section:
643 “(1) “Capital distribution” means an entity distribution of money which is a:
644 “(A) Return of capital; or
645 “(B) Distribution in total or partial liquidation of the entity.
646 “(2) “Entity”:
647 “(A) Means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company,
648 regulated investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other
649 organization or arrangement in which a fiduciary owns or holds an interest, whether or not the
650 entity is a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes; and
651 “(B) Does not include:
652 “(i) A trust or estate to which . § 28-5504.02 applies;
653 “(ii) A business or other activity to which § 28-5504.03 applies
654 which is not conducted by an entity described in subparagraph (A);
655 “(iii) An asset-backed security; or
28

656 “(iv) An instrument or arrangement to which § 28-5504.16 applies.
657 “(3) “Entity distribution” means a payment or transfer by an entity made to a
658 person in the person’s capacity as an owner or holder of an interest in the entity.
659 “(b) In this section, an attribute or action of an entity includes an attribute or action of any
660 other entity in which the entity owns or holds an interest, including an interest owned or held
661 indirectly through another entity.
662 “(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(2) through (4), a fiduciary shall
663 allocate to income:
664 “(1) Money received in an entity distribution; and
665 “(2) Tangible personal property of nominal value received from the entity.
666 “(d) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
667 “(1) Property received in an entity distribution which is not:
668 “(A) Money; or
669 “(B) Tangible personal property of nominal value;
670 “(2) Money received in an entity distribution in an exchange for part or all of the
671 fiduciary’s interest in the entity, to the extent the entity distribution reduces the fiduciary’s
672 interest in the entity relative to the interests of other persons that own or hold interests in the
673 entity;
674 “(3) Money received in an entity distribution that the fiduciary determines or
675 estimates is a capital distribution; and
676 “(4) Money received in an entity distribution from an entity that is:
677 “(A) A regulated investment company or real estate investment trust if the
678 money received is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes; or
29

679 “(B) Treated for federal income tax purposes comparably to the treatment
680 described in subparagraph (A).
681 “(e) A fiduciary may determine or estimate that money received in an entity distribution
682 is a capital distribution:
683 “(1) By relying without inquiry or investigation on a characterization of the entity
684 distribution provided by or on behalf of the entity, unless the fiduciary:
685 “(A) Determines, on the basis of information known to the fiduciary, that
686 the characterization is or may be incorrect; or
687 “(B) Owns or holds more than 50 percent of the voting interest in the
688 entity;
689 “(2) By determining or estimating, on the basis of information known to the
690 fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on behalf of the entity, that the total amount of
691 money and property received by the fiduciary in the entity distribution or a series of related
692 entity distributions is or will be greater than 20 percent of the fair market value of the fiduciary’s
693 interest in the entity; or
694 “(3) If neither paragraph (1) nor (2) applies, by considering the factors in
695 subsection (f) and the information known to the fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on
696 behalf of the entity.
697 “(f) In making a determination or estimate under subsection (e)(3), a fiduciary may
698 consider:
699 “(1) A characterization of an entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the
700 entity;
701 “(2) The amount of money or property received in:
30

702 “(A) The entity distribution; or
703 “(B) What the fiduciary determines is or will be a series of related entity
704 distributions;
705 “(3) The amount described in paragraph (2) compared to the amount the fiduciary
706 determines or estimates is, during the current or preceding accounting periods:
707 “(A) The entity’s operating income;
708 “(B) The proceeds of the entity’s sale or other disposition of:
709 “(i) All or part of the business or other activity conducted by the
710 entity;
711 “(ii) One or more business assets that are not sold to customers in
712 the ordinary course of the business or other activity conducted by the entity; or
713 “(iii) One or more assets other than business assets, unless the
714 entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on the disposition of all or some of
715 the assets;
716 “(C) If the entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on
717 the disposition of all or some of the assets, the gain realized on the disposition;
718 “(D) The entity’s regular, periodic entity distributions;
719 “(E) The amount of money the entity has accumulated;
720 “(F) The amount of money the entity has borrowed;
721 “(G) The amount of money the entity has received from the sources
722 described in §§ 28-5504.07, 28-5504.10, 28-5504.11, and 28-5504.12; and
723 “(H) The amount of money the entity has received from a source not
724 otherwise described in this paragraph; and
31

725 “(4) any other factor the fiduciary determines is relevant.
726 “(g) If, after applying subsections (c) through (f), a fiduciary determines that a part of an
727 entity distribution is a capital distribution but is in doubt about the amount of the entity
728 distribution which is a capital distribution, the fiduciary shall allocate to principal the amount of
729 the entity distribution which is in doubt.
730 “(h) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to
731 an entity distribution before the fiduciary has paid part of the entity distribution to a beneficiary,
732 the fiduciary may consider the additional information before making the payment to the
733 beneficiary and may change a decision to make the payment to the beneficiary.
734 “(i) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to
735 an entity distribution after the fiduciary has paid part of the entity distribution to a beneficiary,
736 the fiduciary is not required to change or recover the payment to the beneficiary but may
737 consider that information in determining whether to exercise the power to adjust under § 28-
738 5502.03.
739 “§ 28-5504.02. Distribution from trust or estate.
740 “A fiduciary shall allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income,
741 including a unitrust distribution under Subchapter 3, from a trust or estate in which the fiduciary
742 has an interest, other than an interest the fiduciary purchased in a trust that is an investment
743 entity, and shall allocate to principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from the
744 trust or estate. If a fiduciary purchases, or receives from a settlor, an interest in a trust that is an
745 investment entity, § 28-5504.01, 28-5504.15, or 28-5504.16 applies to a receipt from the trust.
746 “§ 28-5504.03. Business or other activity conducted by fiduciary.
747 “(a) This section applies to a business or other activity conducted by a fiduciary if the
32

748 fiduciary determines that it is in the interests of the beneficiaries to account separately for the
749 business or other activity instead of:
750 “(1) Accounting for the business or other activity as part of the fiduciary’s general
751 accounting records; or
752 “(2) Conducting the business or other activity through an entity described in § 28-
753 5504.01(a)(2)(A).
754 “(b) A fiduciary may account separately under this section for the transactions of a
755 business or other activity, whether or not assets of the business or other activity are segregated
756 from other assets held by the fiduciary.
757 “(c) A fiduciary that accounts separately under this section for a business or other
758 activity:
759 ”(1) May determine:
760 “(A) The extent to which the net cash receipts of the business or other
761 activity must be retained for:
762 “(i) Working capital;
763 “(ii) The acquisition or replacement of fixed assets; and
764 “(iii) Other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or other
765 activity; and
766 “(B) The extent to which the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for
767 as principal or income in the fiduciary’s general accounting records for the trust;
768 “(2) May make a determination under paragraph (1) separately and differently
769 from the fiduciary’s decisions concerning distributions of income or principal; and
770 “(3) Shall account for the net amount received from the sale of an asset of the
33

771 business or other activity, other than a sale in the ordinary course of the business or other activity,
772 as principal in the fiduciary’s general accounting records for the trust, to the extent the fiduciary
773 determines that the net amount received is no longer required in the conduct of the business or
774 other activity.
775 “(d) Activities for which a fiduciary may account separately under this section include:
776 “(1) Retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;
777 “(2) Farming;
778 “(3) Raising and selling livestock and other animals;
779 “(4) Managing rental properties;
780 “(5) Extracting minerals, water, and other natural resources;
781 “(6) Growing and cutting timber;
782 “(7) An activity to which § 28-5504.14, 28-5504.15 or 28-5504.16 applies; and
783 “(8) Any other business conducted by the fiduciary.
784 ”Subpart 2. Receipts Not Normally Apportioned.
785 “§ 28-5504.04. Principal receipts.
786 “A fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
787 “(1) To the extent not allocated to income under this chapter, an asset received from:
788 “(A) An individual during the individual’s lifetime;
789 “(B) An estate;
790 “(C) A trust on termination of an income interest; or
791 “(D) A payor under a contract naming the fiduciary as beneficiary;
792 “(2) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, money or other property received
793 from the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset;
34

794 “(3) An amount recovered from a third party to reimburse the fiduciary because of a
795 disbursement described in § 28-5505.02(a) or for another reason to the extent not based on loss
796 of income;
797 “(4) Proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, except that proceeds warded for loss
798 of income in an accounting period are income if a current income beneficiary had a mandatory
799 income interest during the period;
800 “(5) Net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to
801 which a fiduciary may or must distribute income; and
802 “(6) Other receipts as provided in Subpart 3.
803 ”§ 28-5504.05. Rental property.
804 “To the extent a fiduciary does not account for the management of rental property as a
805 business under § 28-5504.03, the fiduciary shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of
806 real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. An
807 amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is to be
808 applied as rent for future periods:
809 “(1) Must be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease, except
810 as otherwise provided by law other than this chapter; and
811 “(2) Is not allocated to income or available for distribution to a beneficiary until
812 the fiduciary’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.
813 ”§ 28-5504.06. Receipt on obligation to be paid in money.
814 “(a) This section does not apply to an obligation to which § 28-5504.09, 28-5504.10, 28-
815 5504.11, 28-5504.12, 28-5504.14, 28-5504.15, or 28-5504.16 applies.
816 “(b) A fiduciary shall allocate to income, without provision for amortization of premium,
35

817 an amount received as interest on an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary, including an
818 amount received as consideration for prepaying principal.
819 “(c) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption,
820 or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary. A fiduciary shall allocate to
821 income the increment in value of a bond or other obligation for the payment of money bearing no
822 stated interest but payable or redeemable, at maturity or another future time, in an amount that
823 exceeds the amount in consideration of which it was issued.
824 “§ 28-5504.07. Insurance policy or contract.
825 “(a) This section does not apply to a contract to which § 28-5504.09 applies.
826 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a fiduciary shall allocate to principal
827 the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract received by the fiduciary as beneficiary,
828 including a contract that insures against damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to an asset. The
829 fiduciary shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income to the extent premiums on the
830 policy are paid from income and to principal to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from
831 principal.
832 “(c) A fiduciary shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the fiduciary
833 against loss of:
834 “(1) Occupancy or other use by a current income beneficiary;
835 “(2) Income; or
836 “(3) Subject to§ 28-5504.03,, profits from a business.
837 “Subpart 3. Receipts Normally Apportioned
838 “§ 28-5504.08. Insubstantial allocation not required.
839 “(a) If a fiduciary determines that an allocation between income and principal required by
36

840 § 28-5504.09, 28-5504.10, 28-5504.11, 28-5504.12, or 28-5504.15 is insubstantial, the fiduciary
841 may allocate the entire amount to principal, unless § 28-5502.03(e) applies to the allocation.
842 “(b) A fiduciary may presume an allocation is insubstantial under subsection (a) if:
843 “(1) The amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an
844 accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than 10 percent; and
845 “(2) The asset producing the receipt to be allocated has a fair market value less
846 than 10 percent of the total fair market value of the assets owned or held by the fiduciary at the
847 beginning of the accounting period.
848 “(c) The power to make a determination under subsection (a) may be:
849 “(1) Exercised by a co-fiduciary in the manner described in § 28-5502.03(f); or
850 “(2) Released or delegated for a reason described in § 28-5502.03(g) and in the
851 manner described in § 28-5502.03(h).
852 “28-5504.09. Deferred compensation, annuity, or similar payment.
853 “(a) In this section:
854 “(1) “Internal income of a separate fund” means the amount determined under
855 subsection (b).
856 “(2) “Marital trust” means a trust:
857 “(A) Of which the settlor’s surviving spouse is the only current income
858 beneficiary and is entitled to a distribution of all the current net income of the trust; and
859 “(B) That qualifies for a marital deduction with respect to the settlor’s
860 estate under § 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,26 U.S.C. § 2056, because:
861 “(i) An election to qualify for a marital deduction under §
862 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(7), has been made; or
37

863 “(ii) The trust qualifies for a marital deduction under § 2056(b)(5)
864 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,26 U.S.C. § 2056(b)(5),.
865 “(3) “Payment” means an amount a fiduciary may receive over a fixed number of
866 years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property
867 transferred to the payor in exchange for future amounts the fiduciary may receive. The term
868 includes an amount received in money or property from the payor’s general assets or from a
869 separate fund created by the payor.
870 “(4) “Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual
871 retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.
872 “(b) For each accounting period, the following rules apply to a separate fund:
873 “(1) The fiduciary shall determine the internal income of the separate fund as if
874 the separate fund were a trust subject to this chapter.
875 “(2) If the fiduciary cannot determine the internal income of the separate fund
876 under paragraph (1), the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal 5 percent of the
877 value of the separate fund, according to the most recent statement of value preceding the
878 beginning of the accounting period.
879 “(3) If the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the separate fund under
880 paragraph (2), the value of the separate fund is deemed to equal the present value of the expected
881 future payments, as determined under § 7520 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §
882 7520, for the month preceding the beginning of the accounting period for which the computation
883 is made.
884 “(c) A fiduciary shall allocate a payment received from a separate fund during an
885 accounting period to income, to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund during the
38

886 period, and the balance to principal.
887 “(d) The fiduciary of a marital trust shall:
888 “(1) Withdraw from a separate fund the amount the current income beneficiary of
889 the trust requests the fiduciary to withdraw, not greater than the amount by which the internal
890 income of the separate fund during the accounting period exceeds the amount the fiduciary
891 otherwise receives from the separate fund during the period;
892 “(2) Transfer from principal to income the amount the current income beneficiary
893 requests the fiduciary to transfer, not greater than the amount by which the internal income of the
894 separate fund during the period exceeds the amount the fiduciary receives from the separate fund
895 during the period after the application of paragraph (1); and
896 “(3) Distribute to the current income beneficiary as income:
897 “(A) The amount of the internal income of the separate fund received or
898 withdrawn during the period; and
899 “(B) The amount transferred from principal to income under paragraph
900 (2).
901 “(e) For a trust, other than a marital trust, of which one or more current income
902 beneficiaries are entitled to a distribution of all the current net income, the fiduciary shall transfer
903 from principal to income the amount by which the internal income of a separate fund during the
904 accounting period exceeds the amount the fiduciary receives from the separate fund during the
905 period.
906 “§ 28-5504.10. Liquidating asset.
907 “(a) In this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or
908 terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a limited time. The term includes
39

909 a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of
910 more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the
911 unpaid balance.
912 “(b) This section does not apply to a receipt subject to § 28-5504.01, 28-5504.09, 28-
913 5504.11 28-5504.12, 28-5504.14, 28-5504.15, 28-5504.01.16, or 28-5505.03.
914 “(c) A fiduciary shall allocate:
915 “(1) To income:
916 “(A) A receipt produced by a liquidating asset, to the extent the receipt
917 does not exceed 5 percent of the value of the asset; or
918 “(B) If the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the asset, 10 percent of
919 the receipt; and
920 “(2) To principal, the balance of the receipt.
921 “§ 28-5504.11. Minerals, water, and other natural resources.
922 “(a) To the extent a fiduciary does not account for a receipt from an interest in minerals,
923 water, or other natural resources as a business under § 28-5504.03, the fiduciary shall allocate the
924 receipt:
925 “(1) To income, to the extent received:
926 “(A) As delay rental or annual rent on a lease;
927 “(B) As a factor for interest or the equivalent of interest under an
928 agreement creating a production payment; or
929 “(C) On account of an interest in renewable water;
930 “(2) To principal, if received from a production payment, to the extent paragraph
931 (1)(B) does not apply; or
40

932 “(3) Between income and principal equitably, to the extent received:
933 “(A) On account of an interest in non-renewable water;
934 “(B) As a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, or bonus; or
935 “(C) From a working interest or any other interest not provided for in
936 paragraph (1) or (2) or subparagraph (A) or (B).
937 “(b) This section applies to an interest owned or held by a fiduciary whether or not a
938 settlor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the fiduciary owned or
939 held the interest.
940 “(c) An allocation of a receipt under subsection (a)(3) is presumed to be equitable if the
941 amount allocated to principal is equal to the amount allowed by the Internal Revenue Code of
942 1986, 26 U.S.C., as a deduction for depletion of the interest.
943 “(d) If a fiduciary owns or holds an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources
944 before the effective date of this chapter, the fiduciary may allocate receipts from the interest as
945 provided in this section or in the manner used by the fiduciary before the effective date of this
946 chapter. If the fiduciary acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on or
947 after the effective date of this chapter, the fiduciary shall allocate receipts from the interest as
948 provided in this section.
949 “§ 28-5504.12. Timber.
950 “(a) To the extent a fiduciary does not account for receipts from the sale of timber and
951 related products as a business under § 28-5504.03,, the fiduciary shall allocate the net receipts:
952 “(1) To income, to the extent the amount of timber cut from the land does not
953 exceed the rate of growth of the timber;
954 “(2) To principal, to the extent the amount of timber cut from the land exceeds the
41

955 rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;
956 “(3) Between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of land
957 used for growing and cutting timber or from a contract to cut timber from land, by determining
958 the amount of timber cut from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in
959 paragraphs (1) and (2); or
960 “(4) To principal, to the extent advance payments, bonuses, and other payments
961 are not allocated under paragraph (1), (2), or (3).
962 “(b) In determining net receipts to be allocated under subsection (a), a fiduciary shall
963 deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.
964 “(c) This section applies to land owned or held by a fiduciary whether or not a settlor was
965 cutting timber from the land before the fiduciary owned or held the property.
966 “(d) If a fiduciary owns or holds an interest in land used for growing and cutting timber
967 before the effective date of this chapter, the fiduciary may allocate net receipts from the sale of
968 timber and related products as provided in this section or in the manner used by the fiduciary
969 before the effective date of this chapter. If the fiduciary acquires an interest in land used for
970 growing and cutting timber on or after the effective date of this chapter, the fiduciary shall
971 allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this section.
972 “§ 28-5504.13. Marital deduction property not productive of income.
973 “(a) If a trust received property for which a gift or estate tax marital deduction was
974 allowed and the settlor’s spouse holds a mandatory income interest in the trust, the spouse may
975 require the trustee, to the extent the trust assets otherwise do not provide the spouse with
976 sufficient income from or use of the trust assets to qualify for the deduction, to:\
977 “(1) Make property productive of income;
42

978 “(2) Convert property to property productive of income within a reasonable time;
979 or
980 “(3) Exercise the power to adjust under § 28-5502.03.
981 “(b) The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions in subsection (a) to
982 take.
983 ”§ 28-5504.14. Derivative or option.
984 “(a) In this section, “derivative” means a contract, instrument, other arrangement, or
985 combination of contracts, instruments, or other arrangements, the value, rights, and obligations
986 of which are, in whole or in part, dependent on or derived from an underlying tangible or
987 intangible asset, group of tangible or intangible assets, index, or occurrence of an event. The term
988 includes stocks, fixed income securities, and financial instruments and arrangements based on
989 indices, commodities, interest rates, weather-related events, and credit-default events.
990 “(b) To the extent a fiduciary does not account for a transaction in derivatives as a
991 business under § 28-5504.03, the fiduciary shall allocate 10 percent of receipts from the
992 transaction and 10 percent of disbursements made in connection with the transaction to income
993 and the balance to principal.
994 “(c) Subsection (d) applies if:
995 “(1) A fiduciary:
996 “(A) Grants an option to buy property from a trust, whether or not the trust
997 owns the property when the option is granted;
998 “(B) Grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the
999 trust; or
1000 “(C) Acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an
43

1001 asset owned by the trust; and
1002 “(2) The fiduciary or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the
1003 option is exercised.
1004 “(d) If this subsection applies, the fiduciary shall allocate 10 percent to income and the
1005 balance to principal of the following amounts:
1006 “(1) An amount received for granting the option;
1007 “(2) An amount paid to acquire the option; and
1008 “(3) Gain or loss realized on the exercise, exchange, settlement, offset, closing, or
1009 expiration of the option.
1010 “§ 28-5504.15. Asset backed security.
1011 “(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a fiduciary shall allocate to income a
1012 receipt from or related to an asset-backed security, to the extent the payor identifies the payment
1013 as being from interest or other current return, and to principal the balance of the receipt.
1014 “(b) If a fiduciary receives one or more payments in exchange for part or all of the
1015 fiduciary’s interest in an asset-backed security, including a liquidation or redemption of the
1016 fiduciary’s interest in the security, the fiduciary shall allocate to income 10 percent of receipts
1017 from the transaction and 10 percent of disbursements made in connection with the transaction,
1018 and to principal the balance of the receipts and disbursements.
1019 ”§ 28-5504.16. Other financial instrument or arrangement.
1020 “A fiduciary shall allocate receipts from or related to a financial instrument or
1021 arrangement not otherwise addressed by this chapter. The allocation must be consistent with §§
1022 28-5504.14 and 28-5504.15.
1023 “Subchapter 5. Allocation of Disbursements
44

1024 “§ 28-5505.01. Disbursement from income.
1025 “Subject to § 28-5505.04, and except as otherwise provided in § 28-5506.01(c)(2) or (3),
1026 a fiduciary shall disburse from income:
1027 “(1) One-half of:
1028 “(A) The regular compensation of the fiduciary and any person providing
1029 investment advisory, custodial, or other services to the fiduciary, to the extent income is
1030 sufficient; and
1031 “(B) An expense for an accounting, judicial or nonjudicial proceeding, or other
1032 matter that involves both income and successive interests, to the extent income is sufficient;
1033 “(2) The balance of the disbursements described in paragraph (1), to the extent a fiduciary
1034 that is an independent person determines that making those disbursements from income would be
1035 in the interests of the beneficiaries;
1036 “(3) Another ordinary expense incurred in connection with administration, management,
1037 or preservation of property and distribution of income, including interest, an ordinary repair,
1038 regularly recurring tax assessed against principal, and an expense of an accounting, judicial or
1039 nonjudicial proceeding, or other matter that involves primarily an income interest, to the extent
1040 income is sufficient; and
1041 “(4) A premium on insurance covering loss of a principal asset or income from or use of
1042 the asset.
1043 “ 28-5505.02. Disbursement from principal.
1044 “(a) Subject to § 28-5505.05, and except as otherwise provided in § 28-5506.01(c)(2), a
1045 fiduciary shall disburse from principal:
1046 “(1) The balance of the disbursements described in § 28-5505.01(1) and (3), after
45

1047 application of § 28-5505.01(2);
1048 “(2) The fiduciary’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance,
1049 distribution, or termination;
1050 “(3) A payment of an expense to prepare for or execute a sale or other disposition
1051 of property;
1052 “(4) A payment on the principal of a trust debt;
1053 “(5) A payment of an expense of an accounting, judicial or nonjudicial
1054 proceeding, or other matter that involves primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe
1055 the terms of the trust or protect property;
1056 “(6) A payment of a premium for insurance, including title insurance, not
1057 described in § 28-5505.01(4), of which the fiduciary is the owner and beneficiary;
1058 “(7) A payment of an estate or inheritance tax or other tax imposed because of the
1059 death of a decedent, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and
1060 “(8) A payment:
1061 “(A) Related to environmental matters, including:
1062 “(i) Reclamation;
1063 “(ii) Assessing environmental conditions;
1064 “(iii) Remedying and removing environmental contamination;
1065 “(iv) Monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances;
1066 “(v) Preventing future releases of substances;
1067 “(vi) Collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable
1068 for the costs of activities described in clauses (i) through (v);
1069 “(vii) Penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations;
46

1070 “(viii) Other actions to comply with environmental laws or
1071 regulations;
1072 “(ix) Statutory or common law claims by third parties; and
1073 “(x) Defending claims based on environmental matters; and
1074 “(B) For a premium for insurance for matters described in subparagraph
1075 (A).
1076 “(b) If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from the
1077 asset to be paid directly to a creditor, the fiduciary shall transfer from principal to income an
1078 amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the
1079 obligation.
1080 “§ 28-5505.03. Transfer from income to principal for depreciation.
1081 “(a) In this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay,
1082 corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a tangible asset having a useful life of more than one year.
1083 “(b) A fiduciary may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts
1084 from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount for
1085 depreciation:
1086 “(1) Of the part of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a
1087 residence;
1088 “(2) Of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or
1089 enjoyment of a beneficiary; or
1090 “(3) Under this section, to the extent the fiduciary accounts:
1091 “(A) Under § 28-5504.10 for the asset; or
1092 “(B) Under § 28-5504.03 for the business or other activity in which the
47

1093 asset is used.
1094 “(c) An amount transferred to principal under this section need not be separately held.
1095 “§ 28-5505.04. Reimbursement of income from principal.
1096 “(a) If a fiduciary makes or expects to make an income disbursement described in
1097 subsection (b), the fiduciary may transfer an appropriate amount from principal to income in one
1098 or more accounting periods to reimburse income.
1099 “(b) To the extent the fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a
1100 third party, income disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include:
1101 “(1) An amount chargeable to principal but paid from income because principal is
1102 illiquid;
1103 “(2) A disbursement made to prepare property for sale, including improvements
1104 and commissions; and
1105 “(3) A disbursement described in § 28-5505.02(a).
1106 “(c) If an asset whose ownership gives rise to an income disbursement becomes subject to
1107 a successive interest after an income interest ends, the fiduciary may continue to make transfers
1108 under subsection (a).
1109 “§ 28-5505.05. Reimbursement of principal from income.
1110 “(a) If a fiduciary makes or expects to make a principal disbursement described in
1111 subsection (b), the fiduciary may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one
1112 or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or provide a reserve for future principal
1113 disbursements.
1114 “(b) To the extent a fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a
1115 third party, principal disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include:
48

1116 “(1) An amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because income is
1117 not sufficient;
1118 “(2) The cost of an improvement to principal, whether a change to an existing
1119 asset or the construction of a new asset, including a special assessment;
1120 “(3) A disbursement made to prepare property for rental, including tenant
1121 allowances, leasehold improvements, and commissions;
1122 “(4) A periodic payment on an obligation secured by a principal asset, to the
1123 extent the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic
1124 payment; and
1125 “(5) A disbursement described in § 28-5505.02(a).
1126 “(c) If an asset whose ownership gives rise to a principal disbursement becomes subject
1127 to a successive interest after an income interest ends, the fiduciary may continue to make
1128 transfers under subsection (a).
1129 “§ 28-5505.06. Income taxes.
1130 “(a) A tax required to be paid by a fiduciary which is based on receipts allocated to
1131 income must be paid from income.
1132 “(b) A tax required to be paid by a fiduciary which is based on receipts allocated to
1133 principal must be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing
1134 authority.
1135 “(c) Subject to subsection (d) and §§ 28-5505.04, 28-5505.05, and 28-5505.07, a tax
1136 required to be paid by a fiduciary on a share of an entity’s taxable income in an accounting
1137 period must be paid from:
1138 “(1) Income and principal proportionately to the allocation between income and
49

1139 principal of receipts from the entity in the period; and
1140 “(2) Principal to the extent the tax exceeds the receipts from the entity in the
1141 period.
1142 “(d) After applying subsections (a) through (c), a fiduciary shall adjust income or
1143 principal receipts, to the extent the taxes the fiduciary pays are reduced because of a deduction
1144 for a payment made to a beneficiary.
1145 “§ 28-5505.07. Adjustment between income and principal because of taxes.
1146 “(a) A fiduciary may make an adjustment between income and principal to offset the
1147 shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between current income beneficiaries and successor
1148 beneficiaries which arises from:
1149 “(1) An election or decision the fiduciary makes regarding a tax matter, other than
1150 a decision to claim an income tax deduction to which subsection (b) applies;
1151 “(2) An income tax or other tax imposed on the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a
1152 result of a transaction involving the fiduciary or a distribution by the fiduciary; or
1153 “(3) Ownership by the fiduciary of an interest in an entity a part of whose taxable
1154 income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the fiduciary or a
1155 beneficiary.
1156 “(b) If the amount of an estate tax marital or charitable deduction is reduced because a
1157 fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it
1158 for estate tax purposes and, as a result, estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income
1159 taxes paid by the fiduciary or a beneficiary are decreased, the fiduciary shall charge each
1160 beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax to reimburse the principal from which
1161 the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement must equal the increase in the estate
50

1162 tax, to the extent the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital or
1163 charitable deduction but for the payment. The share of the reimbursement for each fiduciary or
1164 beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced must be the same as its share of the total decrease in
1165 income tax.
1166 “(c) A fiduciary that charges a beneficiary under subsection (b) may offset the charge by
1167 obtaining payment from the beneficiary, withholding an amount from future distributions to the
1168 beneficiary, or adopting another method or combination of methods.
1169 “Subchapter 6. Death of Individual or Termination of Income Interest
1170 “§ 28-5506.01. Determination and distribution of net income.
1171 “(a) This section applies when:
1172 “(1) The death of an individual results in the creation of an estate or trust; or
1173 “(2) An income interest in a trust terminates, whether the trust continues or is
1174 distributed.
1175 “(b) A fiduciary of an estate or trust with an income interest that terminates shall
1176 determine, under subsection (e) and Subchapters 4, 5, and 7, the amount of net income and net
1177 principal receipts received from property specifically given to a beneficiary. The fiduciary shall
1178 distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary that is to receive the
1179 specific property.
1180 “(c) A fiduciary shall determine the income and net income of an estate or income interest
1181 in a trust which terminates, other than the amount of net income determined under subsection
1182 (b), under Subchapters 4, 5, and 7 and by:
1183 “(1) Including in net income all income from property used or sold to discharge
1184 liabilities;
51

1185 “(2) Paying from income or principal, in the fiduciary’s discretion, fees of
1186 attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries, court costs and other expenses of administration, and
1187 interest on estate and inheritance taxes and other taxes imposed because of the decedent’s death,
1188 but the fiduciary may pay the expenses from income of property passing to a trust for which the
1189 fiduciary claims a federal estate tax marital or charitable deduction only to the extent:
1190 “(A) The payment of the expenses from income will not cause the
1191 reduction or loss of the deduction; or
1192 “(B) The fiduciary makes an adjustment under § 507(b); and
1193 “(3) Paying from principal other disbursements made or incurred in connection
1194 with the settlement of the estate or the winding up of an income interest that terminates,
1195 including:
1196 “(A) To the extent authorized by the decedent’s will, the terms of the trust,
1197 or applicable law, debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, family allowances, estate and
1198 inheritance taxes, and other taxes imposed because of the decedent’s death; and
1199 “(B) Related penalties that are apportioned, by the decedent’s will, the
1200 terms of the trust, or applicable law, to the estate or income interest that terminates.
1201 “(d) If a decedent’s will, the terms of a trust, or applicable law provides for the payment
1202 of interest or the equivalent of interest to a beneficiary that receives a pecuniary amount outright,
1203 the fiduciary shall make the payment from net income determined under subsection (c) or from
1204 principal to the extent net income is insufficient.
1205 “(e) If a beneficiary is to receive a pecuniary amount outright from a trust after an income
1206 interest ends because of an income beneficiary’s death, and no payment of interest or the
1207 equivalent of interest is provided for by the terms of the trust or applicable law, the fiduciary
52

1208 shall pay the interest or the equivalent of interest to which the beneficiary would be entitled
1209 under applicable law if the pecuniary amount were required to be paid under a will.
1210 “(f) A fiduciary shall distribute net income remaining after payments required by
1211 subsections (d) and (e) in the manner described in § 28-5506.02 to all other beneficiaries,
1212 including a beneficiary that receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the beneficiary holds an
1213 unqualified power to withdraw assets from the trust or other presently exercisable general power
1214 of appointment over the trust.
1215 “(g) A fiduciary may not reduce principal or income receipts from property described in
1216 subsection (b) because of a payment described in § 28-5505.01 or 28-5505.02, to the extent the
1217 decedent’s will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the
1218 payment from assets other than the property or to the extent the fiduciary recovers or expects to
1219 recover the payment from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from the property
1220 must be determined by including the amount the fiduciary receives or pays regarding the
1221 property, whether the amount accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of the
1222 decedent’s death or an income interest’s terminating event, and making a reasonable provision
1223 for an amount the estate or income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is
1224 distributed.
1225 “§ 28-5506.02. Distribution to successor beneficiaries.
1226 “(a) Except to the extent Subchapter 3 applies for a beneficiary that is a trust, each
1227 beneficiary described in § 28-5506.01.(f) is entitled to receive a share of the net income equal to
1228 the beneficiary’s fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the
1229 distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to
1230 which this section applies, each beneficiary, including a beneficiary that does not receive part of
53

1231 the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to a share of the net income the fiduciary
1232 received after the decedent’s death, an income interest’s other terminating event, or the preceding
1233 distribution by the fiduciary.
1234 “(b) In determining a beneficiary’s share of net income under subsection (a), the
1235 following rules apply:
1236 “(1) The beneficiary is entitled to receive a share of the net income equal to the
1237 beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before the
1238 distribution date.
1239 “(2) The beneficiary’s fractional interest under paragraph (1) must be calculated:
1240 “(A) On the aggregate value of the assets as of the distribution date
1241 without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation; and
1242 “(B) Without regard to:
1243 “(i) Property specifically given to a beneficiary under the
1244 decedent’s will or the terms of the trust; and
1245 “(ii) Property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust.
1246 “(3) The distribution date under paragraph (1) may be the date as of which the
1247 fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on which the
1248 assets are distributed.
1249 “(c) To the extent a fiduciary does not distribute under this section all the collected but
1250 undistributed net income to each beneficiary as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain
1251 records showing the interest of each beneficiary in the net income.
1252 “(d) If this section applies to income from an asset, a fiduciary may apply the rules in this
1253 section to net gain or loss realized from the disposition of the asset after the decedent’s death, an
54

1254 income interest’s terminating event, or the preceding distribution by the fiduciary.
1255 “Subchapter 7. Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest
1256 “§ 28-5507.01. When right to income begins and ends.
1257 “(a) An income beneficiary is entitled to net income in accordance with the terms of the
1258 trust from the date an income interest begins. The income interest begins on the date specified in
1259 the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an asset becomes subject to:
1260 “(1) The trust for the current income beneficiary; or
1261 “(2) A successive interest for a successor beneficiary.
1262 “(b) An asset becomes subject to a trust under subsection (a)(1):
1263 “(1) For an asset that is transferred to the trust during the settlor’s life, on the date
1264 the asset is transferred;
1265 “(2) For an asset that becomes subject to the trust because of a decedent’s death,
1266 on the date of the decedent’s death, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the
1267 decedent’s estate; or
1268 “(3) For an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of a
1269 decedent’s death, on the date of the decedent’s death.
1270 “(c) An asset becomes subject to a successive interest under subsection (a)(2) on the day
1271 after the preceding income interest ends, as determined under subsection (d), even if there is an
1272 intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.
1273 “(d) An income interest ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another
1274 terminating event occurs or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary to
1275 which a fiduciary may or must distribute income.
55

1276 “§ 28-5507.02. Apportionment of receipts and disbursements when decedent dies or
1277 income interest begins.
1278 “(a) A fiduciary shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement, other than a receipt to
1279 which § 28-5506.01(b)(1) applies, to principal if its due date occurs before the date on which:
1280 “(1) For an estate, the decedent died; or
1281 “(2) For a trust or successive interest, an income interest begins.
1282 “(b) If the due date of a periodic income receipt or disbursement occurs on or after the
1283 date on which a decedent died or an income interest begins, a fiduciary shall allocate the receipt
1284 or disbursement to income.
1285 “(c) If an income receipt or disbursement is not periodic or has no due date, a fiduciary
1286 shall treat the receipt or disbursement under this section as accruing from day to day. The
1287 fiduciary shall allocate to principal the portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the
1288 date on which a decedent died or an income interest begins, and to income the balance.
1289 “(d) A receipt or disbursement is periodic under subsections (b) and (c) if:
1290 “(1) The receipt or disbursement must be paid at regular intervals under an
1291 obligation to make payments; or
1292 “(2) The payor customarily makes payments at regular intervals.
1293 “(e) An item of income or obligation is due under this section on the date the payor is
1294 required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there is no due date.
1295 “(f) Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which § 28-5504.01
1296 applies are due:
1297 “(1) On the date fixed by or on behalf of the entity for determining the persons
1298 entitled to receive the distribution;
56

1299 “(2) If no date is fixed, on the date of the decision by or on behalf of the entity to
1300 make the distribution; or
1301 “(3) If no date is fixed and the fiduciary does not know the date of the decision by
1302 or on behalf of the entity to make the distribution, on the date the fiduciary learns of the decision.
1303 “§ 28-5507.03. Apportionment when income interest ends.
1304 “(a) In this section, “undistributed income” means net income received on or before the
1305 date on which an income interest ends. The term does not include an item of income or expense
1306 which is due or accrued or net income that has been added or is required to be added to principal
1307 under the terms of the trust.
1308 “(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), when a mandatory income interest of
1309 a beneficiary ends, the fiduciary shall pay the beneficiary’s share of the undistributed income that
1310 is not disposed of under the terms of the trust to the beneficiary or, if the beneficiary does not
1311 survive the date the interest ends, to the beneficiary’s estate.
1312 “(c) If a beneficiary has an unqualified power to withdraw more than 5 percent of the
1313 value of a trust immediately before an income interest ends:
1314 “(1) The fiduciary shall allocate to principal the undistributed income from the
1315 portion of the trust which may be withdrawn; and
1316 “(2) Subsection (b) applies only to the balance of the undistributed income.
1317 “(d) When a fiduciary’s obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value
1318 of assets ends, the fiduciary shall prorate the final payment as required to preserve an income tax,
1319 gift tax, estate tax, or other tax benefit.
57

1320 “Subchapter 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.
1321 “§ 28-5508.01. Uniformity of application and construction.
1322 "In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to
1323 promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
1324 “§ 28-5508.02. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.
1325 “This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and
1326 National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. §7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede
1327 §101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices
1328 described in § 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).
1329 “§ 28-5508.03. Application to trust or estate.
1330 “This chapter applies to a trust or estate existing or created on or after the effective date
1331 of this chapter, except as otherwise expressly provided in the terms of the trust or this chapter.”
1332 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
1333 The Council adopts the attached fiscal impact statement as the fiscal impact statement
1334 required by section 602(c)(3) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
1335 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(3)).
1336 Sec. 4. Effective date
1337 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
1338 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
1339 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
1340 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
1341 Columbia Register.
58

111 N. Wabash Ave.
Uniform Law Commission
Suite 1010
Chicago, IL 60602
NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF COMMISSIONERS ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS (312) 450-6600 tel
(312) 450-6601 fax
www.uniformlaws.org
THE UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
- A Summary -
The Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act (UFIPA), approved by the Uniform Law
Commission in 2018, is an updated version of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (UPIA). For
this latest revision, the title was changed to differentiate the act from its predecessors, and also to
avoid confusion with the closely related Uniform Prudent Investor Act, which shared the UPIA
acronym. The Uniform Principal and Income Act was originally approved by the ULC in 1931
and revised twice in 1962 and 1997. Nearly every state has adopted a version.
Traditionally, beneficiaries of many trusts were either entitled to receive income earned by the
trust investments, or to inherit a share of the trust principal. In this scenario, the trustee’s allocation
of receipts and expenditures to income or principal had a direct effect on the beneficial interests.
The UPIA provided a set of accounting rules to guide trustees in making these allocations.
In the last few decades, the historical distinction between income and principal has become less
important for two reasons. First, the development of modern portfolio theory allows trustees to
invest for the maximum total return, whether the return is in the form of income or growth of
principal. Second, modern trusts are often drafted with more flexible terms giving trustees
discretion to accumulate income or invade principal when advantageous to further the purposes of
the trust. UFIPA recognizes these developments and gives trustees additional flexibility to
administer discretionary trusts.
The 1997 UPIA did not include provisions for converting a traditional trust into a “unitrust” to
allow for total-return investing. At the time the tax treatment of unitrusts was uncertain, so the
drafters instead added a section allowing a trustee to adjust between income and principal as
necessary. This created an administrative burden for trustees that could be avoided with a unitrust.
Then in 2003 the Internal Revenue Service published regulations respecting unitrust conversions
under certain conditions if authorized under state law. Once federally sanctioned, over thirty states
amended their UPIA statutes to allow unitrust conversions in some form, but these statutes are not
uniform and often overly restrictive.
Article 3 of UFIPA contains flexible and innovative unitrust provisions that improve upon current
state laws. Trustees can establish a unitrust policy with a variable or adjustable rate of return based
on market conditions or on the needs of individual beneficiaries. A proposed unitrust policy must
be disclosed in advance to beneficiaries who may consent or object. Restrictions apply when the
trust qualifies for certain tax benefits to ensure compliance with federal regulations.
UFIPA Section 104 provides a new default rule on governing law. The law of the situs of the trust
will apply, unless the terms of the trust specify a different jurisdiction. This rule is consistent with
other uniform trust and estate acts and will help prevent multi-state disputes.
The Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act is a modern, flexible statute that should be
considered by every state. For further information about UFIPA, please contact ULC Chief
Counsel Benjamin Orzeske at (312) 450-6621 or borzeske@uniformlaws.org.
The ULC is a nonprofit formed in 1892 to create nonpartisan state legislation. Over 350 volunteer commissioners—lawyers,
judges, law professors, legislative staff, and others—work together to draft laws ranging from the Uniform Commercial Code to
acts on property, trusts and estates, family law, criminal law and other areas where uniformity of state law is desirable.

111 N. Wabash Ave.
Uniform Law Commission
Suite 1010
Chicago, IL 60602
NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF COMMISSIONERS ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS (312) 450-6600 tel
(312) 450-6601 fax
www.uniformlaws.org
WHY YOUR STATE SHOULD ADOPT THE
UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
The Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act (UFIPA) provides enhanced, more flexible
accounting rules for modern trusts. Current trends in estate planning allow for very long-term trusts
that give trustees broad discretion to adapt to future events. UFIPA recognizes these trends and
updates the law accordingly.
• UFIPA allows total-return investing. Modern portfolio theory advocates investing for the
greatest possible total return, regardless of whether the return is in the form of income or growth
of principal. Outdated laws make this more difficult because of historic legal distinctions
between income and principal. UFIPA updates the law and allows trustees to invest for the
greatest possible return.
• UFIPA contains flexible and innovative unitrust rules. The development of modern portfolio
theory popularized the use of unitrusts – an easy-to-administer form of trust that helps maximize
investment returns and minimize administrative expenses. UFIPA provides the first uniform
rules for converting older trusts into unitrusts, with more flexibility than any current state statute
but still in accordance with federal tax regulations.
• UFIPA allows for individualized estate planning. Under UFIPA’s flexible rules for trust
administration, creative estate planners can tailor the terms of a trust to fit each client’s current
needs and allow adaptation for unforeseen future events.
• UFIPA clarifies which state’s law applies. UFIPA includes a default rule stating the law
governing a trust is the law of the state where the trustee has its principal place of administration.
This rule conforms to current practice and will help ensure courts apply the correct law and
prevent multi-state jurisdictional disputes.
• UFIPA modernizes the law of trusts. Nearly every state has adopted a version of the Uniform
Principal and Income Act, parts of which date to 1931. UFIPA is an updated version of this
uniform law with a new name to differentiate it from its predecessors. Each state should replace
its existing law with this latest version appropriate for the twenty-first century.
For further information about UFIPA, please contact ULC Chief Counsel Benjamin Orzeske at (312)
450-6621 or borzeske@uniformlaws.org.
The ULC is a nonprofit formed in 1892 to create nonpartisan state legislation. Over 350 volunteer commissioners—lawyers,
judges, law professors, legislative staff, and others—work together to draft laws ranging from the Uniform Commercial Code to
acts on property, trusts and estates, family law, criminal law and other areas where uniformity of state law is desirable.

UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
drafted by the
NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF COMMISSIONERS
ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS
and by it
APPROVED AND RECOMMENDED FOR ENACTMENT
IN ALL THE STATES
at its
ANNUAL CONFERENCE
MEETING IN ITS ONE-HUNDRED-AND-TWENTY-SEVENTH YEAR
LOUISVILLE, KENTUCKY
JULY 20 - JULY 26, 2018
WITH PREFATORY NOTE AND COMMENTS
Copyright © 2018
By
NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF COMMISSIONERS
ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS
January 25, 2019

ABOUT ULC
The Uniform Law Commission (ULC), also known as National Conference of Commissioners
on Uniform State Laws (NCCUSL), now in its 127th year, provides states with non-partisan,
well-conceived and well-drafted legislation that brings clarity and stability to critical areas of
state statutory law.
ULC members must be lawyers, qualified to practice law. They are practicing lawyers, judges,
legislators and legislative staff and law professors, who have been appointed by state
governments as well as the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands to
research, draft and promote enactment of uniform state laws in areas of state law where
uniformity is desirable and practical.
• ULC strengthens the federal system by providing rules and procedures that are consistent from
state to state but that also reflect the diverse experience of the states.
• ULC statutes are representative of state experience, because the organization is made up of
representatives from each state, appointed by state government.
• ULC keeps state law up-to-date by addressing important and timely legal issues.
• ULC’s efforts reduce the need for individuals and businesses to deal with different laws as
they move and do business in different states.
• ULC’s work facilitates economic development and provides a legal platform for foreign
entities to deal with U.S. citizens and businesses.
• Uniform Law Commissioners donate thousands of hours of their time and legal and drafting
expertise every year as a public service, and receive no salary or compensation for their work.
• ULC’s deliberative and uniquely open drafting process draws on the expertise of
commissioners, but also utilizes input from legal experts, and advisors and observers
representing the views of other legal organizations or interests that will be subject to the
proposed laws.
• ULC is a state-supported organization that represents true value for the states, providing
services that most states could not otherwise afford or duplicate.

DRAFTING COMMITTEE ON UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME
AND PRINCIPAL ACT
The Committee appointed by and representing the National Conference of Commissioners on
Uniform State Laws in preparing this Act consists of the following individuals:
TURNEY P. BERRY, 500 W. Jefferson St., Suite 2800, Louisville, KY 40202, Chair
DAVID J. CLARK, 353 Bel Marin Keys Blvd., Suite 9, Novato, CA 94949, Vice Chair
MARY M. ACKERLY, 782 Bantam Rd., P.O. Box 815, Bantam, CT 06750-0815
JAMES W. DODGE, Legislative Reference Bureau, 112 State House, Springfield, IL 62706
DAVID M. ENGLISH, University of Missouri-Columbia School of Law, 203 Hulston Hall,
Columbia, MO 65211
MARC S. FEINSTEIN, 431 N. Phillips Ave., Suite 301, Sioux Falls, SD 57104
BARRY C. HAWKINS, 300 Atlantic St., Stamford, CT 06901
JOHN H. LANGBEIN, Yale Law School, P.O. Box 208215, New Haven, CT 06520-8215
BRADLEY MYERS, University of North Dakota, 215 Centennial Dr., Stop 9003, Room 201
Grand Forks, ND 58202-9003
SUSAN D. SNYDER, 50 S. La Salle St., MB-09, Chicago, IL 60603
JAMES P. SPICA, 500 Woodward Ave., Suite 4000, Detroit, MI 48226-5403
LOUISE ELLEN TEITZ, Roger Williams University School of Law, 10 Metacom Ave., Bristol,
RI 02809-5103
CHARLES A. TROST, Nashville City Center, 511 Union St., Suite 2700, Nashville, TN 37219-
1760
RONALD D. AUCUTT, 1750 Tysons Boulevard, Suite 1800, Tysons, VA 22102-4215, Reporter
AMERICAN BAR ASSOCIATION ADVISORS
WILLIAM P. LAPIANA, New York Law School, 185 W. Broadway, New York, NY 10013,
ABA Advisor
PAUL S. LEE, 38 E. 85th St., New York, NY 10028-0969, ABA Section Advisor
EX OFFICIO
ANITA RAMASASTRY, University of Washington School of Law, William H. Gates Hall, Box
353020, Seattle, WA 98195-3020, President
MARY M. ACKERLY, 782 Bantam Rd., P.O. Box 815, Bantam, CT 06750-0815, Division Chair
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
LIZA KARSAI, 111 N. Wabash Ave., Suite 1010, Chicago, IL 60602, Executive Director
Copies of this Act may be obtained from:
NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF COMMISSIONERS
ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS
111 N. Wabash Ave., Suite 1010
Chicago, Illinois 60602
(312) 450-6600
www.uniformlaws.org

UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PREFATORY NOTE....................................................................................................................... 1
[ARTICLE] 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 101. SHORT TITLE ..................................................................................................... 4
SECTION 102. DEFINITIONS...................................................................................................... 4
SECTION 103. SCOPE. ............................................................................................................... 14
SECTION 104. GOVERNING LAW........................................................................................... 14
[ARTICLE] 2
FIDUCIARY DUTIES AND JUDICIAL REVIEW
SECTION 201. FIDUCIARY DUTIES; GENERAL PRINCIPLES ........................................... 15
SECTION 202. JUDICIAL REVIEW OF EXERCISE OF DISCRETIONARY POWER[;
REQUEST FOR INSTRUCTION]................................................................................... 18
SECTION 203. FIDUCIARY’S POWER TO ADJUST .............................................................. 21
[ARTICLE] 3
UNITRUST
SECTION 301. DEFINITIONS.................................................................................................... 28
SECTION 302. APPLICATION; DUTIES AND REMEDIES. .................................................. 32
SECTION 303. AUTHORITY OF FIDUCIARY. ....................................................................... 34
SECTION 304. NOTICE. ............................................................................................................. 37
SECTION 305. UNITRUST POLICY. ........................................................................................ 41
SECTION 306. UNITRUST RATE. ............................................................................................ 42
SECTION 307. APPLICABLE VALUE...................................................................................... 43
SECTION 308. PERIOD. ............................................................................................................. 45
SECTION 309. SPECIAL TAX BENEFITS; OTHER RULES. ................................................. 46

[ARTICLE] 4
ALLOCATION OF RECEIPTS
[PART] 1
RECEIPTS FROM ENTITY
SECTION 401. CHARACTER OF RECEIPTS FROM ENTITY ............................................... 47
SECTION 402. DISTRIBUTION FROM TRUST OR ESTATE ................................................ 54
SECTION 403. BUSINESS OR OTHER ACTIVITY CONDUCTED BY FIDUCIARY .......... 54
[PART] 2
RECEIPTS NOT NORMALLY APPORTIONED
SECTION 404. PRINCIPAL RECEIPTS..................................................................................... 57
SECTION 405. RENTAL PROPERTY ....................................................................................... 58
SECTION 406. RECEIPT ON OBLIGATION TO BE PAID IN MONEY ................................ 59
SECTION 407. INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT ......................................................... 59
[PART] 3
RECEIPTS NORMALLY APPORTIONED
SECTION 408. INSUBSTANTIAL ALLOCATION NOT REQUIRED.................................... 60
SECTION 409. DEFERRED COMPENSATION, ANNUITY, OR SIMILAR PAYMENT ...... 61
SECTION 410. LIQUIDATING ASSET ..................................................................................... 65
SECTION 411. MINERALS, WATER, AND OTHER NATURAL RESOURCES................... 66
SECTION 412. TIMBER.............................................................................................................. 68
SECTION 413. MARITAL DEDUCTION PROPERTY NOT PRODUCTIVE OF INCOME .. 70
SECTION 414. DERIVATIVE OR OPTION .............................................................................. 70
SECTION 415. ASSET-BACKED SECURITY .......................................................................... 73
SECTION 416. OTHER FINANCIAL INSTRUMENT OR ARRANGEMENT........................ 74
[ARTICLE] 5
ALLOCATION OF DISBURSEMENTS
SECTION 501. DISBURSEMENT FROM INCOME................................................................. 74
SECTION 502. DISBURSEMENT FROM PRINCIPAL ............................................................ 75
SECTION 503. TRANSFER FROM INCOME TO PRINCIPAL FOR DEPRECIATION ........ 77
SECTION 504. REIMBURSEMENT OF INCOME FROM PRINCIPAL.................................. 78

SECTION 505. REIMBURSEMENT OF PRINCIPAL FROM INCOME.................................. 79
SECTION 506. INCOME TAXES ............................................................................................... 80
SECTION 507. ADJUSTMENT BETWEEN INCOME AND PRINCIPAL BECAUSE OF
TAXES.............................................................................................................................. 82
[ARTICLE] 6
DEATH OF INDIVIDUAL OR TERMINATION OF INCOME INTEREST
SECTION 601. DETERMINATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF NET INCOME ..................... 85
SECTION 602. DISTRIBUTION TO SUCCESSOR BENEFICIARY ....................................... 89
[ARTICLE] 7
APPORTIONMENT AT BEGINNING AND END OF INCOME INTEREST
SECTION 701. WHEN RIGHT TO INCOME BEGINS AND ENDS........................................ 91
SECTION 702. APPORTIONMENT OF RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS WHEN
DECEDENT DIES OR INCOME INTEREST BEGINS................................................. 93
SECTION 703. APPORTIONMENT WHEN INCOME INTEREST ENDS.............................. 94
[ARTICLE] 8
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
SECTION 801. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION......................... 96
SECTION 802. RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND
NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT ..................................................................................... 96
SECTION 803. APPLICATION TO TRUST OR ESTATE ........................................................ 96
[SECTION 804. SEVERABILITY.] ............................................................................................ 96
SECTION 805. REPEALS; CONFORMING AMENDMENTS ................................................. 96
SECTION 806. EFFECTIVE DATE............................................................................................ 97

UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
PREFATORY NOTE
The Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act (2018) is an update of the Revised
Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997). Like the 1997 Act, it adapts to changes in the design
and use of trusts. Highlights include an expansion of the use of the power to adjust between
income and principal in Section 203, the addition of provisions for unitrusts in Article 3, and a
simplifying change in governing law for purposes of distinguishing income and principal in
Section 104.
Changes in the Design and Use of Trusts
The 2018 Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act, like previous revisions of the
Uniform Principal and Income Act, is intended to reflect and address changes in the design and
use of modern trusts. Very long-term trusts are more common, as are totally discretionary trusts –
that is, trusts in which income, as well as principal, is distributable to beneficiaries during the
term of the trust not as a matter of right but solely in the discretion of the trustee. Even where
income distributions are mandatory, including occasions where income distributions are
mandated by requirements of tax law (such as the estate tax marital deduction), discretion in the
trustee to supplement income distributions by invasions of principal is common.
One result of these developments in the design, use, and role of trusts is to make
historical distinctions between income and principal less important as a technical matter in some
cases. Discretionary accumulation of income has the effect of treating income as principal to the
extent of the accumulation. And discretionary invasion of principal has the effect of treating
principal as income to the extent of the invasion. Even so, the difference between income and
principal is important to impartial trustees and beneficiaries alike. The 2018 Act retains the
historical distinctions, including the historical technical rules that have evolved through changing
legal and practical environments, while still allowing skilled and dedicated trustees to respond to
legal and practical environments that inevitably will continue to change.
The basic premise of the current revision is that a trustee that is aware of the current
practical environment of trust administration and sensitive to the evolving demands of
impartiality should be able to determine standards for adjusting between income and principal
that are reasonable in the circumstances, and to update those standards from time to time.
Authority to make adjustments between income and principal from year to year, introduced as
Section 104 in the 1997 Act, is retained, and indeed significantly expanded, as Section 203 in the
2018 Act. The most important way in which the authority to adjust is expanded is by eliminating
the precondition that trust distributions are constricted by the concept of “income” in a way that
economic results from year to year could arbitrarily affect. In other words, while the trustee of a
more modern trust with greater, if not total, flexibility to make distributions from income and/or
principal would actually have been denied the flexibility intended by former Section 104, new
Section 203 ensures that designing a trust for greater flexibility will not ironically sacrifice the
flexibility of adjustments.
1

That means that the technical structure of the 2018 Act exhibits a certain amount of
apparent redundancy. A trustee that could cope with the constraints of income and principal rules
by merely accumulating income or invading principal now is given the alternative of making an
adjustment under Section 203 instead, either from year to year, as under former Section 104, or
for more than one year, under these expanded rules.
The 2018 Act respects, and permits a trustee to respect, the simple notion of “income.”
Under Section 203, a trustee of a discretionary trust can make adjustments, taking into account a
nonexclusive list of factors provided in Section 201(e), and still achieve the comfortable outcome
of “distributing income.” And if the interests of beneficiaries under the terms of the trust are still
not appropriately served within the framework of “distributing income” – that is, when no
reasonable adjustment would serve those interests, or when non-pro rata distributions are
justified – then invasions of principal are still appropriate to the extent consistent with the terms
of the trust.
The more traditional rules for allocating income and principal are retained, with updates,
in Articles 4 through 7. The general substantive rules are in Articles 4 and 5, and the special
temporal rules relating to the beginning and end of interests are moved from Articles 2 and 3 in
the 1997 Act to Articles 6 and 7 in the 2018 Act, thus placing the substantive rules that are
applicable on an ongoing basis ahead of the temporal rules that are applicable only at certain
times. One useful result of these changes is that the former rules of Sections 401 through 415 and
501 through 503, with which many fiduciaries no doubt have considerable experience, are
retained in the 2018 Act with the same section numbers.
Article 3 adds the authority for a trustee to convert to or from a unitrust or change a
unitrust. But the tax-sensitive limitations typically included in unitrust statutes, such as the
limitation of the unitrust rate to a rate from 3 to 5 percent, are now provided only for trusts that
are intended to qualify for tax benefits for the protection of which those limitations are needed.
The new unitrust rules are discussed further in the Comments in Article 3.
Expansion Beyond Trusts and Estates
Previous Uniform Principal and Income Acts explicitly addressed only trusts and estates,
even though they reflected principles that would apply in other contexts where the benefits of
property are shared by successive legal or beneficial ownership interests. While those contexts
do not necessarily present allocation issues that require the application of specific statutory rules
on a regular basis, Section 103(2) of the 2018 Act fills a potential gap by making the act
explicitly applicable to “a life estate or other term interest in which the interest of one or more
persons will be succeeded by the interest of one or more other persons.”
Governing Law
New Section 104 clarifies that the income and principal rules of the state that is the
principal place of administration of the trust from time to time will be the governing law.
A “rule of construction” is typically governed by the law of the place where the trust was
created or deemed created. A “rule of administration” is typically governed by the law of the
situs of the trust from time to time, often with appropriate savings provisions for tax benefits, etc.
2

if the situs is changed. Authorities seem to be divided, however, on which historical category
includes an income and principal act. See Restatement (Second) of Conflict of Laws § 268,
comment h (1971):
The question of the allocation of receipts and expenditures to principal or income
presents a different problem. See Restatement (Second) of Trusts, §§ 232-241 (1959). If a
testator creates a trust to be administered in a state other than that of his domicil, the
question is whether the allocation, as for instance of extraordinary dividends, is to be
determined by the local law of his domicil or the local law of the place of administration.
This could conceivably be treated as a question of administration and governed by the
local law of the place of administration. On the other hand, it can be treated as a question
of the distribution of the trust property and governed by the local law of the testator’s
domicil. For the purposes of the choice of the applicable law, it is generally held that it is
a question of construction and that the local law of the testator’s domicil is applicable.
Despite the fact that income and principal allocations often do determine who gets what
and therefore are rules of construction, treating those allocations as governed by the place of
current administration seems to be the most workable approach and seems to be contemplated,
for example, by the change-of-situs examples in the 2003 amendments to the GST tax
regulations (Treasury Reg. §26.2601-1(b)(4)(i)(E), Examples 11 & 12). Perhaps the biggest
burden of a rule of construction is determining the governing law not only where the trust was
originally created but also when the trust was originally created, a burden that gets greater as
longer-term trusts become more common and existing trusts therefore become older. Previous
Uniform Principal and Income Acts did not include a governing law provision. New Section 104
of the 2018 Act specifies that the Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act, like a rule of
administration, is governed by the law of the situs, or principal place of administration, of the
trust, which is not necessarily the place where all or most or any of the trust assets are located.
Section 104 is consistent with Sections 107 and 108 of the Uniform Trust Code and
Section 3 of the Uniform Directed Trust Act. Like those acts, the rule of Section 104 may be
superseded by a provision in the terms of the trust.
3

UNIFORM FIDUCIARY INCOME AND PRINCIPAL ACT
[ARTICLE] 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 101. SHORT TITLE. This [act] may be cited as the Uniform Fiduciary
Income and Principal Act.
Comment
Name. The change in the name of this Uniform Act has three purposes and effects.
First, this name will distinguish the 2018 Act from its 1931, 1962, and 1997 predecessors
and support an acronym that will not be confused with the Uniform Prudent Investor Act, which
was closely associated with the 1997 Revised Uniform Principal and Income Act.
Second, by using the word “Fiduciary,” the name emphasizes that the distinctions
between income and principal are most likely to be relevant in the context of trusts and
decedents’ estates, especially trusts that continue for a long time, perpetually in the case of some
modern trusts. Such trusts present a greater possibility of competing interests between those
entitled to income currently and those who may be entitled to income and/or principal – that is,
entitled to “what’s left” – after the current interests terminate by death or otherwise. The act also
applies to term relationships other than just trusts and decedents’ estates, such as legal life
estates, which may share the long-term character and need for balancing of successive interests
that is most commonly associated with trusts. But the primary applications of the act will
generally be in contexts marked by the role of a fiduciary.
Third, placing income first in the name emphasizes the fact that principal may be “what’s
left” after income is paid out. After income is paid out it is gone and normally cannot be
retrieved (although prior over-distributions can sometimes be taken into account in determining
the amount of future distributions). This continues the practice of previous acts of favoring
principal where there is uncertainty.
SECTION 102. DEFINITIONS. In this [act]:
(1) “Accounting period” means a calendar year, unless a fiduciary selects another period
of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months. The term includes a part of a
calendar year or another period of 12 calendar months or approximately 12 calendar months
which begins when an income interest begins or ends when an income interest ends.
(2) “Asset-backed security” means a security that is serviced primarily by the cash flows
4

of a discrete pool of fixed or revolving receivables or other financial assets that by their terms
convert into cash within a finite time. The term includes rights or other assets that ensure the
servicing or timely distribution of proceeds to the holder of the asset-backed security. The term
does not include an asset to which Section 401, 409, or 414 applies.
(3) “Beneficiary” includes:
(A) for a trust:
(i) a current beneficiary, including a current income beneficiary and a
beneficiary that may receive only principal;
(ii) a remainder beneficiary; and
(iii) any other successor beneficiary;
(B) for an estate, an heir[, legatee,] and devisee; and
(C) for a life estate or term interest, a person that holds a life estate, term interest,
or remainder or other interest following a life estate or term interest.
(4) “Court” means [the court in this state having jurisdiction relating to a trust, estate, or
life estate or other term interest described in Section 103(2)].
(5) “Current income beneficiary” means a beneficiary to which a fiduciary may distribute
net income, whether or not the fiduciary also may distribute principal to the beneficiary.
(6) “Distribution” means a payment or transfer by a fiduciary to a beneficiary in the
beneficiary’s capacity as a beneficiary, made under the terms of the trust, without consideration
other than the beneficiary’s right to receive the payment or transfer under the terms of the trust.
“Distribute”, “distributed”, and “distributee” have corresponding meanings.
(7) “Estate” means a decedent’s estate. The term includes the property of the decedent as
the estate is originally constituted and the property of the estate as it exists at any time during
5

administration.
(8) “Fiduciary” includes a trustee,[ trust director determined under [Section 2(9) of the
Uniform Directed Trust Act,]] personal representative, life tenant, holder of a term interest, and
person acting under a delegation from a fiduciary. The term includes a person that holds property
for a successor beneficiary whose interest may be affected by an allocation of receipts and
expenditures between income and principal. If there are two or more co-fiduciaries, the term
includes all co-fiduciaries acting under the terms of the trust and applicable law.
(9) “Income” means money or other property a fiduciary receives as current return from
principal. The term includes a part of receipts from a sale, exchange, or liquidation of a principal
asset, to the extent provided in [Article] 4.
(10) “Income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to receive all or
part of net income, whether the terms of the trust require the net income to be distributed or
authorize the net income to be distributed in the fiduciary’s discretion. The term includes the
right of a current beneficiary to use property held by a fiduciary.
(11) “Independent person” means a person that is not:
(A) for a trust:
(i) [a qualified beneficiary determined under [Uniform Trust Code Section
103(13)]][a beneficiary that is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal
or would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if either the trust
or the interests of the distributees or permissible distributees of trust income or principal were
terminated, assuming no power of appointment is exercised];
(ii) a settlor of the trust; or
(iii) an individual whose legal obligation to support a beneficiary may be
6

satisfied by a distribution from the trust;
(B) for an estate, a beneficiary;
(C) a spouse, parent, brother, sister, or issue of an individual described in
subparagraph (A) or (B);
(D) a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other entity in which
persons described in subparagraphs (A) through (C), in the aggregate, have voting control; or
(E) an employee of a person described in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D).
(12) “Mandatory income interest” means the right of a current income beneficiary to
receive net income that the terms of the trust require the fiduciary to distribute.
(13) “Net income” means the total allocations during an accounting period to income
under the terms of a trust and this [act] minus the disbursements during the period, other than
distributions, allocated to income under the terms of the trust and this [act]. To the extent the
trust is a unitrust under [Article] 3, the term means the unitrust amount determined under
[Article] 3. The term includes an adjustment from principal to income under Section 203. The
term does not include an adjustment from income to principal under Section 203.
(14) “Person” means an individual, estate, trust, business or nonprofit entity, public
corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal
entity.
(15) “Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal
representative, special administrator, or person that performs substantially the same function with
respect to an estate under the law governing the person’s status.
(16) “Principal” means property held in trust for distribution to, production of income for,
or use by a current or successor beneficiary.
7

(17) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored
in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
(18) “Settlor” means a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes property to
a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, the term includes each
person, to the extent of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution, except to the
extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.
(19) “Special tax benefit” means:
(A) exclusion of a transfer to a trust from gifts described in Section 2503(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2503(b)[, as amended,]
because of the qualification of an income interest in the trust as a present interest in property;
(B) status as a qualified subchapter S trust described in Section 1361(d)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 1361(d)(3)[, as amended,] at a
time the trust holds stock of an S corporation described in Section 1361(a)(1) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 1361(a)(1)[, as amended];
(C) an estate or gift tax marital deduction for a transfer to a trust under Section
2056 or 2523 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2056 or
2523[, as amended,] which depends or depended in whole or in part on the right of the settlor’s
spouse to receive the net income of the trust;
(D) exemption in whole or in part of a trust from the federal generation-skipping
transfer tax imposed by Section 2601 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26
U.S.C. Section 2601[, as amended,] because the trust was irrevocable on September 25, 1985, if
there is any possibility that:
(i) a taxable distribution, as defined in Section 2612(b) of the Internal
8

Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(b)[, as amended], could be made
from the trust; or
(ii) a taxable termination, as defined in Section 2612(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(a)[, as amended], could occur
with respect to the trust; or
(E) an inclusion ratio, as defined in Section 2642(a) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2642(a)[, as amended], of the trust which is less than
one, if there is any possibility that:
(i) a taxable distribution, as defined in Section 2612(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(b)[, as amended], could be made
from the trust; or
(ii) a taxable termination, as defined in Section 2612(a) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2612(a)[, as amended], could occur
with respect to the trust.
(20) “Successive interest” means the interest of a successor beneficiary.
(21) “Successor beneficiary” means a person entitled to receive income or principal or to
use property when an income interest or other current interest ends.
(22) “Terms of a trust” means:
(A) except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B), the manifestation of the
settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as:
(i) expressed in the trust instrument; or
(ii) established by other evidence that would be admissible in a judicial
proceeding;
9

(B) the trust’s provisions as established, determined, or amended by:
(i) a trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law; [or]
(ii) court order[; or
(iii) a nonjudicial settlement agreement under [Uniform Trust Code
Section 111]];
(C) for an estate, a will; or
(D) for a life estate or term interest, the corresponding manifestation of the rights
of the beneficiaries.
(23) “Trust”:
(A) includes:
(i) an express trust, private or charitable, with additions to the trust,
wherever and however created; and
(ii) a trust created or determined by judgment or decree under which the
trust is to be administered in the manner of an express trust; and
(B) does not include:
(i) a constructive trust;
(ii) a resulting trust, conservatorship, guardianship, multi-party account,
custodial arrangement for a minor, business trust, voting trust, security arrangement, liquidation
trust, or trust for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest, salaries, wages, profits,
pensions, retirement benefits, or employee benefits of any kind; or
(iii) an arrangement under which a person is a nominee, escrowee, or
agent for another.
(24) “Trustee” means a person, other than a personal representative, that owns or holds
10

property for the benefit of a beneficiary. The term includes an original, additional, or successor
trustee, whether or not appointed or confirmed by a court.
(25) “Will” means any testamentary instrument recognized by applicable law which
makes a legally effective disposition of an individual’s property, effective at the individual’s
death. The term includes a codicil or other amendment to a testamentary instrument.
Legislative Note: Revise paragraph (4) as necessary to refer to the appropriate court having
jurisdiction over the matters listed.
In paragraph (8), refer to Uniform Directed Trust Act Section 2(9), or modify paragraph (8)
appropriately if the state has not enacted the Uniform Directed Trust Act.
In paragraph (11)(A)(i), refer to Uniform Trust Code Section 103(13), or modify paragraph
(11)(A)(i) appropriately if the state has not enacted the Uniform Trust Code.
A state that has enacted Uniform Trust Code Section 103(15) and (20) may replace paragraphs
(18) and (24) with cross-references to those provisions.
A United States Code citation (U.S.C.) follows a reference to the federal Internal Revenue Code
in paragraph (19). The United States Code citation is included as an aid to the reader. If the
state’s convention is to omit the United States Code citation, simply delete the United States
Code citation. In states in which the constitution, or other law, does not permit the phrase “as
amended” when federal statutes are incorporated into state law, the phrase should be omitted
from paragraph (19).
A state that has enacted Uniform Trust Code (Last Revised or Amended in 2010) Section
103(18), defining “terms of a trust”, or the Uniform Trust Decanting Act (2015) Section 2(28),
defining “terms of the trust”, should update those definitions to conform to paragraph (22)(A)
and (B). A state that has not enacted Uniform Trust Code Section 111 should replace the
bracketed language of paragraph (22)(B)(iii) with a cross reference to the state’s statute
governing nonjudicial settlement or should omit paragraph (22)(B)(iii) if the state does not have
such a statute.
Comment
“Accounting period.” The 2018 Act adds the option of using an accounting period of
“approximately 12 calendar months.” This clarifies that a 52-53-week fiscal year contemplated,
for example, by section 441(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any other reasonable
fiscal year, is not precluded.
“Beneficiary.” The 2018 Act expands the definition to include life estate-remainder
relationships, as provided in the broader scope of the act set forth in Section 103. The definition
is adapted to the context of income and principal allocations.
11

“Court.” The 2018 Act defines “court,” to simplify references throughout the act. The
definition is drawn from Section 2(8) of the Uniform Trust Decanting Act and conformed to the
broader scope in Section 103 of this act.
“Current income beneficiary,” “income interest,” and “mandatory income interest.”
The 2018 Act adds these definitions because of their relevance to the temporal distinctions
between income and principal. There are no definitions for “discretionary income beneficiary” or
“discretionary income interest” because those terms are not used in the act.
“Distribution,” “distribute,” “distributed,” and “distributee.” The 2018 Act adds this
definition, which clarifies that these words are used in the limited sense of a payment or transfer
to a beneficiary only in the beneficiary’s capacity as beneficiary with respect to that beneficiary’s
interest in the trust. For example, these words do not include compensation paid to a beneficiary
who is also a fiduciary or employee, rent paid to a beneficiary who leases property to a trust, or
interest paid to a beneficiary who has made a loan or installment sale to a trust.
“Fiduciary.” The 2018 Act expands this definition to conform to the broader scope in
Section 103. The definition makes it clear that the singular “fiduciary” will be used throughout
the act even when two or more fiduciaries are serving together at the same time. To refer to one
or more but not all of the fiduciaries serving at the same time that are authorized to exercise the
power to adjust under Section 203 or disregard insubstantial allocations under Section 408 when
one or more of the other then-serving fiduciaries are not authorized to do so, Sections 203 and
408 use the variations “co-fiduciary” and “co-fiduciaries”. The term “fiduciary” does not refer to
successor fiduciaries or potential successor fiduciaries that are not then serving.
“Independent person.” The 2018 Act adds a definition of an “independent person,”
which is used is Sections 203(e)(7), 309(b), and 501(2) with reference to fiduciaries to limit
certain fiduciary discretionary powers to independent fiduciaries. Because an important reason
for these limitations is to protect against unwelcome tax consequences, the definition in large
part reflects, in the negative, the definition of a “related or subordinate party” in section 672(c) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, which is incorporated by some tax rules, some safe harbors
acknowledged by the IRS, and some conventions of document drafting. A limited liability
company is added to subparagraph (D). Otherwise, subparagraphs (B) through (E) track section
672(c) as closely as feasible. For example, subparagraph (D) refers simply to “voting control”
rather than the more subjective “significant from the viewpoint of voting control” used in section
672(c)(2), and subparagraph (E) refers simply to “an employee” rather than the more subjective
“subordinate employee” used in reference to a corporation in section 672(c)(2). Subparagraph
(C) refers to a “spouse,” as does section 672(c)(1); in view of the evolution of the law in this
area, no reference has been included to “domestic partners” or similar terms. Although this
definition largely tracks the definition of a “related or subordinate party” in section 672(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, its purposes in the act are broader than the protection of tax
benefits, and it therefore is broader than section 672(c) in some respects.
“Net income.” “Net income” continues to be the term generally used in the 2018 Act to
refer to what a current beneficiary must or may receive. This use is flexible enough to cover, for
example, even a trust, or a special circumstance related to a trust, that requires or permits
distributions of gross income, because “net income” is gross income (expressed as “the total
12

allocations during an accounting period to income under the terms of a trust and this [act]”)
“minus the disbursements during the period, other than distributions, allocated to income under
the terms of the trust and this [act].” To the extent the terms of a trust require or permit the
distribution of gross income, there will necessarily be no “disbursements … allocated to income”
– all such disbursement will necessarily be allocated to principal – and thus the definition will
work even in that unusual case. In addition, the 2018 Act expands this definition to explicitly
provide that in a unitrust, now provided for in new Article 3, “net income” is the unitrust amount,
without deduction for any disbursements.
“Record.” This addition in the 2018 Act is copied from Section 2(22) of the Uniform
Trust Decanting Act.
“Settlor.” The 2018 Act adds a definition of “settlor” adapted from Section 103(15) of
the Uniform Trust Code and Section 2(6) of the recent Uniform Directed Trust Act. It includes a
“testator.” Because of this definition, there is generally no reason to add words like “testator,”
“donor,” or “transferor” throughout this act.
“Special tax benefit.” In exercising various forms of fiduciary discretion under the 2018
Act, there are certain federal tax benefits that it is important to preserve and certain adverse
federal tax consequences that it is important to avoid. (Section 104(c) of the 1997 Act served that
purpose with respect to the power to adjust between income and principal.) There are four kinds
of “special tax benefit” that it is important to preserve under the 2018 Act that are defined in
Section 102(19). One is the qualification of an income interest in a trust for the annual exclusion
from taxable gifts because the income interest is a “present interest” in property under Treasury
Reg. §25.2503-3(b) and therefore is not a “future interest in property” referred to in section
2503(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (subparagraph (A) of this act). Another is the
eligibility of a trust to hold stock of an S corporation under section 1361 as a “qualified
subchapter S trust” (QSST) under section 1361(d) of the Code if all of the income is distributed
to one citizen or resident of the United States under section 1361(d)(3)(B) of the Code
(subparagraph (B)). Another is the eligibility of a transfer to a trust for an estate or gift tax
marital deduction because the settlor’s spouse is entitled to all the net income of the trust under
section 2056(b)(5) or (7)(B)(i)(II) or 2523(e) or (f)(2)(B) of the Code (subparagraph (C)).
Finally, there is the total or partial exemption of a trust from generation-skipping transfer tax
(GST tax) either under section 1433(b)(2)(A) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-
514) because the trust was irrevocable on September 25, 1985 (subparagraph (D)) or under
section 2642(a)(2)(A) of the Code because GST exemption was allocated to the trust
(subparagraph (E)). This definition of a “special tax benefit” is used to determine limits on the
power to adjust between income and principal under Section 203(e)(1) and the new power to
convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust under Section 309(b).
“Successor beneficiary.” This term is used in the 2018 Act rather than “remainder
beneficiary,” the term in the 1997 Act, in recognition of the fact that modern trusts often last
longer than the life of a single income beneficiary, and therefore the beneficiaries whose future
interests are most often in need of balance and protection are beneficiaries who continue as
income beneficiaries, not who succeed to the “remainder” interest as if the trust terminates. The
term “successor beneficiary” includes remainder beneficiaries.
13

“Terms of a trust.” The definition of “terms of a trust” in the 2018 Act is conformed to
Section 2(8) of the Uniform Directed Trust Act, which is similar to Section 2(28) of the Uniform
Trust Decanting Act and Section 103(18) of the Uniform Trust Code. This replaces Section
102(12) of the 1997 Act, which reads: “‘Terms of a trust’ means the manifestation of the intent of
a settlor or decedent with respect to a trust, expressed in a manner that admits of its proof in a
judicial proceeding, whether by written or spoken words or by conduct.” Subparagraphs (C) and
(D) are added to conform to the broader scope in Section 103. The expressions “terms of a trust”
and “terms of the trust” are used interchangeably in the act, depending on whether there has been
a reference to a trust, either explicitly or indirectly, previously in the subsection (or self-
contained paragraph).
SECTION 103. SCOPE. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this
[act], this [act] applies to:
(1) a trust or estate; and
(2) a life estate or other term interest in which the interest of one or more persons will be
succeeded by the interest of one or more other persons.
SECTION 104. GOVERNING LAW. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a
trust or this [act], this [act] applies when this state is the principal place of administration of a
trust or estate or the situs of property that is not held in a trust or estate and is subject to a life
estate or other term interest described in Section 103(2). By accepting the trusteeship of a trust
having its principal place of administration in this state or by moving the principal place of
administration of a trust to this state, the trustee submits to the application of this [act] to any
matter within the scope of this [act] involving the trust.
Comment
As explained in the Prefatory Note, new Section 104 of the 2018 Act specifies that the
Uniform Fiduciary Income and Principal Act is governed by the law of the situs, or principal
place of administration, of the trust. This is consistent with Sections 107 and 108 of the Uniform
Trust Code and Section 3 of the Uniform Directed Trust Act. Like those acts, the rule of Section
104 may be superseded by a provision in the terms of the trust.
14

[ARTICLE] 2
FIDUCIARY DUTIES AND JUDICIAL REVIEW
SECTION 201. FIDUCIARY DUTIES; GENERAL PRINCIPLES.
(a) In making an allocation or determination or exercising discretion under this [act], a
fiduciary shall:
(1) act in good faith, based on what is fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries;
(2) administer a trust or estate impartially, except to the extent the terms of the
trust manifest an intent that the fiduciary shall or may favor one or more beneficiaries;
(3) administer the trust or estate in accordance with the terms of the trust, even if
there is a different provision in this [act]; and
(4) administer the trust or estate in accordance with this [act], except to the extent
the terms of the trust provide otherwise or authorize the fiduciary to determine otherwise.
(b) A fiduciary’s allocation, determination, or exercise of discretion under this [act] is
presumed to be fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries. A fiduciary may exercise a discretionary
power of administration given to the fiduciary by the terms of the trust, and an exercise of the
power which produces a result different from a result required or permitted by this [act] does not
create an inference that the fiduciary abused the fiduciary’s discretion.
(c) A fiduciary shall:
(1) add a receipt to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust nor this
[act] allocates the receipt between income and principal; and
(2) charge a disbursement to principal, to the extent neither the terms of the trust
nor this [act] allocates the disbursement between income and principal.
(d) A fiduciary may exercise the power to adjust under Section 203, convert an income
15

trust to a unitrust under Section 303(a)(1), change the percentage or method used to calculate a
unitrust amount under Section 303(a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust under Section
303(a)(3), if the fiduciary determines the exercise of the power will assist the fiduciary to
administer the trust or estate impartially.
(e) Factors the fiduciary must consider in making the determination under subsection (d)
include:
(1) the terms of the trust;
(2) the nature, distribution standards, and expected duration of the trust;
(3) the effect of the allocation rules, including specific adjustments between
income and principal, under [Articles] 4 through 7;
(4) the desirability of liquidity and regularity of income;
(5) the desirability of the preservation and appreciation of principal;
(6) the extent to which an asset is used or may be used by a beneficiary;
(7) the increase or decrease in the value of principal assets, reasonably determined
by the fiduciary;
(8) whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the fiduciary power to
accumulate income or invade principal or prohibit the fiduciary from accumulating income or
invading principal;
(9) the extent to which the fiduciary has accumulated income or invaded principal
in preceding accounting periods;
(10) the effect of current and reasonably expected economic conditions; and
(11) the reasonably expected tax consequences of the exercise of the power.
16

Comment
Subsections (a) through (c) of Section 201 of the 2018 Act are an update of Section 103
of the 1997 Act.
The standard of what is fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries in subsection (a)(1) is
derived from Section 103(b) of the 1997 Act; it is an objective standard, not dependent on what
seems to any beneficiary to be fair and reasonable. A requirement to act “in good faith” is added,
complementing and supporting the exoneration for a fiduciary’s action or inaction in good faith
in Sections 203(c) (relating to the power to adjust between income and principal) and 302(f)
(relating to the new power to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust) of the 2018 Act.
The requirement to administer a trust or estate impartially in subsection (a)(2) is also
derived from Section 103(b) of the 1997 Act, as is the accompanying exception to the extent the
terms of the trust manifest an intent to favor one or more beneficiaries.
The terms of the trust may alter the degree or nature of impartiality without abandoning
the duty of impartiality. For example, the terms of the trust may permit or require a current
beneficiary to be preferred to meet needs for support in accordance with an accustomed standard
of living and for medical care, but in making determinations regarding that standard the trustee
owes a duty of impartiality to the current beneficiary and the successor beneficiaries. If such a
preference for support and health is expressed, the 2018 Act preserves the duty of impartiality in
making discretionary distributions when that standard is satisfied.
The fact that an income beneficiary or a remainder beneficiary is also the fiduciary is not
by itself an indication of partiality for that beneficiary.
Like previous acts, the 2018 Act contains only default rules. The general supremacy of
the terms of the trust is affirmed in subsection (a)(3), as in Section 103(a)(1) of the 1997 Act.
Conversely, the applicability of the act where not overridden by the terms of the trust is affirmed
in subsection (a)(4), but in a simpler and clearer way than Section 103(a)(3) of the 1997 Act,
which stated that “a fiduciary … shall administer a trust or estate in accordance with this [Act] if
the terms of the trust or the will do not contain a different provision or do not give the fiduciary a
discretionary power of administration.” The 2018 Act states simply “except to the extent the
terms of the trust provide otherwise or authorize the fiduciary to determine otherwise.”
The presumption of fairness and reasonableness of a fiduciary’s determination in the first
sentence of subsection (b) is adapted from the last sentence of Section 103(b) of the 1997 Act.
The reassurance in the following sentence of subsection (b) that a result of a fiduciary’s exercise
of discretion under the terms of the trust that is different from a result under the act does not
create a negative inference is adapted from Section 103(a)(2) of the 1997 Act.
The default of adding a receipt, or charging a disbursement, to principal in subsection (c)
is derived from Section 103(a)(4) of the 1997 Act.
17

Factors. The factors in subsection (e) that a fiduciary must consider are adapted from
Section 104(b) of the 1997 Act, which was written in the context of the power to adjust between
income and principal now found in Section 203. Unlike Section 104(b) of the 1997 Act,
subsection (e) does not limit such consideration to those factors “to the extent they are relevant,”
because determining that a factor is not relevant would itself require a degree of consideration.
Under subsection (d), those factors are now also applicable to the new power to convert to or
from a unitrust or change a unitrust granted by Section 303.
“The terms of the trust” are added as an obvious factor and, indeed, placed first, in
paragraph (1). Correspondingly, in paragraph (2) the “purpose” of the trust is deleted as a factor,
as is “the intent of the settlor” in Section 104(b)(2) of the 1997 Act. Divining or guessing
subjective elements like “purpose” and “intent” are not a reasonable burden to place on a
fiduciary, whereas “terms of the trust” is defined in Section 102(22)(A) to be “the manifestation
of the settlor’s intent” in an objective medium.
Paragraph (3) adds “the effect of the allocation rules, including specific adjustments
between income and principal, under [Articles] 4 through 7,” an elaboration of the reference to
“the other sections of this [Act]” in Section 104(b)(6) of the 1997 Act. This wording affirms that
a main function of the power to adjust or to convert to a unitrust is to fix or compensate for the
results otherwise obtained under those default rules. And because the filter of the default rules in
Articles 4 through 7 is the meaningful way to view the assets of the trust, the enumeration of a
few characteristics of those assets in Section 104(b)(5) of the 1997 Act is omitted, except for the
use of an asset by a beneficiary, which is retained in paragraph (6).
In paragraphs (4) and (5), “the needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation
and appreciation of capital” (as expressed in Section 104(b)(4) of the 1997 Act) is retained,
except that “needs for” is changed to “desirability of” and “capital” is changed to “principal.”
Paragraph (7) retains “the increase or decrease in the value of principal assets” from
Section 104(b)(6) of the 1997 Act. The volatility of value, as well as the unpredictability of
income, can be an occasion for the “smoothing” the powers to adjust between income and
principal and to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust are designed to provide.
Finally, “the actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and
income and effects of inflation and deflation” in Section 104(b)(8) of the 1997 Act is simplified
to “the effect of current and reasonably expected economic conditions” in paragraph (10), and
“anticipated tax consequences” in Section 104(b)(9) of the 1997 Act is changed to “reasonably
expected tax consequences” in paragraph (11).
SECTION 202. JUDICIAL REVIEW OF EXERCISE OF DISCRETIONARY
POWER[; REQUEST FOR INSTRUCTION].
(a) In this section, “fiduciary decision” means:
(1) a fiduciary’s allocation between income and principal or other determination
18

regarding income and principal required or authorized by the terms of the trust or this [act];
(2) the fiduciary’s exercise or nonexercise of a discretionary power regarding
income and principal granted by the terms of the trust or this [act], including the power to adjust
under Section 203, convert an income trust to a unitrust under Section 303(a)(1), change the
percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount under Section 303(a)(2), or convert a
unitrust to an income trust under Section 303(a)(3); or
(3) the fiduciary’s implementation of a decision described in paragraph (1) or (2).
(b) The court may not order a fiduciary to change a fiduciary decision unless the court
determines that the fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion.
(c) If the court determines that a fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s
discretion, the court may order a remedy authorized by law[, including Uniform Trust Code
Section 1001]. To place the beneficiaries in the positions the beneficiaries would have occupied
if there had not been an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion, the court may order:
(1) the fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to adjust under
Section 203;
(2) the fiduciary to exercise or refrain from exercising the power to convert an
income trust to a unitrust under Section 303(a)(1), change the percentage or method used to
calculate a unitrust amount under Section 303(a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust
under Section 303(a)(3);
(3) the fiduciary to distribute an amount to a beneficiary;
(4) a beneficiary to return some or all of a distribution; or
(5) the fiduciary to withhold an amount from one or more future distributions to a
beneficiary.
19

[(d) On [petition] by a fiduciary for instruction, the court may determine whether a
proposed fiduciary decision will result in an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion. If the [petition]
describes the proposed decision, contains sufficient information to inform the beneficiary of the
reasons for making the proposed decision and the facts on which the fiduciary relies, and
explains how the beneficiary will be affected by the proposed decision, a beneficiary that
opposes the proposed decision has the burden to establish that it will result in an abuse of the
fiduciary’s discretion.]
Legislative Note: In subsection (c), refer to Uniform Trust Code Section 1001, or modify
subsection (c) appropriately or refer to the corresponding provision of the state’s trust law if the
state has not enacted the Uniform Trust Code.
Modify subsection (d) if the manner for bringing the matter to a court under the state law is not a
“petition”, or delete subsection (d) and modify the title to the section if the state law does not
permit a court to give instruction to a fiduciary in these circumstances.
Comment
Section 202 of the 2018 Act is adapted from Section 105 of the 1997 Act. Subsection (a)
expands the scope of Section 105(b) of the 1997 Act from the power to adjust to include not only
the powers under the new unitrust provisions (subsection (a)(2)) but also any allocation or other
determination regarding income and principal (subsection (a)(1)) and the implementation of any
such allocations, determinations, or actions (subsection (a)(3)). Collectively these decisions are
called “fiduciary decisions.”
Subsection (b) retains the general rule of Section 105(a) of the 1997 Act that a court will
intervene only if it determines that the fiduciary decision was an abuse of the fiduciary’s
discretion. The statement that “A fiduciary’s decision is not an abuse of discretion merely
because the court would have exercised the power in a different manner or would not have
exercised the power,” although obviously true, is deleted as unnecessary. See Restatement
(Third) of Trusts § 50, comment b (2003) (“A court will not interfere with a trustee’s exercise of
a discretionary power when that exercise is reasonable and not based on an improper
interpretation of the terms of the trust. Thus, judicial intervention is not warranted merely
because the court would have differently exercised the discretion.”).
Subsection (c) focuses the enumeration of available remedies on remedies that place the
beneficiaries overtly – and the trust implicitly – “in the positions [they] would have occupied if
there had not been an abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion,” while acknowledging that the choice
of remedy is of course the court’s decision to make. Paragraphs (1) and (2) add that the court
may simply order that the fiduciary exercise or refrain from exercising the power to adjust or the
power to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust. Those remedies are placed first
20

because they may often be the first choices (but, again, without purporting to limit the court’s
authority). Paragraphs (3), (4), and (5) contain the remedies of ordering a distribution or
withholding from future distributions by a fiduciary or even ordering a refund by a beneficiary.
The remedy in Section 105(c)(3) of the 1997 Act of ordering the fiduciary to use the
fiduciary’s own funds to make a beneficiary whole is deleted – not denied to a court, but deleted
as beyond the scope of a statute dealing primarily with allocations of income and principal. But
the fiduciary’s option of obtaining advance directions from the court (in Section 105(d) of the
1997 Act) is retained in subsection (d), if consistent with general state law. The reference in
Section 105 of the 1997 Act to “the court having jurisdiction of a trust or estate” is shortened to
just “the court,” which is defined in Section 102(4).
SECTION 203. FIDUCIARY’S POWER TO ADJUST.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of a trust or this section, a fiduciary, in a
record, without court approval, may adjust between income and principal if the fiduciary
determines the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or
estate impartially.
(b) This section does not create a duty to exercise or consider the power to adjust under
subsection (a) or to inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this section.
(c) A fiduciary that in good faith exercises or fails to exercise the power to adjust under
subsection (a) is not liable to a person affected by the exercise or failure to exercise.
(d) In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power to adjust under
subsection (a), a fiduciary shall consider all factors the fiduciary considers relevant, including
relevant factors in Section 201(e) and the application of Sections 401(i), 408, and 413.
(e) A fiduciary may not exercise the power under subsection (a) to make an adjustment or
under Section 408 to make a determination that an allocation is insubstantial if:
(1) the adjustment or determination would reduce the amount payable to a current
income beneficiary from a trust that qualifies for a special tax benefit, except to the extent the
adjustment is made to provide for a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust
between the current income beneficiary and successor beneficiaries;
21

(2) the adjustment or determination would change the amount payable to a
beneficiary, as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets, under the terms
of the trust;
(3) the adjustment or determination would reduce an amount that is permanently
set aside for a charitable purpose under the terms of the trust, unless both income and principal
are set aside for the charitable purpose;
(4) possessing or exercising the power would cause a person to be treated as the
owner of all or part of the trust for federal income tax purposes;
(5) possessing or exercising the power would cause all or part of the value of the
trust assets to be included in the gross estate of an individual for federal estate tax purposes;
(6) possessing or exercising the power would cause an individual to be treated as
making a gift for federal gift tax purposes;
(7) the fiduciary is not an independent person;
(8) the trust is irrevocable and provides for income to be paid to the settlor and
possessing or exercising the power would cause the adjusted principal or income to be
considered an available resource or available income under a public-benefit program; or
(9) the trust is a unitrust under [Article] 3.
(f) If subsection (e)(4), (5), (6), or (7) applies to a fiduciary:
(1) a co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not apply may
exercise the power to adjust, unless the exercise of the power by the remaining co-fiduciary or
co-fiduciaries is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other than this [act]; or
(2) if there is no co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not
apply, the fiduciary may appoint a co-fiduciary to which subsection (e)(4) through (7) does not
22

apply, which may be a special fiduciary with limited powers, and the appointed co-fiduciary may
exercise the power to adjust under subsection (a), unless the appointment of a co-fiduciary or the
exercise of the power by a co-fiduciary is not permitted by the terms of the trust or law other
than this [act].
(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate to a co-fiduciary the power to adjust under
subsection (a) if the fiduciary determines that the fiduciary’s possession or exercise of the power
will or may:
(1) cause a result described in subsection (e)(1) through (6) or (8); or
(2) deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in
subsection (e)(1) through (6).
(h) A fiduciary’s release or delegation to a co-fiduciary under subsection (g) of the power
to adjust under subsection (a):
(1) must be in a record;
(2) applies to the entire power, unless the release or delegation provides a
limitation, which may be a limitation to the power to adjust:
(A) from income to principal;
(B) from principal to income;
(C) for specified property; or
(D) in specified circumstances;
(3) for a delegation, may be modified by a re-delegation under this subsection by
the co-fiduciary to which the delegation is made; and
(4) subject to paragraph (3), is permanent, unless the release or delegation
provides a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual or the lives
23

of more than one individual.
(i) Terms of a trust which deny or limit the power to adjust between income and principal
do not affect the application of this section, unless the terms of the trust expressly deny or limit
the power to adjust under subsection (a).
(j) The exercise of the power to adjust under subsection (a) in any accounting period may
apply to the current period, the immediately preceding period, and one or more subsequent
periods.
(k) A description of the exercise of the power to adjust under subsection (a) must be:
(1) included in a report, if any, sent to beneficiaries under [Uniform Trust Code
Section 813(c)]; or
(2) communicated at least annually to [the qualified beneficiaries determined
under [Uniform Trust Code Section 103(13)], other than [the Attorney General]][all beneficiaries
that receive or are entitled to receive income from the trust or would be entitled to receive a
distribution of principal if the trust were terminated at the time the notice is sent, assuming no
power of appointment is exercised].
Legislative Note: Delete or modify subsection (f) if the state law requires fiduciaries to act
unanimously.
In subsection (k), refer to Uniform Trust Code Sections 813(c) and 103(13), or modify subsection
(k) appropriately or refer to the corresponding provision of the state’s trust law if the state has
not enacted the Uniform Trust Code.
Comment
Origin, purpose, and scope of the power to adjust. The power to adjust between
income and principal was added to the 1997 Act as Section 104 (the predecessor of Section 203
of the 2018 Act) to complement the Uniform Prudent Investor Act that had been approved by the
Uniform Law Commission in 1994. For a discussion of the prudent investor rule, including the
investment considerations involving specific investments and techniques under the rule, see
Restatement (Third) of Trusts § 90 (2007), comments k through p (originally published as
Restatement (Third) of Trusts: Prudent Investor Rule § 227, comments i and k through p (1992)).
24

The purpose of the power to adjust between income and principal was to enable a
fiduciary to select investments using the standards of a prudent investor without having to realize
a particular portion of the portfolio’s total return in the form of traditional trust accounting
income such as interest, dividends, and rents. Section 104 authorized a fiduciary to make
adjustments between income and principal if three conditions were met: (1) the fiduciary must be
managing the trust assets under the prudent investor rule; (2) the terms of the trust must express
the income beneficiary’s distribution rights in terms of the right to receive “income” in the sense
of traditional trust accounting income; and (3) the fiduciary must be unable to comply with the
duty to administer the trust impartially, based on what is fair and reasonable to all the
beneficiaries, without making an adjustment. In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise
the power to adjust, the fiduciary was required to consider the factors described in what is now,
with refinements, Section 201(e), but the fiduciary could not make an adjustment in
circumstances described in what is now, with refinements, Section 203(e).
As stated in the Prefatory Note, new Section 203 is significantly expanded over former
Section 104, especially by eliminating the three aforementioned preconditions. For the power to
adjust to be available, trust distributions need not be constricted by the concept of “income” in a
way that economic results from year to year could arbitrarily affect. In other words, while the
trustee of a more modern trust with greater, if not total, flexibility to make distributions from
income and/or principal would actually have been denied the flexibility intended by former
Section 104, new Section 203 ensures that designing a trust for greater flexibility will not
ironically sacrifice the flexibility of adjustments.
Section 203 does not empower a fiduciary to increase or decrease the degree of beneficial
enjoyment to which a beneficiary is entitled under the terms of the trust; rather, it authorizes the
fiduciary to make adjustments between income and principal that may be necessary or helpful if
the income component of a portfolio’s total return is too small or too large because of investment
decisions made by the fiduciary under the prudent investor rule. The paramount considerations in
applying Section 203(a), which replace the three preconditions of former Section 104, are the
requirement in Section 201(a)(1) and (2) that “a fiduciary shall …act in good faith, based on
what is fair and reasonable to all beneficiaries [and] administer a trust or estate impartially,
except to the extent the terms of the trust manifest an intent that the fiduciary shall or may favor
one or more beneficiaries,” and the precondition in Section 203(a) that “the fiduciary [determine]
the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or estate
impartially.”
In other words, the power to adjust between income and principal under former Section
104(a) was available only when, without the power, the fiduciary would have been “unable” to
administer the trust impartially because prudent investment for total return was not producing an
appropriate level of traditional trust income return to impartially balance the interests of the
beneficiaries. Under new Section 203(a), that standard is relaxed when “the fiduciary determines
the exercise of the power to adjust will assist the fiduciary to administer the trust or estate
impartially.” The former standard of impossibility is replaced by a standard of assistance.
As further stated in the Prefatory Note, a trustee of a flexible trust that could have coped
with the constraints of income and principal rules by merely accumulating income or invading
principal now is given the alternative of making an adjustment under Section 203 instead. Under
25

Section 203, a trustee of a discretionary trust can make adjustments, taking into account the
nonexclusive list of factors provided in Section 201(e), and still achieve the comfortable outcome
of “distributing income.” The 2018 Act contemplates that not only would some fiduciaries prefer
the opportunity to continue to respect the formality of “distributing income to income
beneficiaries,” but such a practice would also reassure beneficiaries and reduce some tendencies
toward suspicion and conflict among beneficiaries. And when the interests of beneficiaries under
the terms of the trust are still not appropriately served within the framework of “distributing
income” – that is, when no reasonable adjustment would serve those interests, or when non-pro
rata distributions are justified – then invasions of principal, if authorized by the terms of the trust,
may still be necessary.
Factors to consider in exercising the power to adjust. The factors the fiduciary must
consider in determining whether to exercise the power to adjust between income and principal,
formerly found in Section 104(b) regarding the power to adjust, are now revised and set forth in
Section 201(e), applicable to both the power to adjust between income and principal and the
power to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust. Section 203(d) refers to Section
201(e) in reference to the power to adjust. The differences between the factors in former Section
104(b) and those in new Section 201(e) are discussed in the Comment to Section 201.
Section 203(d) also requires that a fiduciary considering an exercise of the power to
adjust consider the potential presence and effect of certain specific circumstances, namely the
clarification of the character of a distribution from an entity under Section 401(i) after the
fiduciary has made a distribution to trust beneficiaries on the basis of incorrect or incomplete
information, the forgoing of specific small allocations between income and principal as
insubstantial under Section 408, and the need under Section 413 to compensate a settlor’s spouse
when the property in a marital trust is underproductive.
Duration of an exercise of the power to adjust. Section 104 of the 1997 Act did not
state the trust accounting periods to which a fiduciary’s exercise of the power to adjust between
income and principal would apply, suggesting that the power would be exercised year-by-year,
although presumably a retrospective exercise in the first part of the following year would work.
Section 203(j) of the 2018 Act explicitly provides that an exercise of the power in 2019, for
example, may apply to 2018, 2019, and any subsequent years. Such an exercise, again as an
example, would permit a fiduciary to take note that a particular long-term investment was likely
to produce little or no accounting income but significant capital appreciation, and to provide
accordingly for ongoing adjustments to occur as long as those conditions prevailed. While it still
may be prudent to review such circumstances regularly, an announced commitment to a long-
term strategy of adjustments might provide reassuring predictability and enhance the “regularity
of income” cited as a factor for consideration in Section 201(e)(4).
Accountability to beneficiaries and review by the court. Section 203(k) clarifies that a
description of a fiduciary’s exercise of the power to adjust must be communicated to
beneficiaries, either in the annual report contemplated by Section 813(c) of the Uniform Trust
Code or by less formal communication at least annually.
The exercise or nonexercise of the power to adjust is subject to review by the court under
an abuse-of-discretion standard pursuant to Section 202. Certain remedies available to the court
26

are addressed in Section 202(c) and discussed in the Comment to Section 202.
Limitations on the power to adjust. Section 203(e) prohibits a trustee from exercising
the power to adjust where the exercise or even possession of the power might produce
unwelcome federal tax results. Many of the tax results new Section 203(e) seeks to avoid are
carryovers from the former Section 104(c): loss of marital deduction (new Sections 203(e)(1) &
102(19)(C), former Section 104(c)(1)), loss of annual gift tax exclusion (203(e)(1) &
102(19)(A), 104(c)(2)), loss of annuity trust or unitrust treatment (203(e)(2), 104(c)(3)),
charitable deduction (203(e)(3), 104(c)(4)), grantor trust treatment (203(e)(4), 104(c)(5)), and
exposure to estate tax (203(e)(5), 104(c)(6)). Adverse results that the 2018 Act adds are
disqualification of a trust to hold S corporation stock as a qualified subchapter S trust (QSST)
under Section 102(19)(B), loss of grandfathered or exempt status for generation-skipping transfer
tax (GST tax) purposes under Section 102(19)(D) and (E), and a taxable gift by a beneficiary or
fiduciary (Section 203(e)(6)), as well as jeopardy of exemption for public benefit purposes
(Section 203(e)(8)).
With respect to the “special tax benefits” defined in Section 102(19), however, the
limitation of Section 203(e)(1) does not apply “to the extent the adjustment is made to provide
for a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust between the current income
beneficiary and successor beneficiaries.” This is patterned after a safe harbor in Treasury Reg.
§1.643(b)-1, discussed in the Comments to Sections 301 and 309.
In Section 104(c)(5) and (6) of the 1997 Act, the limitations to avoid grantor trust status
and estate tax exposure were expressed as “if possessing or exercising the power to make an
adjustment causes [the adverse result], and [the adverse result] would not [occur] if the trustee
did not possess the power to make the adjustment.” The second clause is omitted in Section
203(e)(5) and (6) because if the possessing or exercising the power “causes” the adverse result it
necessarily follows that the adverse result would not occur but for the power.
In addition, the estate tax protection is extended to all individuals under Section 203(e)(5)
of the 2018 Act, whereas it was limited to individuals with the power to remove or appoint a
trustee under Section 104(c)(6) of the 1997 Act. But the limitation applies only to the exposure
of “trust assets” to estate tax, not assets held outside the trust, including assets that have been
distributed from the trust. Therefore, for example, the limitation is not implicated merely because
the exercise of the power to adjust from principal to income might increase a distribution to an
income beneficiary and thereby add to that beneficiary’s estate held outside the trust.
Section 104(c)(7) and (8) of the 1997 Act prohibited exercise of the power to adjust “if
the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust or … the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or
indirectly.” Section 203(e)(7) of the 2018 Act simply requires the fiduciary to be “an
independent person,” as defined in new Section 102(11). Like Section 104(d) of the 1997 Act, if
some but not all co-fiduciaries are restricted from exercising the power, Section 203(f)(1) of the
2018 Act permits a qualified co-fiduciary to exercise the power, if permitted by the terms of the
trust and applicable law. Section 203(f)(2) of the 2018 Act goes on to permit the appointment of
a co-fiduciary for that purpose, even limited to that purpose.
Even in a case where Section 203(e) does not prohibit a trustee from adjusting between
27

income and principal because certain tax advantages might be jeopardized, the trustee’s
adjustment between income and principal does not necessarily determine or affect the amount of
income that will be subject to federal income tax. Income for federal tax purposes is different
from income for purposes of trust administration. As Treasury Reg. §1.643(b)-1 warns, “[t]rust
provisions that depart fundamentally from traditional principles of income and principal will
generally not be recognized” for income tax purposes.
Section 203(e)(9) provides that the power to adjust is not available for a unitrust under
Article 3.
Release or delegation of the power to adjust. Like Section 104(e) of the 1997 Act,
Section 203(g) of the 2018 Act permits a fiduciary to release all or part of the power to adjust in
circumstances in which the possession or exercise of the power might deprive the trust of a
benefit or impose a burden or risk. In addition, Section 203 allows delegation of the power in
such a case. Section 203(h) provides that a release or delegation may be limited to income, to
principal, or in other ways, or may apply only for a limited time, which may be measured by a
life or lives. If not limited, the default under Section 203(h) is that the release or delegation is
complete and permanent.
Trust terms that limit a power to adjust. Like Section 104(f) of the 1997 Act, Section
203(i) of the 2018 Act acknowledges that the terms of a trust may limit the power to adjust, but
only if the limitation expressly applies to “the power to adjust under subsection (a).”
[ARTICLE] 3
UNITRUST
SECTION 301. DEFINITIONS. In this [article]:
(1) “Applicable value” means the amount of the net fair market value of a trust taken into
account under Section 307.
(2) “Express unitrust” means a trust for which, under the terms of the trust without regard
to this [article], income or net income must or may be calculated as a unitrust amount.
(3) “Income trust” means a trust that is not a unitrust.
(4) “Net fair market value of a trust” means the fair market value of the assets of the trust,
less the noncontingent liabilities of the trust.
(5) “Unitrust” means a trust for which net income is a unitrust amount. The term includes
an express unitrust.
28

(6) “Unitrust amount” means an amount computed by multiplying a determined value of
a trust by a determined percentage. For a unitrust administered under a unitrust policy, the term
means the applicable value, multiplied by the unitrust rate.
(7) “Unitrust policy” means a policy described in Sections 305 through 309 and adopted
under Section 303.
(8) “Unitrust rate” means the rate used to compute the unitrust amount under paragraph
(6) for a unitrust administered under a unitrust policy.
Comment
Background. The word “unitrust” can be traced at least to the literature of the mid-
1960s. Lovell, “The Unitrust: A New Concept to Meet an Old Problem,” 105 Trusts & Estates
215 (1966); Del Cotto & Joyce, “Taxation of the Trust Annuity: The Unitrust Under the
Constitution and the Internal Revenue Code,” 23 Tax L. Rev. 257 (1968). For many estate
planners and charitable giving planners, the first introduction to the word may be in the term
“charitable remainder unitrust” introduced by Congress in section 664, added to the Internal
Revenue Code by the Tax Reform Act of 1969. The word was reprised following the enactment
of section 2702 in Treasury Reg. § 25.2702-3(c), governing “qualified unitrust interests” in
grantor retained unitrusts (“GRUTs”) (which are hardly ever used, if they are used at all).
While the precise origin or intent of the word is not totally clear, it appears derived from
the notion that the trust consists of a unified fund—“a single fund [in which] there would be no
distinction between income and principal,” only between “receipts” and “payouts.” Lovell,
supra. The “unitrust” can be thought of as a trust in which there is a “unity” of interest between
the current income beneficiary and the successor beneficiary, because both benefit from a higher
value of the trust assets.
Thus, in current legal usage, a “unitrust” is simply a trust in which the periodic payout to
the current income beneficiary is determined with reference to a percentage of the net value of
the trust assets, determined from time to time, regardless of how much income is produced by the
trust assets or the growth of the trust assets. As the value of the trust assets increases, the unitrust
amount increases. As the value decreases, the unitrust amount decreases.
The “unity” of interest between the current income beneficiaries and the remainder or
successor beneficiaries will enable the trustee to invest the assets for long-term growth to the
benefit of all beneficiaries. This will permit the mission of the trustee and investment team to be
more focused. Investment decisions can be based on the needs and risk tolerances of the
beneficiaries, and there is less likelihood of dissension between the current and future
beneficiaries over investment policy. In addition, to the extent that a unitrust approach obviates
discretionary invasions of principal, the trustee is protected against challenges by the remainder
beneficiaries that any discretionary principal distributions were excessive. Similarly, a unitrust
29

approach eliminates the need to make adjustments between income and principal under Section
203 and thus avoids or minimizes controversy over whether such adjustments are proper.
By the end of 2016, 36 states (Alabama, Alaska, Arizona, California, Colorado,
Delaware, Florida, Georgia, Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Kentucky, Maine, Maryland,
Missouri, Nebraska, Nevada, New Hampshire, New Mexico, New York, North Carolina,
Oregon, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, South Carolina, South Dakota, Tennessee, Texas, Utah,
Vermont, Virginia, Washington, West Virginia, Wisconsin, and Wyoming) had enacted statutes,
some as part of their Principal and Income Acts and some separately, permitting a trustee to
convert a trust to a unitrust. Some of those statutes refer to unitrusts as “total return unitrusts” (a
term not used in Article 3).
Response by the Internal Revenue Service. In February 2001, the Internal Revenue
Service published proposed regulations it described in part as follows: “This document contains
proposed regulations revising the definition of income under section 643(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code to take into account changes in the definition of trust accounting income under
state laws.” The preamble to the proposed regulations noted:
These [then current] statutory and regulatory provisions [under section 643] date
back to a time when, under state statutes, dividends and interest were considered income
and were allocated to the income beneficiaries while capital gains were allocated to the
principal of the trust. Changes in the types of available investments and in investment
philosophies have caused states to revise, or to consider revising, these traditional
concepts of income and principal….
To ensure that the income beneficiaries are not penalized if a trustee adopts a total
return investment strategy, many states have made, or are considering making, revisions
to the definitions of income and principal. Some state statutes permit the trustee to make
an equitable adjustment between income and principal if necessary to ensure that both the
income beneficiaries and the remainder beneficiaries are treated impartially, based on
what is fair and reasonable to all the beneficiaries. Thus, a receipt of capital gains that
previously would have been allocated to principal may be allocated by the trustee to
income if necessary to treat both parties impartially. Conversely, a receipt of dividends or
interest that previously would have been allocated to income may be allocated by the
trustee to principal if necessary to treat both parties impartially.
Other states are proposing legislation that would allow the trustee to pay a unitrust
amount to an income beneficiary in satisfaction of that beneficiary’s right to the income
from the trust. This unitrust amount will be a fixed percentage, sometimes required to be
within a range set by state statute, of the fair market value of the trust assets determined
annually.
Questions have arisen concerning how these state statutory changes affect the
definition of income provided in section 643(b) and the other Code provisions that rely
on the section 643(b) definition of income. This definition of income affects trusts
including, but not limited to, ordinary trusts, charitable remainder trusts, pooled income
funds, and qualified subchapter S trusts.
30

In short, revision of the regulations was proposed to respond to changes in circumstances,
including changes in the pressures on a trustee faced with an obligation to invest for total return
under the prudent investor rule and faced with the remedies of principal-income adjustments
under the 1997 Revised Uniform Principal and Income Act and of conversion to a total return
unitrust.
The final regulations were released on December 30, 2003. Treasury Reg. §1.643(b)-1
states, in part:
[A]n allocation of amounts between income and principal pursuant to applicable local
law will be respected if local law provides for a reasonable apportionment between the
income and remainder beneficiaries of the total return of the trust for the year, including
ordinary and tax-exempt income, capital gains, and appreciation. For example, a state
statute providing that income is a unitrust amount of no less than 3% and no more than
5% of the fair market value of the trust assets, whether determined annually or averaged
on a multiple year basis, is a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust.
Article 3. The typical state unitrust statute limits unitrust conversions to the parameters in
the Treasury Regulations – “a unitrust amount of no less than 3% and no more than 5% of the
fair market value of the trust assets, whether determined annually or averaged on a multiple year
basis.” Article 3 borrows heavily from that existing state legislation, but it is broader and more
flexible than the laws of most states. The 2018 Act does not limit state law by these specialized
federal regulations and includes in Article 3 many more features and refinements than only a 3-
to-5-percent range and the potential for annual averaging, to permit a unitrust to even better serve
the objective of achieving more stability and predictability for beneficiaries.
One such refinement is to provide that the trust distribute a percentage of its market value
determined on the basis of a rolling average of values for periods other than years. Twelve
quarters is an example. This can reduce potential fluctuations in distributions caused by short-
swing movements in the stock market. Although the rate of increase in the unitrust distribution to
the current income beneficiary will lag the performance of the portfolio, the current income
beneficiary will benefit in down years. Another similar refinement designed to reduce risk to all
the beneficiaries is to place a ceiling and/or a floor on the unitrust payout amount, or on the size
of fluctuation of the unitrust amount from year to year or period to period. More fundamental
refinements include a variable unitrust rate itself, perhaps drawn from specified market data, and
different treatment for different types of assets, including the total exclusion of certain assets and
the income therefrom. Sections 305-309(a) allow all variations of that kind. To afford a trustee
the benefit of the safe harbor in the Treasury regulations in situations where it applies, Section
309(b) limits the parameters in those situations to the parameters specified in that safe harbor.
The situations where Section 309(b) applies, described as situations in which the trust offers a
“special tax benefit,” which is defined in Section 102(19), are built around situations addressed
in the 2003 Treasury Regulations.
Because of the broad flexibility Article 3 allows, it is not necessary to provide specific
statutory fixes for specific identified challenges, including computational challenges like the
treatment of accrued but unpaid income and the treatment of property that is personally used and
not invested.
31

In addition to the requirements in Sections 303(b)(2) and 304 for sending notice of a
proposed conversion to or from a unitrust or change to a unitrust, some state statutes also require
the trustee to send a copy of the state unitrust statute. If the other, somewhat more detailed,
requirements of this Article 3 are followed, that seems unnecessary, although any state that
chooses may still add it.
Like some state unitrust statutes, Article 3 applies to “express unitrusts,” defined in
Section 301(2) to be “a trust for which, under the terms of the trust without regard to this
[article], income or net income must or may be calculated as a unitrust amount.” This scope of
Article 3 is confirmed in Section 301(5), which includes an express unitrust in the general
definition of a “unitrust,” in Section 301(6), in which the definition of a “unitrust amount”
“includes” the unitrust amount determined under Article 3 but also covers any “amount
computed by multiplying a determined value of a trust by a determined percentage” (as in an
express unitrust), and in Section 302(a)(2), which includes an express unitrust in the application
of Article 3. This definition and scope are carried out in Section 303(a)(2) and (3), which
provides that any unitrust (which includes an express unitrust under Section 301(5)) may be
changed (Section 303(a)(2)) or converted (not just “converted back”) to an income trust (Section
303(a)(3)). Thus the Comments to this act refer to “the power to convert to or from a unitrust or
change a unitrust,” although the act itself (in Sections 201(d) and 202(a)(2) and (c)(2)) is more
formal.
As in the case of the power to adjust between income and principal provided in Section
203 and discussed in the Comment to Section 203, Section 302(c) provides that a trust may be
converted to a unitrust regardless of the terms of the trust governing distributions – that is, even
though distributions are not defined or limited by the amount of net income of the trust. This is a
departure from current state laws, but it reflects the overall commitment to flexibility in the 2018
Act that is discussed in the Comment to Section 302. Like the power to adjust, Section 303(b)(1)
makes the power to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust available when “the
fiduciary determines that the action will assist the fiduciary to administer a trust impartially.”
SECTION 302. APPLICATION; DUTIES AND REMEDIES.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), this [article] applies to:
(1) an income trust, unless the terms of the trust expressly prohibit use of this
[article] by a specific reference to this [article] or an explicit expression of intent that net income
not be calculated as a unitrust amount; and
(2) an express unitrust, except to the extent the terms of the trust explicitly:
(A) prohibit use of this [article] by a specific reference to this [article];
(B) prohibit conversion to an income trust; or
(C) limit changes to the method of calculating the unitrust amount.
32

(b) This [article] does not apply to a trust described in Section 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5),
664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or 2702(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as
amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 170(f)(2)(B), 642(c)(5), 664(d), 2702(a)(3)(A)(ii) or (iii), or
2702(b)[, as amended].
(c) An income trust to which this [article] applies under subsection (a)(1) may be
converted to a unitrust under this [article] regardless of the terms of the trust concerning
distributions. Conversion to a unitrust under this [article] does not affect other terms of the trust
concerning distributions of income or principal.
(d) This [article] applies to an estate only to the extent a trust is a beneficiary of the
estate. To the extent of the trust’s interest in the estate, the estate may be administered as a
unitrust, the administration of the estate as a unitrust may be discontinued, or the percentage or
method used to calculate the unitrust amount may be changed, in the same manner as for a trust
under this [article].
(e) This [article] does not create a duty to take or consider action under this [article] or to
inform a beneficiary about the applicability of this [article].
(f) A fiduciary that in good faith takes or fails to take an action under this [article] is not
liable to a person affected by the action or inaction.
Legislative Note: A United States Code citation (U.S.C.) follows a reference to the federal
Internal Revenue Code in subsection (b). The United States Code citation is included as an aid to
the reader. If the state’s convention is to omit the United States Code citation, simply delete the
United States Code citation. In states in which the constitution, or other law, does not permit the
phrase “as amended” when federal statutes are incorporated into state law, the phrase should
be omitted.
Comment
Section 302(a)(2) includes “express unitrusts” within the scope of Article 3. Section
302(b) excludes charitable lead annuity trusts and unitrusts (CLATs and CLUTs), pooled income
funds (PIFs), charitable remainder annuity trusts and unitrusts (CRATs and CRUTs), personal
residence trusts and qualified personal residence trusts (PRTs and QPRTs), and grantor retained
33

annuity trusts and unitrusts (GRATs and GRUTs).
Section 302(c) confirms that conversion of an income trust to a unitrust does not depend
on the terms of the trust concerning distributions. In other words, a unitrust conversion is
available even for a trust in which a trustee may accumulate income or invade principal. This
works both ways under Section 302(c). Discretion over distributions does not disqualify an
income trust from converting to a unitrust, and neither does conversion to a unitrust change the
trustee’s discretion to accumulate income (even the unitrust amount, although that may be
unusual) or invade principal above the unitrust amount. This carries out the objective of the 2018
Act, explained in the Prefatory Note and in the Comment to Section 203, to allow a fiduciary to
respect the simple, predictable, and reassuring notion of “income” (in this case a unitrust
amount) without necessarily relying on accumulations of income or invasions of principal as a
first resort.
Section 302(d) provides that Article 3 applies to a decedent’s estate only to the extent a
trust is a beneficiary of the estate. To that extent, the estate, or part of the estate, is treated for all
purposes the same as a trust under Article 3. Thus, there are no other references to estates in
Article 3.
Section 302(e) rejects any creation of an affirmative duty to act under Article 3 or to
inform beneficiaries of the actions available under Article 3. And Section 302(f) exonerates a
fiduciary that in good faith acts or fails to act under Article 3.
SECTION 303. AUTHORITY OF FIDUCIARY.
(a) A fiduciary, without court approval, by complying with subsections (b) and (f), may:
(1) convert an income trust to a unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
unitrust policy for the trust providing:
(A) that in administering the trust the net income of the trust will be a
unitrust amount rather than net income determined without regard to this [article]; and
(B) the percentage and method used to calculate the unitrust amount;
(2) change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount for a
unitrust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a unitrust policy or an amendment or replacement of a
unitrust policy providing changes in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust
amount; or
(3) convert a unitrust to an income trust if the fiduciary adopts in a record a
34

determination that, in administering the trust, the net income of the trust will be net income
determined without regard to this [article] rather than a unitrust amount.
(b) A fiduciary may take an action under subsection (a) if:
(1) the fiduciary determines that the action will assist the fiduciary to administer a
trust impartially;
(2) the fiduciary sends a notice in a record, in the manner required by Section 304,
describing and proposing to take the action;
(3) the fiduciary sends a copy of the notice under paragraph (2) to each settlor of
the trust which is:
(A) if an individual, living; or
(B) if not an individual, in existence;
(4) at least one member of each class[ of the qualified beneficiaries determined
under [Uniform Trust Code Section 103(13)], other than [the Attorney General],] receiving the
notice under paragraph (2) is:
(A) if an individual, legally competent; [or]
(B) if not an individual, in existence; [or
(C) represented in the manner provided in Section 304(b);] and
(5) the fiduciary does not receive, by the date specified in the notice under Section
304[(d)(5)][(c)(5)], an objection in a record to the action proposed under paragraph (2) from a
person to which the notice under paragraph (2) is sent.
(c) If a fiduciary receives, not later than the date stated in the notice under Section
304[(d)(5)][(c)(5)], an objection in a record described in Section 304[(d)(4)][(c)(4)] to a
proposed action, the fiduciary or a beneficiary may request the court to have the proposed action
35

taken as proposed, taken with modifications, or prevented. A person described in Section 304(a)
may oppose the proposed action in the proceeding under this subsection, whether or not the
person:
(1) consented under Section 304[(c)][(b)]; or
(2) objected under Section 304[(d)(4)][(c)(4)].
(d) If, after sending a notice under subsection (b)(2), a fiduciary decides not to take the
action proposed in the notice, the fiduciary shall notify in a record each person described in
Section 304(a) of the decision not to take the action and the reasons for the decision.
(e) If a beneficiary requests in a record that a fiduciary take an action described in
subsection (a) and the fiduciary declines to act or does not act within 90 days after receiving the
request, the beneficiary may request the court to direct the fiduciary to take the action requested.
(f) In deciding whether and how to take an action authorized by subsection (a), or
whether and how to respond to a request by a beneficiary under subsection (e), a fiduciary shall
consider all factors relevant to the trust and the beneficiaries, including relevant factors in
Section 201(e).
(g) A fiduciary may release or delegate the power to convert an income trust to a unitrust
under subsection (a)(1), change the percentage or method used to calculate a unitrust amount
under subsection (a)(2), or convert a unitrust to an income trust under subsection (a)(3), for a
reason described in Section 203(g) and in the manner described in Section 203(h).
Legislative Note: In subsection (b)(4), refer to Uniform Trust Code Section 103(13), or modify
subsection (b)(4) appropriately or refer to the corresponding provision of the state’s trust law if
the state has not enacted the Uniform Trust Code.
In subsections (b)(5) and (c), use the reference in the first set of brackets if Alternative A of
Section 304 is used and use the reference in the second set of brackets if Alternative B of Section
304 is used.
36

Comment
Section 303 sets forth, in effect, the road map for action under Article 3: the options
under Section 303(a), a determination that impartiality will be assisted under Section 303(b)(1),
notice to beneficiaries under Section 303(b)(2) with a copy to the settlor or settlors under Section
303(b)(3), existence of a competent potential party under Section 303(b)(4), a wait for a
prescribed time before acting under Section 303(b)(5), and an opportunity to ask for court
approval under Section 303(c) if there is a timely objection. There is also an opportunity under
Section 303(e) for a beneficiary to seek the help of the court if the beneficiary asks the fiduciary
to act under Article 3 and the fiduciary refuses or fails to act.
Although the recipients of the required notice are set forth in detail in Section 304,
settlors are included only here in Section 303(b)(3) and are said to receive only “a copy of the
notice.” This is done to avoid unintentionally making the settlor of an irrevocable trust over
which he or she has relinquished all power a party to a proceeding with a voice in the matter that
could be construed as retained control of the trust. See Section 303(c), which provides that “[a]
person described in Section 304(a) may oppose the proposed action in the proceeding under this
subsection,” and Section 304[(d)][(c)](4), which requires the notice to state that everyone who
receives the notice “may object to the proposed action.” This is a departure from the Uniform
Trust Decanting Act (UTDA), for example, which includes the requirement for notice to the
settlor in the same list, indeed at the head of the list (Section 7(c)(1)), of all persons entitled to
notice. But there may be reasons unique to decanting to give formal notice to the settlor. Section
19(b)(10) of UTDA, for example, allows a settlor to block a fiduciary’s decanting proposal if the
decanting would reduce the settlor’s power to avoid or terminate grantor trust status, which
typically would not be implicated by a unitrust conversion.
Section 303(a)(1)(A) states that in a unitrust “the net income of the trust will be a unitrust
amount rather than net income determined without regard to this [article].” Thus, for example,
because “net income” already reflects the disbursements made from income, there will be no
deductions from the unitrust amount for expenses unless the unitrust policy expressly allows it.
Like the power to adjust, the power to convert to or from a unitrust or change a unitrust is
governed by consideration of the same factors under Sections 303(f) and 201(e), and a fiduciary
may release or delegate the power under Section 303(g).
SECTION 304. NOTICE.
Alternative A
(a) A notice required by Section 303(b)(2) must be sent in a manner authorized under
[Uniform Trust Code Section 109] to:
(1) the qualified beneficiaries determined under [Uniform Trust Code Section
103(13)], other than [the Attorney General]; [and]
37

(2) [each person acting as trust director of the trust under the Uniform Directed
Trust Act][each person that is granted a power over the trust by the terms of the trust, to the
extent the power is exercisable when the person is not then serving as a trustee:
(A) including a:
(i) power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust
property or other matters of trust administration; and
(ii) power to appoint or remove a trustee or person described in this
paragraph; and
(B) excluding a:
(i) power of appointment;
(ii) power of a beneficiary over the trust, to the extent the exercise
or nonexercise of the power affects the beneficial interest of the beneficiary or another
beneficiary represented by the beneficiary under [Uniform Trust Code Sections 301 through 305]
with respect to the exercise or nonexercise of the power; and
(iii) power over the trust if the terms of the trust provide that the
power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity and the power must be held in a nonfiduciary capacity
to achieve a tax objective under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C.[, as
amended]][; and
(3) each person that is granted a power by the terms of the trust to appoint or
remove a trustee or person described in paragraph (2), to the extent the power is exercisable
when the person that exercises the power is not then serving as a trustee or person described in
paragraph (2)].
(b) The representation provisions of [Uniform Trust Code Sections 301 through 305]
38

apply to notice under this section.
Alternative B
(a) A notice required by Section 303(b)(2) must be sent to:
(1) all beneficiaries that receive or are entitled to receive income from the trust or
would be entitled to receive a distribution of principal if the trust were terminated at the time the
notice is sent, assuming no power of appointment is exercised; [and]
(2) [each person acting as trust director of the trust under the Uniform Directed
Trust Act][each person that is granted a power over the trust by the terms of the trust, to the
extent the power is exercisable when the person is not then serving as a trustee:
(A) including a:
(i) power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust
property or other matters of trust administration; and
(ii) power to appoint or remove a trustee or person described in this
paragraph; and
(B) excluding a:
(i) power of appointment;
(ii) power of a beneficiary over the trust, to the extent the exercise
or nonexercise of the power affects the beneficial interest of the beneficiary; and
(iii) power over the trust if the terms of the trust provide that the
power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity and the power must be held in a nonfiduciary capacity
to achieve a tax objective under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C.[, as
amended]][; and
(3) each person that is granted a power by the terms of the trust to appoint or
39

remove a trustee or person described in paragraph (2), to the extent the power is exercisable
when the person that exercises the power is not then serving as a trustee or person described in
paragraph (2)].
End of Alternatives
[(c)][(b)] A person may consent in a record at any time to action proposed under Section
303(b)(2). A notice required by Section 303(b)(2) need not be sent to a person that consents
under this subsection.
[(d)][(c)] A notice required by Section 303(b)(2) must include:
(1) the action proposed under Section 303(b)(2);
(2) for a conversion of an income trust to a unitrust, a copy of the unitrust policy
adopted under Section 303(a)(1);
(3) for a change in the percentage or method used to calculate the unitrust amount,
a copy of the unitrust policy or amendment or replacement of the unitrust policy adopted under
Section 303(a)(2);
(4) a statement that the person to which the notice is sent may object to the
proposed action by stating in a record the basis for the objection and sending or delivering the
record to the fiduciary;
(5) the date by which an objection under paragraph (4) must be received by the
fiduciary, which must be at least 30 days after the date the notice is sent;
(6) the date on which the action is proposed to be taken and the date on which the
action is proposed to take effect;
(7) the name and contact information of the fiduciary; and
(8) the name and contact information of a person that may be contacted for
40

additional information.
Legislative Note: Use Alternative A and the designations in the first set of brackets if the state
has enacted the Uniform Trust Code. Use Alternative B and the subsection designations in the
second set of brackets if the state has not enacted the Uniform Trust Code.
A United States Code citation (U.S.C.) follows a reference to the federal Internal Revenue Code
in subsection (a)(2)(B)(iii). The United States Code citation is included as an aid to the reader. If
the state’s convention is to omit the United States Code citation, simply delete the United States
Code citation. In states in which the constitution, or other law, does not permit the phrase “as
amended” when federal statutes are incorporated into state law, the phrase should be omitted.
In Alternative A or B, modify subsection (a)(2) to refer to the Uniform Directed Trust Act and
include subsection (a)(3) if the state has enacted the Uniform Directed Trust Act, or modify
subsection (a)(2) appropriately and omit subsection (a)(3) if the state has not enacted the
Uniform Directed Trust Act.
Comment
Section 304 provides details of the fiduciary’s notice to beneficiaries. Subsection (a) is
offered in two Alternatives, Alternative A for a state that has enacted the Uniform Trust Code
and Alternative B for a state that hasn’t. Alternative A also includes a subsection (b) that affirms
the application of the UTC representation rules. Generally, a detailed notice goes to “qualified
beneficiaries” in the UTC sense, as both current and successor beneficiaries are affected by the
administration of a trust as a unitrust. Subsection (d) (in the UTC case) or (c) (in the non-UTC
case) requires, in paragraphs (7) and (8), the name and contact information of the fiduciary and
of a person that may be contacted for additional information. “Contact information” is left open-
ended, to accommodate any reasonably accessible technology or medium.
SECTION 305. UNITRUST POLICY.
(a) In administering a unitrust under this [article], a fiduciary shall follow a unitrust
policy adopted under Section 303(a)(1) or (2) or amended or replaced under Section 303(a)(2).
(b) A unitrust policy must provide:
(1) the unitrust rate or the method for determining the unitrust rate under Section
306;
(2) the method for determining the applicable value under Section 307; and
(3) the rules described in Sections 306 through 309 which apply in the
administration of the unitrust, whether the rules are:
41

(A) mandatory, as provided in Sections 307(a) and 308(a); or
(B) optional, as provided in Sections 306, 307(b), 308(b), and 309(a), to
the extent the fiduciary elects to adopt those rules.
Comment
Section 305 provides for a “unitrust policy,” which will include a few mandatory details
spelled out in Sections 306 through 308 and may include many more optional details mentioned
in those sections. It is in those sections where broad flexibility is encountered, including a
unitrust rate under Section 306 that may be less than 3 percent or more than 5 percent and a
period under Section 308 that may be something other than a calendar year. For exceptions to
that flexibility in certain cases, see Section 309 and the Comment thereto.
SECTION 306. UNITRUST RATE.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 309(b)(1), a unitrust rate may be:
(1) a fixed unitrust rate; or
(2) a unitrust rate that is determined for each period using:
(A) a market index or other published data; or
(B) a mathematical blend of market indices or other published data over a
stated number of preceding periods.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 309(b)(1), a unitrust policy may provide:
(1) a limit on how high the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
rise;
(2) a limit on how low the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
fall;
(3) a limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
increase over the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates
over a stated number of preceding periods;
(4) a limit on how much the unitrust rate determined under subsection (a)(2) may
42

decrease below the unitrust rate for the preceding period or a mathematical blend of unitrust rates
over a stated number of preceding periods; or
(5) a mathematical blend of any of the unitrust rates determined under subsection
(a)(2) and paragraphs (1) through (4).
SECTION 307. APPLICABLE VALUE.
(a) A unitrust policy must provide the method for determining the fair market value of an
asset for the purpose of determining the unitrust amount, including:
(1) the frequency of valuing the asset, which need not require a valuation in every
period; and
(2) the date for valuing the asset in each period in which the asset is valued.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 309(b)(2), a unitrust policy may provide
methods for determining the amount of the net fair market value of the trust to take into account
in determining the applicable value, including:
(1) obtaining an appraisal of an asset for which fair market value is not readily
available;
(2) exclusion of specific assets or groups or types of assets;
(3) other exceptions or modifications of the treatment of specific assets or groups
or types of assets;
(4) identification and treatment of cash or property held for distribution;
(5) use of:
(A) an average of fair market values over a stated number of preceding
periods; or
(B) another mathematical blend of fair market values over a stated number
43

of preceding periods;
(6) a limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
individual assets may increase over:
(A) the corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
(B) a mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of
preceding periods;
(7) a limit on how much the applicable value of all assets, groups of assets, or
individual assets may decrease below:
(A) the corresponding applicable value for the preceding period; or
(B) a mathematical blend of applicable values over a stated number of
preceding periods;
(8) the treatment of accrued income and other features of an asset which affect
value; and
(9) determining the liabilities of the trust, including treatment of liabilities to
conform with the treatment of assets under paragraphs (1) through (8).
Comment
In determining the amount to which the unitrust rate is applied to determine the unitrust
amount, a fiduciary first determines the fair market value of each asset that is not excluded under
Section 307(b)(2). Fair market value is just that, fair market value in the usual sense. Next, the
fiduciary adds the fair market values of all those assets together and subtracts the noncontingent
liabilities of the trust to determine “net fair market value of the trust,” as defined in Section
301(4). Finally, the fiduciary applies the actions described in Section 307(b)(3) through (9), to
the extent provided by the unitrust policy (as well as other actions provided by the unitrust policy
under Section 309(a)(3)), to determine the “applicable value.” It is the applicable value that is
multiplied by the unitrust rate to determine the unitrust amount, which is deemed to be the net
income of the trust under Section 303(a)(1)(A) or (2). Thus, unlike fair market value, the
“applicable value” may be affected by the actions taken under Section 307(b)(3) through (9).
Those actions may be somewhat artificial, in that they are not produced by the market as is “fair
market value.” In fact, most of those actions are intended to counterbalance the effects of the
market to provide a smoother and more predictable unitrust amount from year to year.
44

Like the “terms of a trust” and “terms of the trust” discussed in the Comment to Section
102, “net fair market value of a trust” (in Section 301(1) and (4)) and “net fair market value of
the trust” in Section 307(b) are used interchangeably, depending on whether there has been a
reference to a trust, either explicitly or indirectly, previously in the subsection or paragraph. In
Section 307(b), that previous reference to a trust is imbedded in the term “unitrust policy.”
SECTION 308. PERIOD.
(a) A unitrust policy must provide the period used under Sections 306 and 307. Except as
otherwise provided in Section 309(b)(3), the period may be:
(1) a calendar year;
(2) a 12-month period other than a calendar year;
(3) a calendar quarter;
(4) a three-month period other than a calendar quarter; or
(5) another period.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 309(b), a unitrust policy may provide
standards for:
(1) using fewer preceding periods under Section 306(a)(2)(B) or (b)(3) or (4) if:
(A) the trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
(B) market indices or other published data are not available for a
preceding period;
(2) using fewer preceding periods under Section 307(b)(5)(A) or (B), (6)(B), or
(7)(B) if:
(A) the trust was not in existence in a preceding period; or
(B) fair market values are not available for a preceding period; and
(3) prorating the unitrust amount on a daily basis for a part of a period in which
the trust or the administration of the trust as a unitrust or the interest of any beneficiary
commences or terminates.
45

SECTION 309. SPECIAL TAX BENEFITS; OTHER RULES.
(a) A unitrust policy may:
(1) provide methods and standards for:
(A) determining the timing of distributions;
(B) making distributions in cash or in kind or partly in cash and partly in
kind; or
(C) correcting an underpayment or overpayment to a beneficiary based on
the unitrust amount if there is an error in calculating the unitrust amount;
(2) specify sources and the order of sources, including categories of income for
federal income tax purposes, from which distributions of a unitrust amount are paid; or
(3) provide other standards and rules the fiduciary determines serve the interests
of the beneficiaries.
(b) If a trust qualifies for a special tax benefit or a fiduciary is not an independent person:
(1) the unitrust rate established under Section 306 may not be less than three
percent or more than five percent;
(2) the only provisions of Section 307 which apply are Section 307(a) and (b)(1),
(4), (5)(A), and (9);
(3) the only period that may be used under Section 308 is a calendar year under
Section 308(a)(1); and
(4) the only other provisions of Section 308 which apply are Section 308(b)(2)(A)
and (3).
Comment
Section 309(a) provides that a unitrust policy may include details beyond even the broad
scope of Sections 306 through 308. One specific example, in paragraph (2), is to “specify sources
and the order of sources, including categories of income for federal income tax purposes, from
46

which distributions of a unitrust amount are paid.” Approximately two-thirds of the state unitrust
statutes include a default “ordering rule,” although five of those default rules are limited to net
accounting income or ordinary income and leave the ordering of short- and long-term capital
gains, for example, to the fiduciary’s discretion. Although the 2018 Act does not include such an
ordering rule, Section 309(a)(2) makes it clear that the fiduciary may include an ordering rule in
a proposed unitrust policy.
Importantly, Section 309(b) addresses trusts that qualify for a “special tax benefit”
defined in Section 102(19) – the annual gift tax exclusion, eligibility of a qualified subchapter S
trust (QSST), an estate or gift tax marital deduction, or exemption from generation-skipping
transfer tax (GST tax) – and trusts with a fiduciary that is not an “independent person” defined in
Section 102(11). For those trusts, much of the expanded flexibility of Article 3 is denied, and,
specifically, the unitrust rate is limited to 3-5 percent and the period used for calculation is
limited to a calendar year. This protects the trust under the following safe harbor in Treasury
Reg. §1.643(b)-1 (Dec. 30, 2003) (emphasis added):
[A]n allocation of amounts between income and principal pursuant to applicable local
law will be respected if local law provides for a reasonable apportionment between the
income and remainder beneficiaries of the total return of the trust for the year, including
ordinary and tax-exempt income, capital gains, and appreciation. For example, a state
statute providing that income is a unitrust amount of no less than 3% and no more than
5% of the fair market value of the trust assets, whether determined annually or averaged
on a multiple year basis, is a reasonable apportionment of the total return of the trust.
Although two of the “special tax benefits” – the gift tax exclusion and the marital
deduction – are short-term, and there are often alternatives to QSSTs and non-independent
trustees, GST tax exemption is anything but short-term, is unavoidable, and is often crucial in the
type of large long-term or even perpetual trust that is perhaps the most typical candidate for a
unitrust conversion. And although “no less than 3% and no more than 5% of the fair market
value of the trust assets, whether determined annually or averaged on a multiple year basis” is
explicitly offered in the Treasury regulation only as an “example,” it is expressly incorporated
into the regulations for GST-grandfathered trusts (Treasury Reg. §26.2601-1(b)(4)(i)(D)(2) &
(E), Example 11), and the GST tax stakes are typically so high that few fiduciaries or
beneficiaries would want to assume the risk. The focus of the regulation is on what the “state
statute provid[es].” Therefore, Section 309(b) respects this safe harbor for such trusts.
[ARTICLE] 4
ALLOCATION OF RECEIPTS
[PART] 1
RECEIPTS FROM ENTITY
SECTION 401. CHARACTER OF RECEIPTS FROM ENTITY.
(a) In this section:
47

(1) “Capital distribution” means an entity distribution of money which is a:
(A) return of capital; or
(B) distribution in total or partial liquidation of the entity.
(2) “Entity”:
(A) means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, regulated
investment company, real estate investment trust, common trust fund, or any other organization
or arrangement in which a fiduciary owns or holds an interest, whether or not the entity is a
taxpayer for federal income tax purposes; and
(B) does not include:
(i) a trust or estate to which Section 402 applies;
(ii) a business or other activity to which Section 403 applies which
is not conducted by an entity described in subparagraph (A);
(iii) an asset-backed security; or
(iv) an instrument or arrangement to which Section 416 applies.
(3) “Entity distribution” means a payment or transfer by an entity made to a
person in the person’s capacity as an owner or holder of an interest in the entity.
(b) In this section, an attribute or action of an entity includes an attribute or action of any
other entity in which the entity owns or holds an interest, including an interest owned or held
indirectly through another entity.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d)(2) through (4), a fiduciary shall
allocate to income:
(1) money received in an entity distribution; and
(2) tangible personal property of nominal value received from the entity.
48

(d) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
(1) property received in an entity distribution which is not:
(A) money; or
(B) tangible personal property of nominal value;
(2) money received in an entity distribution in an exchange for part or all of the
fiduciary’s interest in the entity, to the extent the entity distribution reduces the fiduciary’s
interest in the entity relative to the interests of other persons that own or hold interests in the
entity;
(3) money received in an entity distribution that the fiduciary determines or
estimates is a capital distribution; and
(4) money received in an entity distribution from an entity that is:
(A) a regulated investment company or real estate investment trust if the
money received is a capital gain dividend for federal income tax purposes; or
(B) treated for federal income tax purposes comparably to the treatment
described in subparagraph (A).
(e) A fiduciary may determine or estimate that money received in an entity distribution is
a capital distribution:
(1) by relying without inquiry or investigation on a characterization of the entity
distribution provided by or on behalf of the entity, unless the fiduciary:
(A) determines, on the basis of information known to the fiduciary, that
the characterization is or may be incorrect; or
(B) owns or holds more than 50 percent of the voting interest in the entity;
(2) by determining or estimating, on the basis of information known to the
49

fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on behalf of the entity, that the total amount of
money and property received by the fiduciary in the entity distribution or a series of related
entity distributions is or will be greater than 20 percent of the fair market value of the fiduciary’s
interest in the entity; or
(3) if neither paragraph (1) nor (2) applies, by considering the factors in
subsection (f) and the information known to the fiduciary or provided to the fiduciary by or on
behalf of the entity.
(f) In making a determination or estimate under subsection (e)(3), a fiduciary may
consider:
(1) a characterization of an entity distribution provided by or on behalf of the
entity;
(2) the amount of money or property received in:
(A) the entity distribution; or
(B) what the fiduciary determines is or will be a series of related entity
distributions;
(3) the amount described in paragraph (2) compared to the amount the fiduciary
determines or estimates is, during the current or preceding accounting periods:
(A) the entity’s operating income;
(B) the proceeds of the entity’s sale or other disposition of:
(i) all or part of the business or other activity conducted by the
entity;
(ii) one or more business assets that are not sold to customers in
the ordinary course of the business or other activity conducted by the entity; or
50

(iii) one or more assets other than business assets, unless the
entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on the disposition of all or some of
the assets;
(C) if the entity’s primary activity is to invest in assets to realize gain on
the disposition of all or some of the assets, the gain realized on the disposition;
(D) the entity’s regular, periodic entity distributions;
(E) the amount of money the entity has accumulated;
(F) the amount of money the entity has borrowed;
(G) the amount of money the entity has received from the sources
described in Sections 407, 410, 411, and 412; and
(H) the amount of money the entity has received from a source not
otherwise described in this paragraph; and
(4) any other factor the fiduciary determines is relevant.
(g) If, after applying subsections (c) through (f), a fiduciary determines that a part of an
entity distribution is a capital distribution but is in doubt about the amount of the entity
distribution which is a capital distribution, the fiduciary shall allocate to principal the amount of
the entity distribution which is in doubt.
(h) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to
an entity distribution before the fiduciary has paid part of the entity distribution to a beneficiary,
the fiduciary may consider the additional information before making the payment to the
beneficiary and may change a decision to make the payment to the beneficiary.
(i) If a fiduciary receives additional information about the application of this section to an
entity distribution after the fiduciary has paid part of the entity distribution to a beneficiary, the
51

fiduciary is not required to change or recover the payment to the beneficiary but may consider
that information in determining whether to exercise the power to adjust under Section 203.
Comment
Entities to which Section 401 applies. Section 401 covers distributions from all types of
entities. For example, the reference to partnerships in Section 401(a)(2)(A) includes all forms of
partnerships, including limited partnerships, limited liability partnerships, and variants that have
slightly different names and characteristics from state to state. And subsection (b) provides that
the same is true of a chain or chains of entities, whether the entities are the same or different and
no matter how many tiers the entities represent. This section does not apply, however, to receipts
from an interest in property that a fiduciary owns as a tenant-in-common with one or more co-
owners, nor would it apply to an interest in a joint venture if, under applicable law, the interest is
regarded as that of a tenant-in-common.
Section 401(a)(2)(A) of the 2018 Act clarifies that Section 401 applies to an entity that
meets these tests whether or not the entity is respected for federal income tax purposes. In
Section 401(a)(2)(B) the 2018 Act retains the exceptions from the application of Section 401 in
Section 401(a) of the 1997 Act, except that it clarifies that it does not exclude a business that
might appear to be described in Section 403 if it is conducted in an entity that is subject to
Section 401 under Section 401(a)(2)(A). This clarification and a similar clarification to Section
403(a)(2) prevent what might otherwise seem to be a circularity between Sections 401 and 403,
with each of those sections excluding an entity described in the other section.
Terms. The 2018 Act introduces the term “entity distribution” to refer to distributions
from entities to which Section 401 applies and the term “capital distribution” to refer to
distributions of money, rather than other property, which nevertheless are treated as principal.
“Capital distribution” replaces the former term “total or partial liquidation” and includes a
“return of capital.”
Reinvested dividends. If a fiduciary elects (or continues an election made by a
predecessor) to reinvest dividends in shares of stock of a distributing corporation or fund,
whether evidenced by new certificates or entries on the books of the distributing entity, the new
shares would be principal. Making or continuing such an election would be equivalent to making
an adjustment from income to principal under Section 203. If the fiduciary makes or continues
the election for a reason other than to comply with the standards of Section 203, such as making
an investment without incurring brokerage commissions, the fiduciary has the option of
considering a corresponding transfer of cash from principal to income.
Distribution of property. The 1962 Act described a number of types of property that
would be principal if distributed by a corporation. This became unwieldy in a section (former
Section 401) that applied to both corporations and all other entities. By stating that the
distribution of any property other than money is generally allocated to principal, subsection
(d)(1) embraces all of the items enumerated in Section 6 of the 1962 Act as well as any other
form of nonmonetary distribution not specifically mentioned in that act. The new exception in
subsections (c)(2) and (d)(1)(B) for “tangible personal property of nominal value” would cover,
52

for example, an item of food sent to owners (and perhaps others such as customers, suppliers,
and employees) at a holiday time. It is not necessarily given in proportion to ownership interests,
and as a practical matter it often needs to be allocated to income, in effect, so it can be
conveniently distributed and enjoyed.
With respect to large distributions of cash, the 2018 Act is sensitive to the fact that the
fiduciary might not have enough information to properly categorize the distribution. Subsection
(d)(2) addresses the relatively easy case of a likely non-pro-rata distribution that reduces the
fiduciary’s proportionate interest in the entity – in effect, a redemption. Subsection (d)(4) retains
the special rule for capital gain dividends from a regulated investment company (RIC) or real
estate investment trust (REIT) that was added in 1997, and adds a reference to other distributions
that federal income tax law treats comparably.
Subsection (d)(2) retains the rule that a distribution in exchange for part of all of the
fiduciary’s interest in the entity is principal, but clarifies that this rule applies only to the extent
the transaction reduces the fiduciary’s proportional interest in the entity relative to other owners.
It does not necessarily apply, for example, to a corporate reorganization in which shareholders
exchange their stock for other stock. If all owners receive proportionate distributions, the
distribution to the fiduciary is tested as described in the next paragraph.
With regard to receipts of money that could be what the act refers to as a “capital
distribution” – a return of capital or a distribution in partial liquidation of the entity – subsections
(d)(3), (e), and (f) provide some help with what the act acknowledges might be only an
“estimate” by the fiduciary. For this purpose, subsection (e) provides that the fiduciary may first
rely on how the entity describes the distribution, unless the fiduciary possesses information that
casts doubt on that description or the fiduciary is a majority voting owner, in which case the
fiduciary may have a duty to inquire or investigate further. Next, the fiduciary may be satisfied
with treating the distribution as a capital distribution if information the entity provides, together
with other information the fiduciary knows, indicates that the distribution exceeds 20 percent of
the fair market value of the fiduciary’s interest. This 20 percent test is retained from the 1997
Act, except that (i) it is a permissive safe harbor and not a presumption and (ii) the 1997 Act
applied the 20 percent test to “the entity’s gross assets” and the 2018 Act applies it to “the fair
market value of the fiduciary’s interest in the entity,” thus focusing the inquiry on the distribution
to that fiduciary rather than all distributions made by the entity. For this purpose, what the
available information indicates is or will be a series of distributions is aggregated. Finally, under
subsection (e)(3), the fiduciary may make a determination or estimate based on factors in
subsection (f), including but not limited to the entity’s characterization of the distribution, that
may help point the fiduciary to a distribution that is extraordinary enough under the
circumstances to be treated as a capital distribution. But it is not possible to describe a “capital
distribution” with reference to objective characteristics alone, and fiduciaries will have to
exercise some judgment in making the necessary determinations and estimates.
Because estimates may be necessary and are expressly contemplated by the act,
subsections (h) and (i) help the fiduciary know how to make distributions on the basis of
incomplete information and, as a last resort, cite the power to adjust between income and
principal in Section 203.
53

SECTION 402. DISTRIBUTION FROM TRUST OR ESTATE. A fiduciary shall
allocate to income an amount received as a distribution of income, including a unitrust
distribution under [Article] 3, from a trust or estate in which the fiduciary has an interest, other
than an interest the fiduciary purchased in a trust that is an investment entity, and shall allocate to
principal an amount received as a distribution of principal from the trust or estate. If a fiduciary
purchases, or receives from a settlor, an interest in a trust that is an investment entity, Section
401, 415, or 416 applies to a receipt from the trust.
Comment to 1997 Act
Terms of the distributing trust or estate. Under this section, a fiduciary is to allocate
receipts in accordance with the terms of the recipient trust or, if there is no provision, in
accordance with this act. In determining whether a distribution from another trust or an estate is
income or principal, however, the fiduciary should also determine what the terms of the
distributing trust or estate say about the distribution – for example, whether they direct that the
distribution, even though made from the income of the distributing trust or estate, is to be added
to principal of the recipient trust. Such a provision should override the terms of this act, but if the
terms of the recipient trust contain a provision requiring such a distribution to be allocated to
income, the trustee may have to obtain a judicial resolution of the conflict between the terms of
the two documents.
Investment trusts. An investment entity to which the second sentence of this section
applies includes a mutual fund, a common trust fund, a business trust, or other entity organized
as a trust for the purpose of receiving capital contributed by investors, investing that capital, and
managing investment assets, including asset-backed security arrangements or similar
arrangements to which Section 415 or 416 applies. See John H. Langbein, The Secret Life of the
Trust: The Trust as an Instrument of Commerce, 107 Yale L.J. 165 (1997).
SECTION 403. BUSINESS OR OTHER ACTIVITY CONDUCTED BY
FIDUCIARY.
(a) This section applies to a business or other activity conducted by a fiduciary if the
fiduciary determines that it is in the interests of the beneficiaries to account separately for the
business or other activity instead of:
(1) accounting for the business or other activity as part of the fiduciary’s general
accounting records; or
54

(2) conducting the business or other activity through an entity described in
Section 401(a)(2)(A).
(b) A fiduciary may account separately under this section for the transactions of a
business or other activity, whether or not assets of the business or other activity are segregated
from other assets held by the fiduciary.
(c) A fiduciary that accounts separately under this section for a business or other activity:
(1) may determine:
(A) the extent to which the net cash receipts of the business or other
activity must be retained for:
(i) working capital;
(ii) the acquisition or replacement of fixed assets; and
(iii) other reasonably foreseeable needs of the business or other
activity; and
(B) the extent to which the remaining net cash receipts are accounted for
as principal or income in the fiduciary’s general accounting records for the trust;
(2) may make a determination under paragraph (1) separately and differently from
the fiduciary’s decisions concerning distributions of income or principal; and
(3) shall account for the net amount received from the sale of an asset of the
business or other activity, other than a sale in the ordinary course of the business or other activity,
as principal in the fiduciary’s general accounting records for the trust, to the extent the fiduciary
determines that the net amount received is no longer required in the conduct of the business or
other activity.
(d) Activities for which a fiduciary may account separately under this section include:
55

(1) retail, manufacturing, service, and other traditional business activities;
(2) farming;
(3) raising and selling livestock and other animals;
(4) managing rental properties;
(5) extracting minerals, water, and other natural resources;
(6) growing and cutting timber;
(7) an activity to which Section 414, 415, or 416 applies; and
(8) any other business conducted by the fiduciary.
Comment
Purpose and scope. Section 403 gives flexibility to a fiduciary who operates a business
or other activity in proprietorship form rather than, for example, in a wholly-owned corporation
or a single-member limited liability company, and enables the fiduciary to decide the extent to
which the net receipts from the activity should be allocated to income, just as the board of
directors of a corporation owned entirely by the trust would decide the amount of the annual
dividend to be paid to the trust. It permits a fiduciary to account for farming or livestock
operations, rental properties, oil and gas properties, timber operations, activities in derivatives
and options, and other business activities as though they were held and conducted by a separate
entity. Some of the wording of the descriptions of those business activities is changed to conform
to the wording in subsequent sections that address those activities specifically, including Sections
405, 411, and 412. Section 403, however, does not permit a fiduciary to account separately for a
traditional securities portfolio to avoid the provisions of this act that apply to such securities.
Section 403 permits the fiduciary to account separately for each business or activity for
which the fiduciary determines separate accounting is appropriate. A fiduciary may account for
these activities in a “subtrust” or may, for example, continue to use the business and record-
keeping methods employed by a decedent or settlor who had conducted the business. This
section gives the fiduciary broad authority to select business record-keeping methods that best
suit the activity in which the fiduciary is engaged.
If a fiduciary liquidates a sole proprietorship or other activity to which Section 403
applies, the proceeds would be added to principal, even though derived from the liquidation of
accounts receivable, because the proceeds would no longer be needed in the conduct of the
business. If the liquidation occurs during probate or during an income interest’s winding up
period, none of the proceeds would be income for purposes of Section 601.
Separate accounts. A fiduciary may or may not maintain separate bank accounts for
business activities that are accounted for under Section 403. A fiduciary, especially a fiduciary
that is continuing a decedent’s or settlor’s business practices, may continue the same banking
56

arrangements that were used during the decedent’s lifetime. In either case, the fiduciary is
authorized to decide to what extent cash is to be retained as part of the business assets and to
what extent it is to be transferred to the trust’s general accounts, either as income or principal.
Separate accounting. The 2018 Act adds subsection (c)(2) to the wording that was used
in the 1997 Act to accommodate the concept of “separate accounting” in a trust the only activity
of which (other than making distributions to beneficiaries) is the conduct of a business. It may
not be reasonable to assume that receipts not distributed to beneficiaries have been “retained” for
use in the business, if that permits discretionary distributions to beneficiaries, in effect, to define
trust income. That might be especially awkward if discretionary distributions of either income or
principal or both to multiple beneficiaries are not made pro rata. In such a case, the fiduciary is
permitted to designate which distributions in effect define trust income, and which distributions
are discretionary distributions under the terms of the trust not intended to be a standard or
precedent for defining income.
[PART] 2
RECEIPTS NOT NORMALLY APPORTIONED
SECTION 404. PRINCIPAL RECEIPTS. A fiduciary shall allocate to principal:
(1) to the extent not allocated to income under this [act], an asset received from:
(A) an individual during the individual’s lifetime;
(B) an estate;
(C) a trust on termination of an income interest; or
(D) a payor under a contract naming the fiduciary as beneficiary;
(2) except as otherwise provided in this [article], money or other property received from
the sale, exchange, liquidation, or change in form of a principal asset;
(3) an amount recovered from a third party to reimburse the fiduciary because of a
disbursement described in Section 502(a) or for another reason to the extent not based on loss of
income;
(4) proceeds of property taken by eminent domain, except that proceeds awarded for loss
of income in an accounting period are income if a current income beneficiary had a mandatory
income interest during the period;
57

(5) net income received in an accounting period during which there is no beneficiary to
which a fiduciary may or must distribute income; and
(6) other receipts as provided in [Part] 3.
Comment
Apportionment. Part 2, Receipts Not Normally Apportioned, generally addresses
receipts that are either income or income, while Part 3, Receipts Normally Apportioned,
generally addresses receipts that are “apportioned” part to income and part to principal. The act
generally uses the term “allocate” to refer to both.
Reimbursements. The 1997 Act limited the application of paragraph (3) to
reimbursements related to environmental matters described in Section 502(a)(8)(A), perhaps
because those are the disbursements listed in Section 502(a) that are most likely to be
reimbursable. But they are not necessarily the only disbursements in Section 502(a) that could be
reimbursed, and the 2018 Act cites only Section 502(a).
Eminent domain awards. Even though the award in an eminent domain proceeding may
include an amount for the loss of future rent on a lease, if that amount is not separately stated the
entire award is principal. This rule is the same in the 1931, 1962, and 1997 Acts.
SECTION 405. RENTAL PROPERTY. To the extent a fiduciary does not account for
the management of rental property as a business under Section 403, the fiduciary shall allocate to
income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for
cancellation or renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a
security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods:
(1) must be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease, except as
otherwise provided by law other than this [act]; and
(2) is not allocated to income or available for distribution to a beneficiary until the
fiduciary’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.
Comment
Receipts that are capital in nature. A portion of the payment under a lease may be a
reimbursement of principal expenditures for improvements to the leased property that is
characterized as rent for purposes of invoking contractual or statutory remedies for nonpayment.
If the trustee is accounting for rental income under Section 405, a transfer from income to
reimburse principal may be appropriate under Section 505 to the extent that some of the “rent” is
58

really a reimbursement for improvements. This set of facts could also be a relevant factor for a
trustee to consider under Section 203 in deciding whether and to what extent to make an
adjustment between principal and income under Section 203.
Available for distribution. The term “available for distribution to a beneficiary” in
paragraph (2), which the 2018 Act carries over from the 1997 Act, does not mean “allocated to
income.” That would be inconsistent with the requirement earlier in the sentence, also carried
over from the 1997 Act, that the receipt “must be added to principal.” To make that clear, the
words “allocated to income or” are added in the 2018 Act before “available for distribution.” The
concept is that deposits are held in the trust corpus, but will be allocated to income if and when
the tenant has the right to ask, and does ask, for those funds to be applied to future rent. In any
event, the applicable precondition – whether for application of the deposit to rent payments,
return of the deposit to the tenant, or allocation to income upon the tenant’s forfeiture – is the
satisfaction of the fiduciary’s contractual obligations with respect to that deposit, namely to hold
it until an objectively determined event or time.
SECTION 406. RECEIPT ON OBLIGATION TO BE PAID IN MONEY.
(a) This section does not apply to an obligation to which Section 409, 410, 411, 412, 414,
415, or 416 applies.
(b) A fiduciary shall allocate to income, without provision for amortization of premium,
an amount received as interest on an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary, including an
amount received as consideration for prepaying principal.
(c) A fiduciary shall allocate to principal an amount received from the sale, redemption,
or other disposition of an obligation to pay money to the fiduciary. A fiduciary shall allocate to
income the increment in value of a bond or other obligation for the payment of money bearing no
stated interest but payable or redeemable, at maturity or another future time, in an amount that
exceeds the amount in consideration of which it was issued.
Comment
Section 406 in the 2018 Act is largely similar to Section 406 in the 1997 Act, except that
Section 406(c) is reworded to follow New York’s statute (EPTL §11-A-4.6).
SECTION 407. INSURANCE POLICY OR CONTRACT.
(a) This section does not apply to a contract to which Section 409 applies.
59

(b)Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), a fiduciary shall allocate to principal
the proceeds of a life insurance policy or other contract received by the fiduciary as beneficiary,
including a contract that insures against damage to, destruction of, or loss of title to an asset. The
fiduciary shall allocate dividends on an insurance policy to income to the extent premiums on the
policy are paid from income and to principal to the extent premiums on the policy are paid from
principal.
(c)A fiduciary shall allocate to income proceeds of a contract that insures the fiduciary
against loss of:
(1)occupancy or other use by a current income beneficiary;
(2)income; or
(3)subject to Section 403, profits from a business.
[PART] 3
RECEIPTS NORMALLY APPORTIONED
SECTION 408. INSUBSTANTIAL ALLOCATION NOT REQUIRED.
(a) If a fiduciary determines that an allocation between income and principal required by
Section 409, 410, 411, 412, or 415 is insubstantial, the fiduciary may allocate the entire amount
to principal, unless Section 203(e) applies to the allocation.
(b)A fiduciary may presume an allocation is insubstantial under subsection (a) if:
(1)the amount of the allocation would increase or decrease net income in an
accounting period, as determined before the allocation, by less than 10 percent; and
(2)the asset producing the receipt to be allocated has a fair market value less than
10 percent of the total fair market value of the assets owned or held by the fiduciary at the
beginning of the accounting period.
60

(c)The power to make a determination under subsection (a) may be:
(1)exercised by a co-fiduciary in the manner described in Section 203(f); or
(2)released or delegated for a reason described in Section 203(g) and in the
manner described in Section 203(h).
Comment
The 2018 Act retains Section 408 from the 1997 Act, excusing a fiduciary from the
burden of determining the portion of a receipt that should be allocated to income if the allocation
would be “insubstantial.” A fiduciary might determine that an allocation would be
“insubstantial,” for example, if the cost of determining the amount of the allocation would be
greater than the economic effect of the allocation, or if such an allocation each year would create
a variability or unpredictability of the income stream that would offset any apparent precision
that the allocation might achieve.
Section 408(b) creates a safe harbor, within which a fiduciary may presume an allocation
to be insubstantial. In the 1997 Act, paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) were joined by the
conjunction “or.” The 2018 Act tightens up the resulting test, making it somewhat less generous
by changing the conjunction to “and.” As a practical matter, a fiduciary will have to estimate
such things and in a close case is not likely to know with certainty the parameters of subsection
(b)until after the end of the accounting period. But if the upper limits escape precision, or are not
even viewed as very important because most allocations viewed as insubstantial are well within
the limits, a fiduciary that simply does not bother with a small amount here and there is
protected.
The reference to Section 203(e) in Section 408(a) and the reference to Section 408 in
Section 203(e) mean that allocations cannot be overlooked under Section 408 if to do so would
create a tax issue or achieve another result listed in Section 203(e) or if the fiduciary is not an
independent person defined in Section 102(11).
Subsection (c) is drawn from the 1997 Act, except that delegation is added to release as
an option under paragraph (2).
SECTION 409. DEFERRED COMPENSATION, ANNUITY, OR SIMILAR
PAYMENT.
(a) In this section:
(1)“Internal income of a separate fund” means the amount determined under
subsection (b).
(2)“Marital trust” means a trust:
61

(A)of which the settlor’s surviving spouse is the only current income
beneficiary and is entitled to a distribution of all the current net income of the trust; and
(B)that qualifies for a marital deduction with respect to the settlor’s estate
under Section 2056 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section
2056[, as amended,] because:
(i)an election to qualify for a marital deduction under Section
2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2056(b)(7)[,
as amended,] has been made; or
(ii)the trust qualifies for a marital deduction under Section
2056(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 2056(b)(5)[,
as amended].
(3)“Payment” means an amount a fiduciary may receive over a fixed number of
years or during the life of one or more individuals because of services rendered or property
transferred to the payor in exchange for future amounts the fiduciary may receive. The term
includes an amount received in money or property from the payor’s general assets or from a
separate fund created by the payor.
(4)“Separate fund” includes a private or commercial annuity, an individual
retirement account, and a pension, profit-sharing, stock-bonus, or stock-ownership plan.
(b)For each accounting period, the following rules apply to a separate fund:
(1)The fiduciary shall determine the internal income of the separate fund as if the
separate fund were a trust subject to this [act].
(2) If the fiduciary cannot determine the internal income of the separate fund
under paragraph (1), the internal income of the separate fund is deemed to equal [insert a number
62

at least three and not more than five] percent of the value of the separate fund, according to the
most recent statement of value preceding the beginning of the accounting period.
(3) If the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the separate fund under
paragraph (2), the value of the separate fund is deemed to equal the present value of the expected
future payments, as determined under Section 7520 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986[, as
amended,] 26 U.S.C. Section 7520[, as amended], for the month preceding the beginning of the
accounting period for which the computation is made.
(c)A fiduciary shall allocate a payment received from a separate fund during an
accounting period to income, to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund during the
period, and the balance to principal.
(d)The fiduciary of a marital trust shall:
(1)withdraw from a separate fund the amount the current income beneficiary of
the trust requests the fiduciary to withdraw, not greater than the amount by which the internal
income of the separate fund during the accounting period exceeds the amount the fiduciary
otherwise receives from the separate fund during the period;
(2)transfer from principal to income the amount the current income beneficiary
requests the fiduciary to transfer, not greater than the amount by which the internal income of the
separate fund during the period exceeds the amount the fiduciary receives from the separate fund
during the period after the application of paragraph (1); and
(3)distribute to the current income beneficiary as income:
(A)the amount of the internal income of the separate fund received or
withdrawn during the period; and
(B)the amount transferred from principal to income under paragraph (2).
63

(e) For a trust, other than a marital trust, of which one or more current income
beneficiaries are entitled to a distribution of all the current net income, the fiduciary shall transfer
from principal to income the amount by which the internal income of a separate fund during the
accounting period exceeds the amount the fiduciary receives from the separate fund during the
period.
Legislative Note: A United States Code citation (U.S.C.) follows a reference to the federal
Internal Revenue Code in subsections (a)(2)(B) and (b)(3). The United States Code citation is
included as an aid to the reader. If the state’s convention is to omit the United States Code
citation, simply delete the United States Code citation. In states in which the constitution, or
other law, does not permit the phrase “as amended” when federal statutes are incorporated into
state law, the phrase should be omitted.
The bracketed words in subsection (b)(2) should be replaced with a percentage that fiduciaries
may rely on as a “safe harbor”. The 2008 revision to the Uniform Principal and Income Act
used the range of three to five percent because the Internal Revenue Service approved the use of
that range in the context of unitrusts. See Treasury Reg. Section 1.643(b)-1.
Comment
Section 409 of the 1997 Act was substantially amended in 2008 in response to concerns
expressed by the Internal Revenue Service about the eligibility of a transfer of an individual
retirement account (IRA) or other qualified retirement benefit to a marital trust intended to
qualify for an estate tax marital deduction. See Revenue Ruling 2006-26, 2006-22 Internal
Revenue Bulletin 939.
The 2018 Act further revises and simplifies Section 409. Former general subsections (b)
and (c) are omitted, leaving marital trusts as the focus. The 2018 Act treats marital trusts and
other trusts the same, except as provided in subsection (e).
Current subsection (b)(1) is similar to the first sentence of former subsection (f) relating
to the determination of the internal income of what is called in both acts a “separate fund” (such
as an IRA), and current subsection (b)(2) and (3) is similar to former subsection (g) relating to
the determination of data to use if the fiduciary cannot determine the internal income or the value
of the separate fund.
Former subsection (f) provided in full:
(f)A trustee shall determine the internal income of each separate fund for the
accounting period as if the separate fund were a trust subject to this [act]. Upon request of
the surviving spouse, the trustee shall demand that the person administering the separate
fund distribute the internal income to the trust. The trustee shall allocate a payment from
the separate fund to income to the extent of the internal income of the separate fund and
64

distribute that amount to the surviving spouse. The trustee shall allocate the balance of
the payment to principal. Upon request of the surviving spouse, the trustee shall allocate
principal to income to the extent the internal income of the separate fund exceeds
payments made from the separate fund to the trust during the accounting period.
Subsection (d) of the 2018 Act reaches the same result to satisfy the concerns of Revenue Ruling
2006-26, but clarifies the ordering and interrelationships of the respective provisions. Subsection
(d)prescribes what the fiduciary is required to do if the settlor’s surviving spouse requests. It
does not limit the fiduciary’s discretion to make withdrawals from the separate fund in excess of
what the spouse requests or in excess of the internal income of the fund.
For a trust that is not a marital trust but is required to distribute current income,
subsection (e) requires the fiduciary to transfer principal to income to make up for the amount of
the internal income of an IRA or similar fund that is not withdrawn. But it is silent on whether
the fiduciary should withdraw greater amounts from the fund, leaving that to the fiduciary’s
discretion guided by general fiduciary standards such as the standards set forth in Section 201(a).
SECTION 410. LIQUIDATING ASSET.
(a)In this section, “liquidating asset” means an asset whose value will diminish or
terminate because the asset is expected to produce receipts for a limited time. The term includes
a leasehold, patent, copyright, royalty right, and right to receive payments during a period of
more than one year under an arrangement that does not provide for the payment of interest on the
unpaid balance.
(b)This section does not apply to a receipt subject to Section 401, 409, 411, 412, 414,
415, 416, or 503.
(c)A fiduciary shall allocate:
(1)to income:
(A)a receipt produced by a liquidating asset, to the extent the receipt does
not exceed [insert a number at least three and not more than five] percent of the value of the
asset; or
(B)if the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the asset, 10 percent of
the receipt; and
65

(2)to principal, the balance of the receipt.
Legislative Note: The bracketed words in subsection (c)(1)(A) should be replaced with a
percentage that fiduciaries may rely on as a “safe harbor”. The 2008 revision to the Uniform
Principal and Income Act used the range of three to five percent because the Internal Revenue
Service approved the use of that range in the context of unitrusts. See Treasury Reg. Section
1.643(b)-1.
Comment
Previous Acts. As stated in a Comment to the 1997 Act, Section 11 of the 1962 Act
allocated receipts from “property subject to depletion” to income in an amount “not in excess of
5%” of the asset’s inventory value. The 1931 Act had a similar 5-percent rule that applied when
the trustee was under a duty to change the form of the investment. The 5-percent rule imposed on
a fiduciary the obligation to pay a fixed annuity to the current income beneficiary until the asset
was exhausted. Under both the 1931 and 1962 Acts, the balance of each year’s receipts was
added to principal.
A fixed payment can produce results that appear unfair. The remainder beneficiary
receives all of the receipts from unexpected growth in the asset, e.g., if royalties on a patent or
copyright increase significantly. Conversely, if the receipts diminish more rapidly than expected,
most of the amount received by the trust will be allocated to income and little to principal.
Moreover, if the annual payments remain the same for the life of the asset, the amount allocated
to principal will usually be less than the original inventory value. For these reasons, Section 410
of the 1997 Act abandoned the annuity approach of the 5-percent rule, but required that 10
percent of the receipts from a “liquidating asset” be allocated to income and the balance to
principal. The 2018 Act restores a variation of the annuity approach, with a range of 3 to 5
percent of the value of the asset consistent with other provisions in the act, and retains the 10-
percent-of-the-receipt rule for cases where the fiduciary cannot determine the value of the asset.
SECTION 411. MINERALS, WATER, AND OTHER NATURAL RESOURCES.
(a)To the extent a fiduciary does not account for a receipt from an interest in minerals,
water, or other natural resources as a business under Section 403, the fiduciary shall allocate the
receipt:
(1)to income, to the extent received:
(A)as delay rental or annual rent on a lease;
(B)as a factor for interest or the equivalent of interest under an agreement
creating a production payment; or
(C)on account of an interest in renewable water;
66

(2)to principal, if received from a production payment, to the extent paragraph
(1)(B) does not apply; or
(3)between income and principal equitably, to the extent received:
(A)on account of an interest in non-renewable water;
(B)as a royalty, shut-in-well payment, take-or-pay payment, or bonus; or
(C)from a working interest or any other interest not provided for in
paragraph (1) or (2) or subparagraph (A) or (B).
(b)This section applies to an interest owned or held by a fiduciary whether or not a
settlor was extracting minerals, water, or other natural resources before the fiduciary owned or
held the interest.
(c)An allocation of a receipt under subsection (a)(3) is presumed to be equitable if the
amount allocated to principal is equal to the amount allowed by the Internal Revenue Code of
1986[, as amended,] 26 U.S.C.[, as amended,] as a deduction for depletion of the interest.
(d)If a fiduciary owns or holds an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources
before [the effective date of this [act]], the fiduciary may allocate receipts from the interest as
provided in this section or in the manner used by the fiduciary before [the effective date of this
[act]]. If the fiduciary acquires an interest in minerals, water, or other natural resources on or
after [the effective date of this [act]], the fiduciary shall allocate receipts from the interest as
provided in this section.
Legislative Note: A United States Code citation (U.S.C.) follows a reference to the federal
Internal Revenue Code in subsection (c). The United States Code citation is included as an aid to
the reader. If the state’s convention is to omit the United States Code citation, simply delete the
United States Code citation. In states in which the constitution, or other law, does not permit the
phrase “as amended” when federal statutes are incorporated into state law, the phrase should
be omitted.
67

Comment
The 2018 Act adapts Section 411 from the Texas statute (Texas Trust Code Sec.
116.174). It is similar to Section 411 of the 1997 Act, except that it does not provide for a default
10-percent allocation to income, but provides that the allocation should be made “equitably,” and
then provides, in subsection (c), that an allocation to principal of the amount allowed by the
Internal Revenue Code as a depletion deduction is presumed to be equitable. For oil and gas
percentage depletion, that percentage has most recently been set at 15 percent. Cost depletion for
federal income tax purposes is also available as a safe harbor. Subsection (d) will protect a
fiduciary that is currently relying on the 10-percent rule.
In contrast to the 1997 Act, the 2018 Act changes the reference to “on the effective date
of this act” at the beginning of the first sentence of Section 411(d) to “before the effective date of
this act” to conform to that reference in the last part of that sentence. Similarly, the 2018 Act
changes the reference to “after the effective date of this act” in the second sentence of Section
411(d) to “on or after the effective date of this act” to make the two sentences complementary.
SECTION 412. TIMBER.
(a)To the extent a fiduciary does not account for receipts from the sale of timber and
related products as a business under Section 403, the fiduciary shall allocate the net receipts:
(1)to income, to the extent the amount of timber cut from the land does not
exceed the rate of growth of the timber;
(2)to principal, to the extent the amount of timber cut from the land exceeds the
rate of growth of the timber or the net receipts are from the sale of standing timber;
(3)between income and principal if the net receipts are from the lease of land
used for growing and cutting timber or from a contract to cut timber from land, by determining
the amount of timber cut from the land under the lease or contract and applying the rules in
paragraphs (1) and (2); or
(4)to principal, to the extent advance payments, bonuses, and other payments are
not allocated under paragraph (1), (2), or (3).
(b)In determining net receipts to be allocated under subsection (a), a fiduciary shall
deduct and transfer to principal a reasonable amount for depletion.
68

(c)This section applies to land owned or held by a fiduciary whether or not a settlor was
cutting timber from the land before the fiduciary owned or held the property.
(d)If a fiduciary owns or holds an interest in land used for growing and cutting timber
before [the effective date of this [act]], the fiduciary may allocate net receipts from the sale of
timber and related products as provided in this section or in the manner used by the fiduciary
before [the effective date of this [act]]. If the fiduciary acquires an interest in land used for
growing and cutting timber on or after [the effective date of this [act]], the fiduciary shall
allocate net receipts from the sale of timber and related products as provided in this section.
Comment
Section 412 is substantially the same in the 2018 Act as in the 1997 Act, except for
changes in wording to conform to wording used through the act. In addition, in contrast to the
1997 Act, as in Section 411(d), the 2018 Act changes the reference to “on the effective date of
this act” at the beginning of the first sentence of Section 412(d) to “before the effective date of
this act” to conform to that reference in the last part of that sentence, and changes the reference
to “after the effective date of this act” in the second sentence of Section 412(d) to “on or after the
effective date of this act” to make the two sentences complementary.
Although the previous acts do not have sections addressing every context where things
are grown – for example, agriculture, orchards, and cattle and poultry raising – in the way they
address timber, a fiduciary may be able to adapt the principles applicable to timber to those other
contexts, including the contexts of activities accounted for separately as businesses, as specified
in Section 403(d)(2) and (3).
Comment to 1997 Act
Scope of section. The rules in Section 412 apply to net receipts from the sale of trees and
by-products from harvesting and processing trees without regard to the kind of trees that are cut
or whether the trees are cut before or after a particular number of years of growth. The rules
apply to the sale of trees that are expected to produce lumber for building purposes, trees sold as
pulpwood, and Christmas and other ornamental trees. Subsection (a) applies to net receipts from
property owned by the trustee and property leased by the trustee. The act is not intended to
prevent a tenant in possession of the property from using wood that he cuts on the property for
personal, noncommercial purposes, such as a Christmas tree, firewood, mending old fences or
building new fences, or making repairs to structures on the property.
Under subsection (a), the amount of net receipts allocated to income depends upon
whether the amount of timber removed is more or less than the rate of growth. The method of
determining the amount of timber removed and the rate of growth is up to the trustee, based on
69

methods customarily used for the kind of timber involved.
SECTION 413. MARITAL DEDUCTION PROPERTY NOT PRODUCTIVE OF
INCOME.
(a)If a trust received property for which a gift or estate tax marital deduction was
allowed and the settlor’s spouse holds a mandatory income interest in the trust, the spouse may
require the trustee, to the extent the trust assets otherwise do not provide the spouse with
sufficient income from or use of the trust assets to qualify for the deduction, to:
(1)make property productive of income;
(2)convert property to property productive of income within a reasonable time; or
(3)exercise the power to adjust under Section 203.
(b)The trustee may decide which action or combination of actions in subsection (a) to
take.
Comment
In Section 413 the 2018 Act makes little substantive change from the 1997 Act. It omits
Section 413(b) of the 1997 Act, which had provided:
In a case not governed by subsection (a), proceeds from the sale or other disposition of an
asset are principal without regard to the amount of income the asset produces during any
accounting period.
Section 404(2) of the 2018 Act provides that proceeds from a sale or exchange of a principal
asset remain principal, which renders former Section 413(b) duplicative.
SECTION 414. DERIVATIVE OR OPTION.
(a)In this section, “derivative” means a contract, instrument, other arrangement, or
combination of contracts, instruments, or other arrangements, the value, rights, and obligations
of which are, in whole or in part, dependent on or derived from an underlying tangible or
intangible asset, group of tangible or intangible assets, index, or occurrence of an event. The term
includes stocks, fixed income securities, and financial instruments and arrangements based on
70

indices, commodities, interest rates, weather-related events, and credit-default events.
(b)To the extent a fiduciary does not account for a transaction in derivatives as a business
under Section 403, the fiduciary shall allocate 10 percent of receipts from the transaction and 10
percent of disbursements made in connection with the transaction to income and the balance to
principal.
(c)Subsection (d) applies if:
(1)a fiduciary:
(A)grants an option to buy property from a trust, whether or not the trust
owns the property when the option is granted;
(B)grants an option that permits another person to sell property to the
trust; or
(C)acquires an option to buy property for the trust or an option to sell an
asset owned by the trust; and
(2)the fiduciary or other owner of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the
option is exercised.
(d)If this subsection applies, the fiduciary shall allocate 10 percent to income and the
balance to principal of the following amounts:
(1)an amount received for granting the option;
(2)an amount paid to acquire the option; and
(3)gain or loss realized on the exercise, exchange, settlement, offset, closing, or
expiration of the option.
Comment
Section 414 in the 1997 Act provided that all receipts and disbursements from a
derivative and option must be allocated to principal.
71

In the 2018 Act, the definition of “derivative” includes some of the most common current
derivatives, including: (1) options, which provide one party the right but not the obligation to
buy or sell the underlying asset at a set price, (2) forwards and futures contracts, which obligate
one party to buy or sell the underlying asset at a set price in the future, and (3) swaps (sometimes
referred to as “notional principal contracts”), which obligate both parties to the arrangement to
make payments to the other party based on the change in value of an underlying asset or the
occurrence of an event. The definition is broad enough to include less common derivatives like
exchange-traded notes (financial instruments traded on an exchange, the values of which are
linked to the returns of hypothetical investments in specified market indices or strategies),
structured or principal-protected notes (financial instruments typically issued by a financial
organization that provide the holder some principal protection along with a return based on the
return of an underlying asset like a stock index), and derivatives that could be created in the
future. The definition does not make a distinction between derivatives that are privately
negotiated between a party and counterparty and those that are traded on an exchange or in the
over-the-counter market. Although options technically fall within the definition of derivative, as
in the 1997 Act a specific subsection makes clear that any amounts paid to or received by the
fiduciary in the granting of an option and any gain or loss upon any realization or expiration
event will be allocated to income and principal in the same manner.
The 2018 Act does not include a suggested provision that would have asked the fiduciary,
in allocating receipts or disbursements under a derivative contract to income or principal, to
consider how they would be allocated if the fiduciary had invested directly in the underlying
asset that is the subject of the derivative. For example, if a fiduciary entered into a total return
equity swap on shares of ABC stock, pursuant to which the fiduciary would receive payments
from the counterparty due to any dividends and appreciation on ABC stock, then the fiduciary
would have been asked to allocate to income that portion of the return that is due to dividends
and to principal that portion of the return that is due to appreciation of ABC stock. That sort of
determination, however, would work only for the simplest of derivative arrangements.
Derivatives allow parties to take positions in assets that would not be possible under an
established market and to make highly leveraged investments in assets that would not be
permitted under current margin regulations. Furthermore, derivatives are sometimes combined in
such a way that looking through to the underlying asset is difficult or impossible. For example, a
“swaption” is an option that provides the owner the right to enter into a swap. Because of these
complications, the 2018 Act provides a default rule that provides that all receipts and
disbursements in relation to a derivative transaction should be allocated 10 percent to income and
90 percent to principal. No distinction is made if the fiduciary establishes a long position
(generally seeking to profit from an increase in value of the underlying asset) or short position
(seeking to profit from a decrease in value of the underlying asset) with the derivative.
This default allocation for derivatives can be adjusted pursuant to the fiduciary’s power to
adjust between income and principal under Section 203. In making that determination, the
fiduciary can consider whether the default rule would not be fair and reasonable, especially in
light of the fact that derivatives can be used to create the equivalent return as another investment,
whose allocation under the act might be different from the default rule. For example, in a
traditional total return equity swap, one party (Party S, for Short) agrees to make annual
payments over the next 5 years in an amount equal to the sum of the total appreciation in value
of 100 shares of XYZ stock during the year, and dividends paid on 100 shares of XYZ stock
72

during the year. The counterparty (Party L, for Long) agrees to make five annual payments (at
the same time) in an amount equal to the total depreciation in value of 100 shares of XYZ stock
during the year, and a fixed rate of interest multiplied by the value of 100 shares of XYZ stock at
the beginning of each year. The amounts are netted against each other. From an economic
standpoint, Party L is in the same situation it would have been in if Party L had borrowed funds
from Party S and used those proceeds to buy 100 shares of XYZ shares from Party S, with an
agreement to sell the shares back to Party S at the end of the 5 year period (100-percent-
leveraged investment in 100 shares of XYZ shares).
Furthermore, the fiduciary should consider whether the derivative is being used as a way
to hedge or manage risk on another investment, and, as such, any receipts or disbursements on
the derivative should be combined with the hedged investment. For example, an investor may
have an investment (ABC stock) and use a derivative to hedge against a decrease in the
investment’s value (buy a put option on ABC stock). The fiduciary should consider whether the
cost or return on the put option is properly combined with the cost or return on ABC stock in
applying the default rule or making any adjustments to income or principal as to ABC stock.
As another example, the most common swap arrangement is an interest rate swap,
pursuant to which parties help manage the impact of changes in interest rates on investments in
the portfolio and liabilities associated with loans. In a common interest rate swap (floating-to-
fixed rate), one party agrees to make payments based on a fixed interest rate (for example, 5
percent) applied to a notional amount (for example, $1 million) at regular intervals (for example,
quarterly for two years). The counterparty agrees to make interest payments based on a floating
or variable rate of interest (for example, 3 percent above the London Interbank Offered Rate
[LIBOR]) applied to the same notional amount. An interest rate swap like this can reflect one
party’s expectation that the payments of a floating interest rate will exceed a specified fixed
interest rate (or vice versa). Importantly, to the extent such party has a loan or other liability tied
to a floating interest rate, the party might be seeking to hedge against the risk of an interest rate
increase by essentially converting the liability to a fixed rate liability. In deciding whether to use
the default rule or exercise the power to adjust, the fiduciary may decide, if appropriate, based on
the facts and circumstances, to apply the default rule as to the interest rate swap in isolation or as
part of a larger transaction where the swap should be considered in conjunction with a larger
transaction, liability, or investment.
SECTION 415. ASSET-BACKED SECURITY.
(a)Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a fiduciary shall allocate to income a
receipt from or related to an asset-backed security, to the extent the payor identifies the payment
as being from interest or other current return, and to principal the balance of the receipt.
(b)If a fiduciary receives one or more payments in exchange for part or all of the
fiduciary’s interest in an asset-backed security, including a liquidation or redemption of the
73

fiduciary’s interest in the security, the fiduciary shall allocate to income 10 percent of receipts
from the transaction and 10 percent of disbursements made in connection with the transaction,
and to principal the balance of the receipts and disbursements.
Comment
The primary changes to Section 415 in the 2018 Act include a more inclusive definition
of an asset-backed security that is in line with the definition used by the Securities and Exchange
Commission. The allocation retains the distinction between payments of interest and principal,
for example on a mortgage. Subsection (b) is simply a blanket rule of a 10-percent allocation for
any sales of a portion or all of the interest in the asset-backed security (consistently with Section
414). This rule applies to sales of the asset-backed security on an exchange or a
redemption/liquidation of the interest.
SECTION 416. OTHER FINANCIAL INSTRUMENT OR ARRANGEMENT. A
fiduciary shall allocate receipts from or related to a financial instrument or arrangement not
otherwise addressed by this [act]. The allocation must be consistent with Sections 414 and 415.
Comment
The 2018 Act adds Section 416 to provide guidance for financial instruments and
arrangements designed in the future, which could not be anticipated in advance. References to
Section 416, as appropriate, are added throughout the 2018 Act where there are references to
Sections 414 and 415.
[ARTICLE] 5
ALLOCATION OF DISBURSEMENTS
SECTION 501. DISBURSEMENT FROM INCOME. Subject to Section 504, and
except as otherwise provided in Section 601(c)(2) or (3), a fiduciary shall disburse from income:
(1)one-half of:
(A)the regular compensation of the fiduciary and any person providing
investment advisory, custodial, or other services to the fiduciary, to the extent income is
sufficient; and
(B)an expense for an accounting, judicial or nonjudicial proceeding, or other
matter that involves both income and successive interests, to the extent income is sufficient;
74

(2)the balance of the disbursements described in paragraph (1), to the extent a fiduciary
that is an independent person determines that making those disbursements from income would be
in the interests of the beneficiaries;
(3)another ordinary expense incurred in connection with administration, management, or
preservation of property and distribution of income, including interest, an ordinary repair,
regularly recurring tax assessed against principal, and an expense of an accounting, judicial or
nonjudicial proceeding, or other matter that involves primarily an income interest, to the extent
income is sufficient; and
(4)a premium on insurance covering loss of a principal asset or income from or use of
the asset.
Comment
Although the 2018 Act updates the choice of words and word order to match more recent
usage, there are few substantive changes in Article 5.
The phrase “to the extent income is sufficient” is added at the end of Section 501(1)(A)
and (B) and (3) to acknowledge and accommodate illiquid, low-income-producing trusts. And, as
that phrase protects income, paragraph (2) protects principal by allowing more than one-half of
the disbursements described in this section to be paid from income. One reason, for example,
would be that principal is illiquid. Reimbursements under Sections 504 and 505 may be
available.
SECTION 502. DISBURSEMENT FROM PRINCIPAL.
(a)Subject to Section 505, and except as otherwise provided in Section 601(c)(2), a
fiduciary shall disburse from principal:
(1)the balance of the disbursements described in Section 501(1) and (3), after
application of Section 501(2);
(2)the fiduciary’s compensation calculated on principal as a fee for acceptance,
distribution, or termination;
(3)a payment of an expense to prepare for or execute a sale or other disposition of
75

property;
(4) a payment on the principal of a trust debt;
(5) a payment of an expense of an accounting, judicial or nonjudicial proceeding,
or other matter that involves primarily principal, including a proceeding to construe the terms of
the trust or protect property;
(6) a payment of a premium for insurance, including title insurance, not described
in Section 501(4), of which the fiduciary is the owner and beneficiary;
(7) a payment of an estate or inheritance tax or other tax imposed because of the
death of a decedent, including penalties, apportioned to the trust; and
(8) a payment:
(A) related to environmental matters, including:
(i) reclamation;
(ii) assessing environmental conditions;
(iii) remedying and removing environmental contamination;
(iv) monitoring remedial activities and the release of substances;
(v) preventing future releases of substances;
(vi) collecting amounts from persons liable or potentially liable for
the costs of activities described in clauses (i) through (v);
(vii) penalties imposed under environmental laws or regulations;
(viii) other actions to comply with environmental laws or
regulations;
(ix) statutory or common law claims by third parties; and
(x) defending claims based on environmental matters; and
76

(B) for a premium for insurance for matters described in subparagraph
(A).
(b) If a principal asset is encumbered with an obligation that requires income from the
asset to be paid directly to a creditor, the fiduciary shall transfer from principal to income an
amount equal to the income paid to the creditor in reduction of the principal balance of the
obligation.
Comment
The 2018 Act replaces “the remaining one-half” at the beginning of Section 502(a)(1) in
the 1997 Act with “the balance.” This conforms to the changes to Section 501 that make it more
likely that traditional 50-50 splits will not necessarily be followed. Reimbursements under
Sections 504 and 505 may be available. A reference to title insurance is added to Section
502(a)(6).
The 1997 Act added the detailed provisions regarding environmental remediation in what
is now Section 502(a)(8)(A). The 2018 Act adds to those provisions a reference in subparagraph
(B) to insurance premiums.
SECTION 503. TRANSFER FROM INCOME TO PRINCIPAL FOR
DEPRECIATION.
(a) In this section, “depreciation” means a reduction in value due to wear, tear, decay,
corrosion, or gradual obsolescence of a tangible asset having a useful life of more than one year.
(b) A fiduciary may transfer to principal a reasonable amount of the net cash receipts
from a principal asset that is subject to depreciation, but may not transfer any amount for
depreciation:
(1) of the part of real property used or available for use by a beneficiary as a
residence;
(2) of tangible personal property held or made available for the personal use or
enjoyment of a beneficiary; or
(3) under this section, to the extent the fiduciary accounts:
77

(A) under Section 410 for the asset; or
(B) under Section 403 for the business or other activity in which the asset
is used.
(c) An amount transferred to principal under this section need not be separately held.
Comment
The 2018 Act changes “fixed” to “tangible” in the definition of depreciation in Section
503(a). The references to “a residence” and “tangible personal property” in Section 503(b)(1) are
broken up into paragraphs (1) and (2), for ease of reading, and to avoid implying that the two
topics are linked so that, for example, the tangible personal property described must be
household furnishings. The 2018 Act also adds Section 503(b)(3)(A) to expand the exception
from the depreciation rule to assets accounted for separately as liquidating assets under Section
410, as well in a business under Section 403.
SECTION 504. REIMBURSEMENT OF INCOME FROM PRINCIPAL.
(a) If a fiduciary makes or expects to make an income disbursement described in
subsection (b), the fiduciary may transfer an appropriate amount from principal to income in one
or more accounting periods to reimburse income.
(b) To the extent the fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a
third party, income disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include:
(1) an amount chargeable to principal but paid from income because principal is
illiquid;
(2) a disbursement made to prepare property for sale, including improvements and
commissions; and
(3) a disbursement described in Section 502(a).
(c) If an asset whose ownership gives rise to an income disbursement becomes subject to
a successive interest after an income interest ends, the fiduciary may continue to make transfers
under subsection (a).
78

Comment
Section 504, Transfers from Income to Reimburse Principal, in the 1997 Act is
redesignated Section 505, Reimbursement of Principal from Income, in the 2018 Act. New
Section 504, Reimbursement of Income from Principal, is the mirror image of Section 505, with
the result that reimbursements in both directions are now covered in the same way. Cross-
references to these sections are added at the beginning of Sections 501 and 502. The order of
Sections 504 and 505 was selected with reference to the corresponding Sections 501 and 502.
Section 501 is “Subject to Section 504,” and Section 502 is “Subject to Section 505.”
The term “successive income interest” in Section 504(c) of the 1997 Act is changed to
simply “successive interest” in Sections 504(c) and 505(c) of the 2018 Act, because that is now
the defined term in Section 102(20). Even though a “successive interest” includes the interest of
a person entitled to receive principal – that is, a remainder beneficiary – when an income interest
ends, that does not mean that Section 504 or 505 would continue to apply after a trust terminates,
because the terms of the trust providing for termination would control under Section 201(a)(3).
SECTION 505. REIMBURSEMENT OF PRINCIPAL FROM INCOME.
(a)If a fiduciary makes or expects to make a principal disbursement described in
subsection (b), the fiduciary may transfer an appropriate amount from income to principal in one
or more accounting periods to reimburse principal or provide a reserve for future principal
disbursements.
(b)To the extent a fiduciary has not been and does not expect to be reimbursed by a third
party, principal disbursements to which subsection (a) applies include:
(1)an amount chargeable to income but paid from principal because income is not
sufficient;
(2)the cost of an improvement to principal, whether a change to an existing asset
or the construction of a new asset, including a special assessment;
(3)a disbursement made to prepare property for rental, including tenant
allowances, leasehold improvements, and commissions;
(4)a periodic payment on an obligation secured by a principal asset, to the extent
the amount transferred from income to principal for depreciation is less than the periodic
79

payment; and
(5)a disbursement described in Section 502(a).
(c)If an asset whose ownership gives rise to a principal disbursement becomes subject to
a successive interest after an income interest ends, the fiduciary may continue to make transfers
under subsection (a).
SECTION 506. INCOME TAXES.
(a)A tax required to be paid by a fiduciary which is based on receipts allocated to income
must be paid from income.
(b)A tax required to be paid by a fiduciary which is based on receipts allocated to
principal must be paid from principal, even if the tax is called an income tax by the taxing
authority.
(c)Subject to subsection (d) and Sections 504, 505, and 507, a tax required to be paid by
a fiduciary on a share of an entity’s taxable income in an accounting period must be paid from:
(1)income and principal proportionately to the allocation between income and
principal of receipts from the entity in the period; and
(2)principal to the extent the tax exceeds the receipts from the entity in the
period.
(d)After applying subsections (a) through (c), a fiduciary shall adjust income or principal
receipts, to the extent the taxes the fiduciary pays are reduced because of a deduction for a
payment made to a beneficiary.
Comment
Marital deduction issues. Any payment of income tax from income could raise issues of
the estate or gift tax marital deduction, especially if the income on which that income tax is paid
is not fully distributed, as in the case of income retained in an entity owned in whole or in part by
the trust. These issues are similar to the issues raised by Revenue Ruling 2006-26 in the context
of defined contribution qualified retirement plans and individual retirement accounts (IRAs). See
80

Section 409 and the Comment thereto. The 2018 Act makes no change to Section 506 because
the power in the spouse to cause the trust assets to be made reasonably productive of income
addresses any marital deduction issue. See Section 413.
Comment to 2008 Amendments of 1997 Act
Taxes on Undistributed Entity Taxable Income. When a nongrantor trust owns an
interest in a pass-through entity, such as a partnership or S corporation, it must report its share of
the entity’s taxable income regardless of how much the entity distributes to the trust. Whether the
entity distributes more or less than the trust’s tax on its share of the entity’s taxable income, the
trust must pay the taxes and allocate them between income and principal.
Subsection (c) requires the trust to pay the taxes on its share of an entity’s taxable income
from income or principal receipts to the extent that receipts from the entity are allocable to each.
This assures the trust a source of cash to pay some or all of the taxes on its share of the entity’s
taxable income. Subsection (d) recognizes that, except in the case of an Electing Small Business
Trust (ESBT), a trust normally receives a deduction for amounts distributed to a beneficiary.
Accordingly, subsection (d) requires the trust to increase receipts payable to a beneficiary as
determined under subsection (c) to the extent the trust’s taxes are reduced by distributing those
receipts to the beneficiary.
Because the trust’s taxes and amounts distributed to a beneficiary are interrelated, the
trust may be required to apply a formula to determine the correct amount payable to a
beneficiary. This formula should take into account that each time a distribution is made to a
beneficiary, the trust taxes are reduced and amounts distributable to a beneficiary are increased.
The formula assures that after deducting distributions to a beneficiary, the trust has enough to
satisfy its taxes on its share of the entity’s taxable income as reduced by distributions to
beneficiaries.
Example (1) – Trust T receives a Schedule K-1 from Partnership P reflecting taxable
income of $1 million. Partnership P distributes $100,000 to T, which allocates the receipts to
income. Both Trust T and income Beneficiary B are in the 35 percent tax bracket.
Trust T’s tax on $1 million of taxable income is $350,000. Under Subsection (c) T’s tax must be
paid from income receipts because receipts from the entity are allocated only to income.
Therefore, T must apply the entire $100,000 of income receipts to pay its tax. In this case,
Beneficiary B receives nothing.
Example (2) – Trust T receives a Schedule K-1 from Partnership P reflecting taxable
income of $1 million. Partnership P distributes $500,000 to T, which allocates the receipts to
income. Both Trust T and income Beneficiary B are in the 35 percent tax bracket.
Trust T’s tax on $1 million of taxable income is $350,000. Under Subsection (c), T’s tax must be
paid from income receipts because receipts from P are allocated only to income. Therefore, T
uses $350,000 of the $500,000 to pay its taxes and distributes the remaining $150,000 to B. The
$150,000 payment to B reduces T’s taxes by $52,500, which it must pay to B. But the $52,500
further reduces T’s taxes by $18,375, which it also must pay to B. In fact, each time T makes a
distribution to B, its taxes are further reduced, causing another payment to be due B.
81

Alternatively, T can apply the following algebraic formula to determine the amount
payable to B:
D = (C-R×K)/(1-R)
D = Distribution to income beneficiary
C = Cash paid by the entity to the trust
R = tax rate on income
K = entity’s K-1 taxable income
Applying the formula to Example (2) above, Trust T must pay $230,769 to B so that after
deducting the payment, T has exactly enough to pay its tax on the remaining taxable income
from P.
Taxable Income per K-1 $1,000,000
Payment to beneficiary 230,769
Trust Taxable Income $ 769,231
35 percent tax 269,231
Partnership Distribution $ 500,000
Fiduciary’s Tax Liability (269,231)
Payable to the Beneficiary $ 230,769
The “payment to beneficiary” is calculated as (C-R×K)/(1-R) = (500,000-0.35×1,000,000)/(1-
0.35) = (500,000-350,000)/(1-0.35) = 150,000/0.65 = $230,769 (where C is the cash distributed
by the entity, R is the trust ordinary tax rate (35%), and K is the entity’s K-1 taxable income).
In addition, B will report $230,769 on his or her own personal income tax return, paying
taxes of $80,769. Because Trust T withheld $269,231 to pay its taxes and B paid $80,769 taxes
of its own, B bore the entire $350,000 tax burden on the $1 million of entity taxable income,
including the $500,000 that the entity retained that presumably increased the value of the trust’s
investment entity.
If a trustee determines that it is appropriate to so, it should consider exercising the
discretion granted in RUPIA section 506 [now 507] to adjust between income and principal.
Alternatively, the trustee may exercise the power to adjust under RUPIA section 104 [now 203]
to the extent it is available and appropriate under the circumstances, including whether a future
distribution from the entity that would be allocated to principal should be reallocated to income
because the income beneficiary already bore the burden of taxes on the reinvested income. In
exercising the power, the trust should consider the impact that future distributions will have on
any current adjustments.
SECTION 507. ADJUSTMENT BETWEEN INCOME AND PRINCIPAL
BECAUSE OF TAXES.
(a)A fiduciary may make an adjustment between income and principal to offset the
shifting of economic interests or tax benefits between current income beneficiaries and successor
82

beneficiaries which arises from:
(1)an election or decision the fiduciary makes regarding a tax matter, other than a
decision to claim an income tax deduction to which subsection (b) applies;
(2)an income tax or other tax imposed on the fiduciary or a beneficiary as a result
of a transaction involving the fiduciary or a distribution by the fiduciary; or
(3)ownership by the fiduciary of an interest in an entity a part of whose taxable
income, whether or not distributed, is includable in the taxable income of the fiduciary or a
beneficiary.
(b)If the amount of an estate tax marital or charitable deduction is reduced because a
fiduciary deducts an amount paid from principal for income tax purposes instead of deducting it
for estate tax purposes and, as a result, estate taxes paid from principal are increased and income
taxes paid by the fiduciary or a beneficiary are decreased, the fiduciary shall charge each
beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax to reimburse the principal from which
the increase in estate tax is paid. The total reimbursement must equal the increase in the estate
tax, to the extent the principal used to pay the increase would have qualified for a marital or
charitable deduction but for the payment. The share of the reimbursement for each fiduciary or
beneficiary whose income taxes are reduced must be the same as its share of the total decrease in
income tax.
(c)A fiduciary that charges a beneficiary under subsection (b) may offset the charge by
obtaining payment from the beneficiary, withholding an amount from future distributions to the
beneficiary, or adopting another method or combination of methods.
Comment
Mandatory adjustments. The adjustments addressed by Section 507 are derived from
the history of “equitable adjustments” largely associated with New York case law. For example,
Matter of Warms, 140 N.Y.S.2d 169 (1955), involved estate administration expenses chargeable
83

to principal that are allowed as either estate tax deductions or income tax deductions. If the items
are claimed as income tax deductions and benefit income, Warms requires income to reimburse
principal for any increased estate taxes. The Warms adjustment has been codified in some states,
including New York in EPTL §11-2.1(a).
Subsection (b), which requires reimbursement of principal from income, is derived from
New York’s EPTL §11-2.1(a). Unlike the New York statute, however, it limits the mandatory
reimbursement to cases in which a marital or charitable deduction is reduced by the payment of
additional estate taxes because of the fiduciary’s income tax election. It is intended to preserve
the result reached in Estate of Britenstool v. Commissioner, 46 T.C. 711 (1966), in which the
United States Tax Court held that a reimbursement required by the predecessor of EPTL §11-
2.1(a) preserved for the estate the same charitable deduction it would have received if the
administration expenses had been deducted for estate tax purposes instead of for income tax
purposes. Because a fiduciary will typically elect to deduct administration expenses for income
tax purposes only when the income tax reduction exceeds the estate tax reduction, the effect of
this adjustment is that principal is placed in the same position it would have occupied if the
fiduciary had deducted the expenses for estate tax purposes, but the income beneficiaries still
receive the additional benefit of the difference in the benefit of the two deductions. For example,
if the income tax benefit from the deduction is $30,000 and the estate tax benefit would have
been $20,000, principal will be reimbursed by $20,000 and the net benefit to the income
beneficiaries will be $10,000.
Other adjustments. A second occasion for adjustment is a “trapping distribution” – a
distribution of principal that carries out income for income tax purposes. Matter of Holloway, 68
Misc.2d 361, 327 N.Y.S.2d 865 (1972), held that a trust that made a trapping distribution must
reimburse principal for the income taxes resulting from the distribution.
A third adjustment context arises when a trust’s deductible expenses chargeable to
principal reduce distributable net income and the taxable income of an income beneficiary, and
the trust has taxable gains. Must income reimburse principal for the capital gains taxes that
would have been saved if the expenses were used to reduce the gains? A Pennsylvania case, Rice
Estate, 8 Pa. D&C2d 379 (1956), required an adjustment, but a New York case, Matter of Dick,
29 Misc.2d 648, 218 N.Y.S.2d 182 (1961), and a Massachusetts case, New England Merchants
Nat’l Bank v. Converse, 373 Mass. 639, 369 N.E.2d 982 (1972), rejected an adjustment. A
similar New York case, Matter of Pross, 90 Misc.2d 895, 396 N.Y.S.2d 309 (1978), required an
adjustment from income to principal when a capital gain on a sale of real property resulted from
a depreciation deduction that had benefitted the income beneficiary of the trust by reducing
distributable net income.
Subsection (a) allows adjustments in cases like these, in the fiduciary’s discretion
(recognizing that local case law and statutory law, other than this Act, may require the exercise
of that discretion under this Act).
Changes in the 2018 Act. Section 506(b) of the 1997 Act required that “each estate,
trust, or beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax shall reimburse the principal
from which the increase in estate tax is paid.” The 2018 Act changes this, in Section 507(b), to
“the fiduciary shall charge each beneficiary that benefits from the decrease in income tax to
84

reimburse the principal from which the increase in estate tax is paid” and adds subsection (c) to
provide the fiduciary with options for accomplishing the “reimbursement” objective. One option
in subsection (c) remains “obtaining payment from the beneficiary,” but the possibly more
practical option of withholding amounts from future distributions is also included.
[ARTICLE] 6
DEATH OF INDIVIDUAL OR TERMINATION OF INCOME INTEREST
SECTION 601. DETERMINATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF NET INCOME.
(a)This section applies when:
(1)the death of an individual results in the creation of an estate or trust; or
(2)an income interest in a trust terminates, whether the trust continues or is
distributed.
(b)A fiduciary of an estate or trust with an income interest that terminates shall
determine, under subsection [(g)][(e)] and [Articles] 4, 5, and 7, the amount of net income and
net principal receipts received from property specifically given to a beneficiary. The fiduciary
shall distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary that is to receive the
specific property.
(c)A fiduciary shall determine the income and net income of an estate or income interest
in a trust which terminates, other than the amount of net income determined under subsection
(b), under [Articles] 4, 5, and 7 and by:
(1)including in net income all income from property used or sold to discharge
liabilities;
(2)paying from income or principal, in the fiduciary’s discretion, fees of
attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries, court costs and other expenses of administration, and
interest on estate and inheritance taxes and other taxes imposed because of the decedent’s death,
but the fiduciary may pay the expenses from income of property passing to a trust for which the
85

fiduciary claims a federal estate tax marital or charitable deduction only to the extent:
(A) the payment of the expenses from income will not cause the reduction
or loss of the deduction; or
(B) the fiduciary makes an adjustment under Section 507(b); and
(3) paying from principal other disbursements made or incurred in connection
with the settlement of the estate or the winding up of an income interest that terminates,
including:
(A) to the extent authorized by the decedent’s will, the terms of the trust,
or applicable law, debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, family allowances, estate and
inheritance taxes, and other taxes imposed because of the decedent’s death; and
(B) related penalties that are apportioned, by the decedent’s will, the terms
of the trust, or applicable law, to the estate or income interest that terminates.
[(d) If a decedent’s will, the terms of a trust, or applicable law provides for the payment
of interest or the equivalent of interest to a beneficiary that receives a pecuniary amount outright,
the fiduciary shall make the payment from net income determined under subsection (c) or from
principal to the extent net income is insufficient.
(e) If a beneficiary is to receive a pecuniary amount outright from a trust after an income
interest ends because of an income beneficiary’s death, and no payment of interest or the
equivalent of interest is provided for by the terms of the trust or applicable law, the fiduciary
shall pay the interest or the equivalent of interest to which the beneficiary would be entitled
under applicable law if the pecuniary amount were required to be paid under a will.]
[(f)][(d)] A fiduciary shall distribute net income[ remaining after payments required by
subsections (d) and (e)] in the manner described in Section 602 to all other beneficiaries,
86

including a beneficiary that receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the beneficiary holds an
unqualified power to withdraw assets from the trust or other presently exercisable general power
of appointment over the trust.
[(g)][(e)] A fiduciary may not reduce principal or income receipts from property
described in subsection (b) because of a payment described in Section 501 or 502, to the extent
the decedent’s will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the
payment from assets other than the property or to the extent the fiduciary recovers or expects to
recover the payment from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from the property
must be determined by including the amount the fiduciary receives or pays regarding the
property, whether the amount accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of the
decedent’s death or an income interest’s terminating event, and making a reasonable provision
for an amount the estate or income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is
distributed.
Legislative Note: If state law already provides for interest on payments from a trust on the death
of an income beneficiary, delete or modify subsections (d) and (e). If subsections (d) and (e) are
not deleted, use the subsection reference in the first set of brackets in subsections (b), (f), and (g).
If subsections (d) and (e) are deleted, use the subsection reference in the second set of brackets in
subsection (b) and redesignated subsections (d) and (e), and delete the words in brackets in
redesignated subsection (d).
Comment
Article 6 of the 2018 Act, Death of Decedent or Termination of Income Interest, is not
greatly changed from Article 2 of the 1997 Act, Decedent’s Estate or Terminating Income
Interest. Paragraph (3) of Section 201 of the 1997 Act, addressing the payment of interest on
pecuniary bequests or pecuniary amounts payable by a trust (explained below in the paragraph
captioned “Interest on pecuniary amounts”), is divided into two optional subsections (d) and (e)
of Section 601 in the 2018 Act. As explained in the Legislative Note, a state may use these
subsections if it has no other provision for payment of interest on pecuniary amounts received
from a trust. In that case, subsection (e) will provide that interest is payable on pecuniary
amounts received from a trust in the same manner as state law otherwise provides in the case of
pecuniary bequests under a will, and subsection (d) will provide that all such interest payments
are made from income to the extent income is sufficient. If state law already provides for the
payment of interest on pecuniary amounts received from a trust, subsections (d) and (e) may be
87

modified or omitted.
The Treasury Regulations contemplated by the Comment to the 1997 Act to respond to
the Supreme Court’s decision in Commissioner v. Estate of Hubert, 520 U.S. 93 (1997), were
added in 1999 as Treasury Regs. §§20.2056(b)-4(d), 20.2055-3(b), and 20.2013-4(b)(3).
Comment to 1997 Act
Terminating income interests and successive income interests. A trust that provides for
a single income beneficiary and an outright distribution of the remainder ends when the income
interest ends. A more complex trust may have a number of income interests, either concurrent or
successive, and the trust will not necessarily end when one of the income interests ends. For that
reason, the Act speaks in terms of income interests ending and beginning rather than trusts
ending and beginning. When an income interest in a trust ends, the trustee’s powers continue
during the winding up period required to complete its administration. A terminating income
interest is one that has ended but whose administration is not complete.
If two or more people are given the right to receive specified percentages or fractions of
the income from a trust concurrently and one of the concurrent interests ends, e.g., when a
beneficiary dies, the beneficiary’s income interest ends but the trust does not. Similarly, when a
trust with only one income beneficiary ends upon the beneficiary’s death, the trust instrument
may provide that part or all of the trust assets shall continue in trust for another income
beneficiary. While it is common to think and speak of this (and even to characterize it in a trust
instrument) as a “new” trust, it is a continuation of the original trust for a remainder beneficiary
who has an income interest in the trust assets instead of the right to receive them outright. For
purposes of this Act, this is a successive income interest in the same trust. The fact that a trust
may or may not end when an income interest ends is not significant for purposes of this Act.
If the assets that are subject to a terminating income interest pass to another trust because
the income beneficiary exercises a general power of appointment over the trust assets, the
recipient trust would be a new trust; and if they pass to another trust because the beneficiary
exercises a nongeneral power of appointment over the trust assets, the recipient trust might be a
new trust in some States (see 5A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts
§ 640, at 483 (4th ed. 1989)); but for purposes of this Act a new trust created in these
circumstances is also a successive income interest.
Gift of a pecuniary amount. Section 201(3) and (4) [now 601(d) through (f)] provide
different rules for an outright gift of a pecuniary amount and a gift in trust of a pecuniary
amount; this is the same approach used in Section 5(b)(2) of the 1962 Act.
Interest on pecuniary amounts. Section 201(3) [now 601(d) and (e)] provides that the
beneficiary of an outright pecuniary amount is to receive the interest or other amount provided
by applicable law if there is no provision in the will or the terms of the trust. Many States have
no applicable law that provides for interest or some other amount to be paid on an outright
pecuniary gift under an inter vivos trust; this section provides that in such a case the interest or
other amount to be paid shall be the same as the interest or other amount required to be paid on
testamentary pecuniary gifts. This provision is intended to accord gifts under inter vivos
88

instruments the same treatment as testamentary gifts. The various state authorities that provide
for the amount that a beneficiary of an outright pecuniary amount is entitled to receive are
collected in Richard B. Covey, Marital Deduction and Credit Shelter Dispositions and the Use of
Formula Provisions, App. B (4th ed. 1997).
Administration expenses and interest on death taxes. Under Section 201(2)(B) [now
601(c)(2)] a fiduciary may pay administration expenses and interest on death taxes from either
income or principal. An advantage of permitting the fiduciary to choose the source of the
payment is that, if the fiduciary’s decision is consistent with the decision to deduct these
expenses for income tax purposes or estate tax purposes, it eliminates the need to adjust between
principal and income that may arise when, for example, an expense that is paid from principal is
deducted for income tax purposes or an expense that is paid from income is deducted for estate
tax purposes.
The United States Supreme Court has considered the question of whether an estate tax
marital deduction or charitable deduction should be reduced when administration expenses are
paid from income produced by property passing in trust for a surviving spouse or for charity and
deducted for income tax purposes. The Court rejected the IRS position that administration
expenses properly paid from income under the terms of the trust or state law must reduce the
amount of a marital or charitable transfer, and held that the value of the transferred property is
not reduced for estate tax purposes unless the administration expenses are material in light of the
income the trust corpus could have been expected to generate. Commissioner v. Estate of Otis C.
Hubert, 117 S. Ct. 1124 (1997). The provision in Section 201(2)(B) [now 601(c)(2)] permits a
fiduciary to pay and deduct administration expenses from income only to the extent that it will
not cause the reduction or loss of an estate tax marital or charitable deduction, which means that
the limit on the amount payable from income will be established eventually by Treasury
Regulations.
SECTION 602. DISTRIBUTION TO SUCCESSOR BENEFICIARY.
(a) Except to the extent [Article] 3 applies for a beneficiary that is a trust, each
beneficiary described in Section [601(f)][601(d)] is entitled to receive a share of the net income
equal to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of
the distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to
which this section applies, each beneficiary, including a beneficiary that does not receive part of
the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to a share of the net income the fiduciary
received after the decedent’s death, an income interest’s other terminating event, or the preceding
distribution by the fiduciary.
(b) In determining a beneficiary’s share of net income under subsection (a), the following
89

rules apply:
(1) The beneficiary is entitled to receive a share of the net income equal to the
beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before the
distribution date.
(2) The beneficiary’s fractional interest under paragraph (1) must be calculated:
(A) on the aggregate value of the assets as of the distribution date without
reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation; and
(B) without regard to:
(i) property specifically given to a beneficiary under the decedent’s
will or the terms of the trust; and
(ii) property required to pay pecuniary amounts not in trust.
(3) The distribution date under paragraph (1) may be the date as of which the
fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on which the
assets are distributed.
(c) To the extent a fiduciary does not distribute under this section all the collected but
undistributed net income to each beneficiary as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain
records showing the interest of each beneficiary in the net income.
(d) If this section applies to income from an asset, a fiduciary may apply the rules in this
section to net gain or loss realized from the disposition of the asset after the decedent’s death, an
income interest’s terminating event, or the preceding distribution by the fiduciary.
Legislative Note: If subsections (d) and (e) of Section 601 are deleted, use the subsection
reference in the second set of brackets in subsection (a).
Comment
Section 202(a) of the 1997 Act ended with a reference to “the net income the fiduciary
has received after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date but has not
90

distributed as of the current distribution date.” The 2018 Act changes this, in Section 602(a), to
“a share of the net income the fiduciary received after the decedent’s death, an income interest’s
other terminating event, or the preceding distribution by the fiduciary.” “The preceding
distribution by the fiduciary” will prevent the possible misunderstanding that “earlier distribution
date,” in context, refers to a distribution date earlier than “the date of death or terminating
event.” So-called “stub income” between the last distribution date and the date of death is
addressed in Section 703(b). The former words “but has not distributed as of the current
distribution date” are not needed because Section 602(c) makes it clear that the fiduciary must
account for all undistributed income.
Section 602(b)(2)(B) excludes specific bequests in kind and pecuniary bequests (and
comparable distributions from a trust) from the calculation of a beneficiary’s fractional interest
of undistributed principal assets for purposes of allocating income to that beneficiary. If the
beneficiary is entitled to statutory interest on any such bequest, that interest is not income subject
to allocation under this section, and that bequest does not share in the income earned by the other
assets.
Section 602(a) includes an exception for the portion of an estate or trust that is treated as
a unitrust under new Article 3.
Comment to 1997 Act
Relationship to prior Acts. Section 202 [now 602] retains the concept in Section 5(b)(2)
of the 1962 Act that the residuary legatees of estates are to receive net income earned during the
period of administration on the basis of their proportionate interests in the undistributed assets
when distributions are made. It changes the basis for determining their proportionate interests by
using asset values as of a date reasonably near the time of distribution instead of inventory
values; it extends the application of these rules to distributions from terminating trusts; and it
extends these rules to gain or loss realized from the disposition of assets during administration.
[ARTICLE] 7
APPORTIONMENT AT BEGINNING AND END OF INCOME INTEREST
SECTION 701. WHEN RIGHT TO INCOME BEGINS AND ENDS.
(a)An income beneficiary is entitled to net income in accordance with the terms of the
trust from the date an income interest begins. The income interest begins on the date specified in
the terms of the trust or, if no date is specified, on the date an asset becomes subject to:
(1)the trust for the current income beneficiary; or
(2)a successive interest for a successor beneficiary.
(b)An asset becomes subject to a trust under subsection (a)(1):
91

(1) for an asset that is transferred to the trust during the settlor’s life, on the date
the asset is transferred;
(2) for an asset that becomes subject to the trust because of a decedent’s death, on
the date of the decedent’s death, even if there is an intervening period of administration of the
decedent’s estate; or
(3) for an asset that is transferred to a fiduciary by a third party because of a
decedent’s death, on the date of the decedent’s death.
(c) An asset becomes subject to a successive interest under subsection (a)(2) on the day
after the preceding income interest ends, as determined under subsection (d), even if there is an
intervening period of administration to wind up the preceding income interest.
(d) An income interest ends on the day before an income beneficiary dies or another
terminating event occurs or on the last day of a period during which there is no beneficiary to
which a fiduciary may or must distribute income.
Comment
Article 7 of the 2018 Act, Apportionment at Beginning and End of Income Interest,
corresponds to Article 3 of the 1997 Act, with the same title. There is no substantive change in
Section 701 (previously Section 301).
Comment to 1997 Act
Period during which there is no beneficiary. The purpose of the second part of
subsection (d) is to provide that, at the end of a period during which there is no beneficiary to
whom a trustee may distribute income, the trustee must apply the same apportionment rules that
apply when a mandatory income interest ends. This provision would apply, for example, if a
settlor creates a trust for grandchildren before any grandchildren are born. When the first
grandchild is born, the period preceding the date of birth is treated as having ended, followed by
a successive income interest, and the apportionment rules in Sections 302 and 303 [now 702 and
703] apply accordingly if the terms of the trust do not contain different provisions.
92

SECTION 702. APPORTIONMENT OF RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS
WHEN DECEDENT DIES OR INCOME INTEREST BEGINS.
(a) A fiduciary shall allocate an income receipt or disbursement, other than a receipt to
which Section 601(b) applies, to principal if its due date occurs before the date on which:
(1) for an estate, the decedent died; or
(2) for a trust or successive interest, an income interest begins.
(b) If the due date of a periodic income receipt or disbursement occurs on or after the date
on which a decedent died or an income interest begins, a fiduciary shall allocate the receipt or
disbursement to income.
(c) If an income receipt or disbursement is not periodic or has no due date, a fiduciary
shall treat the receipt or disbursement under this section as accruing from day to day. The
fiduciary shall allocate to principal the portion of the receipt or disbursement accruing before the
date on which a decedent died or an income interest begins, and to income the balance.
(d) A receipt or disbursement is periodic under subsections (b) and (c) if:
(1) the receipt or disbursement must be paid at regular intervals under an
obligation to make payments; or
(2) the payor customarily makes payments at regular intervals.
(e) An item of income or obligation is due under this section on the date the payor is
required to make a payment. If a payment date is not stated, there is no due date.
(f) Distributions to shareholders or other owners from an entity to which Section 401
applies are due:
(1) on the date fixed by or on behalf of the entity for determining the persons
entitled to receive the distribution;
93

(2) if no date is fixed, on the date of the decision by or on behalf of the entity to
make the distribution; or
(3) if no date is fixed and the fiduciary does not know the date of the decision by
or on behalf of the entity to make the distribution, on the date the fiduciary learns of the decision.
Comment
In Section 702(a) of the 2018 Act, the change from “before a decedent dies” and “before
an income interest begins” in Section 302(a) of the 1997 Act to “before the date on which … the
decedent died” and “before the date on which … an income interest begins” makes this provision
consistent with the reference to “the date of a testator’s death” in Section 701(b)(2) and
consistent with the reference to “on or after the date on which a decedent died” in Section
702(b). It means that the time of day at which the moment of death occurs is less relevant and
therefore less important to determine. In effect, the decedent’s income interest ends with the day
before the date of death, and the estate’s income interest begins with the date of death. This rule
in a uniform act does not purport to address related income tax uncertainties.
Section 302(b) of the 1997 Act used the term “periodic due date.” Section 702(b) of the
2018 Act changes the use of “periodic” to modify receipts or disbursements rather than due
dates. Section 702(d) explains when a receipt or disbursement is “periodic.”
With respect to distributions from an entity, Section 302(c) of the 1997 Act uses the term
“declaration date for the distribution,” consistent with the action of a board of directors in a
corporate context. In the 2018 Act, Section 702(f)(2) uses the more generic description “date of
the decision by or on behalf of the entity to make the distribution.” The 2018 Act adds Section
702(f)(3) to authorize the fiduciary to use the date the fiduciary learns of the decision if the
fiduciary doesn’t know the date the decision was made. If a date is fixed by or on behalf of the
entity for determining who is to receive a distribution, that date continues to govern, under
Section 702(f)(1).
SECTION 703. APPORTIONMENT WHEN INCOME INTEREST ENDS.
(a) In this section, “undistributed income” means net income received on or before the
date on which an income interest ends. The term does not include an item of income or expense
which is due or accrued or net income that has been added or is required to be added to principal
under the terms of the trust.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), when a mandatory income interest of
a beneficiary ends, the fiduciary shall pay the beneficiary’s share of the undistributed income that
94

is not disposed of under the terms of the trust to the beneficiary or, if the beneficiary does not
survive the date the interest ends, to the beneficiary’s estate.
(c) If a beneficiary has an unqualified power to withdraw more than five percent of the
value of a trust immediately before an income interest ends:
(1) the fiduciary shall allocate to principal the undistributed income from the
portion of the trust which may be withdrawn; and
(2) subsection (b) applies only to the balance of the undistributed income.
(d) When a fiduciary’s obligation to pay a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of
assets ends, the fiduciary shall prorate the final payment as required to preserve an income tax,
gift tax, estate tax, or other tax benefit.
Comment
In Section 703(a) of the 2018 Act, a change from “before the date on which an income
interest ends” in Section 303(a) of the 1997 Act to “on or before the date on which an income
interest ends” makes this provision consistent with the corresponding references in Sections 701
and 702 (former Sections 301 and 302). Applying the rules of Section 701, that means that
income received precisely on the date of a decedent’s death is allocated to the estate, estate
beneficiaries, or successive beneficiaries of a trust, not to the decedent. As with Section 702, this
rule in a uniform act does not purport to address related income tax uncertainties.
There are no other substantive changes from the 1997 Act in Section 703. In subsection
(c), a beneficiary’s right to “revoke” is changed to the right to “withdraw.” In subsection (d), the
subjective “accomplish a purpose of the trust or its settlor relating to income, gift, estate, or other
tax requirements” is changed to the more objective “preserve an income tax, gift tax, estate tax,
or other tax benefit.”
In Section 703(b), it remains the general rule that the income accrued between the last
payment date and the date of a mandatory income beneficiary’s death (often called “stub
income”) is payable to that income beneficiary’s estate. As with other provisions of this act,
under Section 201(a)(3) the terms of the trust may provide a different disposition of stub income.
95

[ARTICLE] 8
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS
SECTION 801. UNIFORMITY OF APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION. In
applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote
uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 802. RELATION TO ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES IN GLOBAL AND
NATIONAL COMMERCE ACT. This [act] modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not
modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C.
Section 7003(b).
SECTION 803. APPLICATION TO TRUST OR ESTATE. This [act] applies to a
trust or estate existing or created on or after [the effective date of this [act]], except as otherwise
expressly provided in the terms of the trust or this [act].
[SECTION 804. SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this [act] or its application to
any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of this [act] which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and to this end the provisions of this [act] are severable.]
Legislative Note: Include this section only if the state lacks a general severability statute or a
decision by the highest court of the state stating a general rule of severability.
SECTION 805. REPEALS; CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
(a) . . . .
(b) . . . .
(c) . . . .
96

Legislative Note: A state that has enacted a previous version of the Uniform Principal and
Income Act or another statute addressing principal and income should consider repealing that
statute or amending that statute to make it effective only before the effective date of this act. A
state that has enacted a separate statute permitting conversion of trusts to unitrusts or otherwise
addressing unitrusts as in Article 3 of this act, or has enacted other statutes addressing the issues
addressed by this act, should consider repealing those statutes or amending those statutes to
make them effective only before the effective date of this act.
SECTION 806. EFFECTIVE DATE. This [act] takes effect . . . .
97